Authors
John Beachem
Number of Reviews
133

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
In a Hollywood slowly growing devoid of original ideas, the current trend is to
remake the movies of old. How the 1958 Vincent Price vehicle "House on Haunted
Hill" was ever chosen for a remake will remain a mystery. While the original
film was a fun, cheesy, "b" horror movie, the remake only possesses one of
those qualities. I'll allow you to guess to which one I refer.
Steven Price (Geoffrey Rush) is a multi-millionaire, who has acquired his
fortune by creating a series of terrifying amusement parks. His wife, Evelyn
(Famke Janssen), is utterly miserable in their marriage, but remains with her
husband for his money. Her latest idea for how to spend his cash, is to rent an
old, abandoned mental institute and hold a party. Steven, however, has
different plans. Inviting four strangers in place of Evelyn's chosen guests
(Taye Diggs, Ali Larter, Bridgette Wilson, Peter Gallagher), Steven offers one
million dollars to anyone who can survive a night in the house.
It will forever remain a mystery to me, how great actors are occasionally drawn
to horrible scripts. Geoffrey Rush acts terrifically in almost anything he is
cast in. Here, however, he so shamelessly overacts that you'll find your teeth
grinding whenever a word comes out of his mouth. The other actors are uniformly
terrible, the only exception being Chris Kattan (A Night at the Roxbury) as the
owner of the house, who is given the film's few funny lines, and seems to
realize what a terrible movie he's in.
I try to find something positive in every movie I see, so here goes. Chris
Kattan's performance is one of the few hightlights here, along with three or
four truly eerie scenes in the first 45 minutes of the movie. Among them, a
scene in which a long dead doctor's ghost begins stalking one of the
characters, and where an angry spirit flies from a corner at a character with a
video camera. The amusement park rides shown during Steven Price's introduction
are quite entertaining, as well. 
Now, onto the majority of the movie. The characters here, with the exception of
Kattan's Watson Pritchett and Rush's Steven Price, possess no character
whatsoever. A character dies, and all one can think is "who was that?" while
blood covers the screen. The story attempts one or two shocking moments, though
they can be predicted far in advance. Speaking of predictable events, when the
characters were first introduced, I was able to pick out the survivors right
away.
As I said, there are a few eerie parts in the movie, but just as these begin to
show promise, the last 45 minutes of the film turn into one long, boring chase
scene for no apparent reason. I normally don't give away plot points like this,
but I felt obliged to point the following out. The effects are, for the most
part, rather well done, but the chase scene which is the film's finale offers
one of the most moronic looking ghosts I have ever seen. 
If you're desperate for another haunted house movie, I reccomend seeing the
original version of "House on Haunted Hill" or the original "The Haunting". If
you feel like dishonoring Vincent Price's memory, go ahead and catch this.
Otherwise, I reccomend everyone steer clear. "The House on Haunted Hill" runs
too long at 115 minutes. I grant it a charitable two stars.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
If there is one thing that science-fiction movies love to grapple with, it
is the possibility of time travel. According to most Hollywood writers,
there seem to be two different ways of dealing with time travel. Either the
past can be altered and the future improved, as in the "Terminator" movies,
or the seldom used possibility that the past cannot be changed, as explored
in Terry Gilliam's "12 Monkeys". "Frequency", the new film from director
Gregory Hoblit ("Primal Fear"), is a movie which falls under the first
category yet it is different from most films like this; we are able to see
the effects of changes to the past on the future as they occur. For example,
we get interesting scenes like one in which a character in the past burns a
message into a desk, while a person in the future watches the words appear.
However, "Frequency" does not attempt to deal with the paradox problems
which arise when dealing with time travel. You'll have to decide for
yourself if this was a good idea.
John Sullivan (James Caviezel) is a burned out cop (burned out cop seems to
be a common profession) who is having marital problems with his wife,
Samantha (Melissa Errico). One evening, while drowning away his miseries
with beer, he stumbles across his father's old ham radio. John turns it on
and discovers that he can somehow use it to communicate back through time
and speak to his father, Frank Sullivan (Dennis Quaid), who has been dead
for thirty years. While the two are, at first, disbelieving what has
happened, they are soon catching up like old friends. John finds that he may
be able to save his father's life if he can warn him about the accident
which will soon claim it. While John does manage to save his father's life,
it alters the future in ways which he could never have forseen.
For all you fanatical sci-fi fans out there, I'd best warn you that certain
things are never explained in this movie. The ham radio being able to
communicate back in time is only explained as having to do with massive
solar activity at the time, which isn't much of a scientific explanation.
The time paradox, which would be created by changing the past, is never even
brought up. A time paradox would be something like this: If a person is not
originally killed in the past, and a person in the future changes it so that
person is killed in the past, he wouldn't have existed in the future for the
person in the future to try and change the past. In other words, this is the
sort of thing which you can think about forever and it just goes around in
circles. This is why I personally think it's best that the movie didn't try
to explain it. Besides, you'll be having far too much fun with the rest of
the film to care about little plot inconsistencies like that.
The nice thing about a movie like this, which has no big name stars (except
the always underrated Dennis Quaid), is that it is forced to rely upon a
good script to draw a crowd. Afterall, last year's godawful "Wild Wild West"
proved that a movie with big name stars and no script simply doesn't work.
This isn't to say that the no name actors in "Frequency" don't do a good
job. James Caviezel ("The Thin Red Line") does a very good job of showing a
wide range of emotions without going over the top. Dennis Quaid
("Dragonheart") gives his usual fine, understated performance, and Andre
Braugher ("Primal Fear") turns in a great performance as Frank Sullivan's
cop friend, Satch. Of course, the actors are assisted by some good, if at
times a bit too sappy, dialogue. Great lines like "I wanted to let you know
you went down thirty years ago, you just don't know it yet" are sprinkled
throughout the movie.
In addition to the nice performances and dialogue, "Frequency" has a few
other things going for it. Gregory Hoblit's direction is quite impressive,
He keeps things interesting by moving events along at a steady pace and only
allowing sequences to drag on a little too long once or twice. The
soundtrack nicely compliments the story, It always plays softly in the
background, rather than overwhelming what is being said (Which is a common
practice these days). "Frequency" is one of those good natured movies which
are now so ill received. While there may be violence, that isn't what this
film is about. It's about a man able to reach back in time and talk to
someone who he never had the chance to say goodbye to. "Frequency" is a good
movie which will unforunately do poorly at the box office due to lack of
star power, advertising, and the ever popular extreme violence. The film
runs 117 minutes, which might have been cut down to 105 with a bit more
editing. I'd recommend it to fans of time travel stories and give it four
out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Blue Streak (1999)
`Blue Streak', Martin Lawrence's newest outing and first appearance without a
big name star by his side (Life, Bad Boys), may be cliched and formulaic, but
it entertains, none the less. However, be warned that if you're not a Martin
Lawrence fan you should stay far away from this film, as it is carried almost
entirely by his comic antics.
The story opens with a gang of high-tech thieves led by Miles Logan breaking
into what appears to be a jewelry store. The robbery has just been completed,
when one of the gang pulls a double cross and accidentally alerts the police.
Miles manages to secure the stolen gem in an air duct of an uncompleted
building before the police catch him. Two years later, released from prison,
Miles goes back to recover his prize only to discover that the building is now
a police station. What is the most obvious solution? Why, to disguise himself
as a cop and join the ranks of course.
As a by-the-numbers piece of film making, it is fairly easy to guess the
outcome of this movie from the start, though I won't reveal it here. In fact,
the only things that truly make this worth seeing are the performances by
Martin Lawrence and Luke Wilson as his likable, yet incredibly naive partner.
Lawrence's talent stems mainly from his exaggerated speech and facial
expressions, and he puts this talent to good use here. Just watch his
expressions in a scene in which a dozen or so cops have cornered him and are
asking what his opinion is about some new piece of police equipment. 
Unfortunately, there are some rather large problems with this movie in addition
to the predictable script. First, there are several utterly pointless
characters such as Melissa Green, a defense attorney who appears in only three
or four scenes, and is apparently present only so the audience can dislike her.
The film's largest annoyance comes from Tulley, who is a friend of Logan's from
the jewel heist. Chappelle has such a whiny, obnoxious voice that I saw several
people in the audience cringing whenever he spoke. 
Despite these problems, the movie is a lot of fun, and Lawrence is clearly
having the time of his life making it. I simply hope that next time he finds a
more original script to house his rather considerable comic talent. For
delivering a lot of chuckles and a few belly laughs, I give `Blue Streak' three
and a half stars and a recommendation to try and catch a matinee.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
Directed by: David Fincher
Written by: Chuck Palahniuk (novel), Jim Uhls
It's always easy to spot a director's style. Get about halfway through a film,
and all the tell tale signs are there. However, in David Fincher's case, the
signs can be spotted in the opening credits. From these bizzare credits and
character introductions, to the dark filming locations, to the unusual music,
Fincher is a master of foreboding, creepy atmospheres.
The story revolves around the narrator, Jack (Edward Norton), an insomniac
who's slowly dying thanks to his boring existence. Frequenting support groups
for illnesses he doesn't posess seems to aleviate his insomnia until he meets
Marla (Helena Botham Carter) ,who somehow ruins the experience by being a
fellow faker. Shortly thereafter he meets up with Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt), an
man who seems to be everything Jack always wished he could be. Together, Jack
and Tyler form a club where men who are bored with their lives go to beat each
other up. While things are going well with the club, Tyler seems to be forming
plans for escalating the club behind Jack's back.
David Fincher's previously well known works have been "Se7en" and "The Game",
which are both dark films which mess with ones mind. This latest venture into
the unusual is based on Chuck Palahniuk's novel, the primary message in "Fight
Club" seems to be that one should throw off the shackles of everyday life and
be all that one wants to be. This message is given in a story which, at first
glance, appears to be about nothing more than a bunch of guys beating each
other up every night. While there is certainly a lot of violence and an ungodly
amount of blood, there is also some wonderful dialogue, a few truly hilarious
scenes, and terrific acting all around.
To begin with, this movie is not even remotely appropriate for younger
audiences. There are more scenes here which show people being beaten to bloody,
barely living pulps than one can count. There are also a few gross out scenes
that really do their job quite well (almost too well as a matter of fact).
Swearing is rampant, and sex is rather prevalant throughout most of the movie.
So please, don't take any children to see this.
Now, my MPAA warning out of the way, on to the good stuff. For all the
one-liner fans out there, this movie is full of them. A great example would be
"On a long enough time-line, everyones survival rate is zero". In fact, the
dialogue is so witty, insightful, and humorous that it's a little difficult to
believe it's coming from the mouths of the characters involved here.
As for the acting, Edward Norton is terrific, as always, and it's entirely
possible he'll be in the running for a little gold statue on his mantel. Brad
Pitt, who has shown that he can do well when given the right roles (12 Monkeys,
Se7en) is absolutely hilarious in the role of the out of control Tyler. Helena
Botham Carter, who audiences would know best for her roles in "Mary Shelly's
Frankenstein" and "Mighty Aphrodite", is perfect as the rather disturbed third
party in this trio.
I don't want to give too much of this film away, because the plot twists are a
lot of the fun here. Suffice to say, you'll never see the end coming. To sum
up, for a fun, insightful, and very gruesome movie, catch "Fight Club". I fully
recommend it and award it four and a half stars. 
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Manos, the Hands of Fate (1966)
I'm going to keep this plot summary brief, something I wish Mr. Warren had 
done with his "film" (I know, "Manos" only runs 74 minutes, but that's not 
brief enough). Michael (Hal Warren) leads his family on a trip out into the 
middle of nowhere. After being lost for a great deal of time, they stumble 
across a lodge run by Torgo (the late John Reynolds), a small man with large 
knees. Torgo informs the family that he watches the house while the master 
(Tom Neyman) is away. Michael insists on Torgo allowing his family to stay, 
despite the fact that Michael's wife, Margaret (the late Diane Mahree), and 
daughter, Debbie (Stephanie Nielson), aren't too keen on staying. Torgo 
relents and slowly carries the family's luggage into the house. Meanwhile, 
the master awakens, and his wives (Jackey Neyman, Sherry Proctor, Robin 
Redd) vie for his favor by wrestling in the mud.
I'm afraid I'm not an eloquent enough writer to adequately describe the 
experience that is "Manos, the Hands of Fate". I don't believe I can do 
justice to this diamond in the rough; this magnificent piece of filmmaking 
that is - oh forget it, I can't even say it. "Manos, the Hands of Fate" is, 
arguably, the worst movie of all time. Imagine, if you will, the following: 
Hal Warren, a fertilizer salesman, bets a friend that he can make a popular 
horror film on a minimal budget. He hires several actors who have little to 
no experience or training (he himself has no experience or training), and 
leads the cast through a script which consists of long spells of nothingness 
occurring. You're no doubt wondering why I have referred to cast members as 
"the late"; it's because after the film was finished, and the cast laughed 
out of the theater at its premier, three (that's right, three) cast members 
committed suicide. "Manos" (which means hands, by the way) has since become 
a legendary film; one which can only be watched under one of three 
circumstances: you're completely drunk, completely insane, or completely 
asleep.
While looking over the list of actors involved in this project, you'll most 
likely realize that none of the names sound familiar. That's because each 
cast member sealed his/her acting fate by appearing in this "movie". Not one 
actor involved went on to make any other picture. Could appearing in a bad 
movie really do this to one's career? It's Doubtful. For example, Barry 
Pepper will no doubt go on to make other films after "Battlefield Earth" 
(which is not to say "Battlefield Earth" is in the same league as "Manos"). 
The chief reason none of these actors went on to other films is because none 
of them could act. Hal Warren was as incompetent in front of the camera as 
he was behind it; Tom Neyman made Van Damme look like an Oscar winner; and 
Diane Mahree's part consisted of, well, nothing really. The only two actors 
worth noting are John Reynolds and Stephanie Nielson. Stephanie Nielson may 
have been only a child, but she outdid every adult in the film (she's no 
doubt in a mental institute somewhere after experiencing this movie). John 
Reynolds, who was sadly one of the three casualties of this war, actually 
showed some small trace of talent. Do I mean he was good? Not in the 
slightest. Yet, I think if he'd received some schooling and experience he 
might have gone on to a small career.
So what does a movie look like when there's no budget? Well, picture "The 
Blair Witch Project" without the scares (oh wait, there were no scares in 
"Blair Witch"), the extras, the scenery, or the nice cameras. You see, 
"Manos, the Hands of Fate" was filmed with such a cheap, ancient camera that 
the film could only be shot in thirty two second bursts. This means there 
are fades and/or cuts every thirty two seconds for no reason. The costuming 
in "Manos" is rather interesting. There are really only three different bits 
of costuming: the wives' undergarments, which they wear while fighting each 
other; the master's cloak of hands, which is a large cloak covered in large 
hands (something involving the god Manos, whom he serves); and Torgo's 
knees. Torgo's knees, by the way, may look like nothing more than large 
anomalies stuck to his legs, but they're actually an ingenious invention 
thought up by John Reynolds. Torgo is actually supposed to be a satyr, and 
the large knees were supposed to represent goat legs. I'm not quite sure how 
Reynolds thought this up, and I'm not sure how we were supposed to know they 
were goat legs, and I'm not even sure why Torgo is supposed to be a Satyr, 
but there you have it.
There are two more things worth noting in "Manos". One is the dialogue, 
particularly that of Torgo; the other is the soundtrack. Torgo's dialogue 
generally consists of repeating the same phrases over and over again. For 
example, when asked about the master's health, Torgo states: "Dead? No, 
madam. Not dead the way you know it. He is with us always. Not dead the way 
you know it. He is with us always." I think Warren wanted to emphasize the 
fact that he wasn't dead like we know it, but I could be wrong. Torgo also 
states, in a line vaguely (very vaguely) reminiscent of a classic line from 
Rosalie Crutchley in "The Haunting": "There is no way out of here. It'll be 
dark soon. There is no way out of here." It should be noted that the camera 
used was so ancient and decrepit that it could not record sound. Therefore, 
all the characters voices were dubbed by four different people: Hal Warren, 
Hal's wife, and two friends. The soundtrack to "Manos" is certainly one of 
the high-points. After some strange and out of place lounge music in the 
film's opening (which consists of a lot of driving) we settle into the Torgo 
theme, which is made up of six notes played over and over again till you're 
certain your ears will begin to bleed. If I haven't made this film sound bad 
enough, and you are unfortunate enough to go and witness it, I do apologize. 
I'd recommend "Manos, the Hands of Fate" to those who simply adore classic 
bad movies (because this one ranks amongst the worst) and award it a full 
one out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Replacements, The (2000)
Just like back in 1987, the players of the professional football league 
(PFL?) are on strike. With only four games left in the season, and three 
wins needed to make the playoffs, the owner of the Washington Sentinels 
(Jack Warden) has decided to hire on replacement players to finish the 
season. They will be chosen and led by his old friend and former head coach, 
McGinty (Gene Hackman). McGinty decides to go with former college star Shane 
Falco (Keanu Reeves) as his QB, and a host of misfits as his starting 
players. His new players include: an ex-con; a SWAT team member; a sumo 
wrestler; two bodyguards named Jackson; a retired Welsh soccer player; a 
deaf man; and a janitor from a convenience store. Of course, the 
cheerleaders have also gone on strike (for some reason), and only their 
leader, Annabelle (Brooke Langton), remains. She decides to hire dancers as 
replacement cheerleaders, but the dancers neglect to mention that they are 
actually lap dancers. McGinty has to whip the players into shape and get 
them to win three of the next four games. Only two problems are facing him: 
one is that Falco has lost all his confidence since he lost the Sugar Bowl 
several years prior; and two is that the former players, led by QB Martel 
(Brett Cullen), are making things more than a little difficult for his 
players. Will McGinty and his team prevail? Will the sun rise tomorrow?
After reading that very generic sounding plot, these are probably a few of 
the questions running through your mind: Is "The Replacements" cliched? Is 
it formulaic? Is it coated by a nice, thick layer of cheese? And, most 
importantly, is it funny? The answers respectively are: yes, yes, yes, and 
oh god yes. In a summer thus far packed with humorless comedies ("Scary 
Movie", "Nutty Professor II"), Howard Deutch's ("The Odd Couple II") "The 
Replacements" is the only movie so far that had both the audience and me 
laughing so hard we couldn't breath. This is rather strange considering that 
the movie was released in August, that nesting ground for bad movies 
everywhere. One of the things that makes "The Replacements" such a rare 
comedy (particularly in this horrible year) is that it manages to keep the 
laughs coming nearly throughout its entire running time. In fact, the only 
times the laughs stop coming are when Keanu Reeves is alone on screen, with 
anyone, and the movie starts to get sappy and sentimental. Fortunately, 
Deutch never allows these moments to go on for too long, and you can always 
rest assured another hilarious scene is right around the corner.
In any screwball comedy like this, acting is not going to be all that 
important. Of course, in any movie with Gene Hackman, you're going to get 
some great acting regardless. Only Hackman could make some of the cheesy 
lines he gets sound great. For example, coming out of anyone else's mouth, a 
line like: "He doesn't have it all, he doesn't have heart. You do." would be 
ear-gratingly bad. Coming from Hackman, you don't even notice how cheesy it 
is. The problem is that standing next to Hackman you've got Keanu Reeves, 
the black hole of acting himself. Thankfully he does a decent enough job 
(for him anyway) and doesn't get in the way too often. The film's main 
strengths lie with the supporting cast. Granted, none of the supporting 
characters are developed in any way, but that really doesn't matter in a 
movie like this. You're not going to see a movie like "The Replacements" for 
deep, involved character development (at least I hope you're not). So if you 
put that aside and just have a good time, you should really get a kick out 
of some of these characters. The two that really stood out in my mind were 
Rhys Ifans' ("Notting Hill") Scottish kicker, Gruff; and John Favreau's 
("Swingers") completely insane SWAT team member, Daniel Bateman. Even if the 
rest of the movie were terrible, it would still be worthwhile just to see 
these two having a great time. John Madden and Pat Summerall show up playing 
two announcers named John Madden and Pat Summerall (hey, sometimes there are 
roles you are just born to play).
As much as I love both football and movies, it seems Hollywood is usually 
incapable of blending the two together. Let's think back here. The last 
attempted football movie was Oliver Stone's atrocious "Any Given Sunday", 
which managed to fail on every level. There was "Rudy", back in 1993, but 
while it succeeded as a dramatic film, it's hard to classify that one as a 
football movie. We've seen previous attempts at comical football movies with 
films like 1991's abysmal "Necessary Roughness" and Adam Sandler's somewhat 
amusing, though hardly hilarious "The Waterboy". What did these previous 
attempts lack that "The Replacements" contains? Simple enough, it contains 
not one, but several hilarious scenes which will stick in your mind for 
quite some time: A bar room brawl, the first training session, the two 
Jacksons talking to Martel about Falco's car, and a musical number in a 
prison cell which is just too funny to be described to name a few. If a 
movie can make that many of its scenes stick in your mind long after its 
viewing, then you know you got your money's worth.
The movie contains a few references only hardcore football fans would 
probably recognize. My favorite one was watching the pen happy John Madden 
be put to the test by one of Falco's bungled plays (if you're a football fan 
you know what I mean by that. If you're not a football fan, why are you 
thinking about seeing this movie?). The film's soundtrack isn't exactly the 
kind of music I care for, ranging from hard rock to oldies, but that doesn't 
mean it's inappropriate to the movie. I'd better warn all the parents out 
there (something I don't ordinarily do), while the film may carry a PG-13 
rating, the football violence can be a bit much, there's a significant 
amount of swearing, and the scenes involving the new cheerleaders can be a 
bit, um, much. "The Replacements" runs 118 minutes, though it doesn't feel 
anywhere near that long. I'd recommend it to fans of football movies and 
comedies. If you happen to be a fan of both, you should have a blast. I give 
the movie a well earned four out of five stars. By the way, the movie does 
leave us with a great moral. Pain heals, chicks dig scars, and glory lasts 
forever.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Play It to the Bone (1999)
Perhaps I'm alone in this (though I don't think so), but I don't care for
boxing. In fact, I'm amazed it hasn't been outlawed yet. Think about what it
involves: two guys get together and beat the crap out of each other for the
amusement of others. It's like the Roman coliseum without the nice architecture
(or the lions and swords I suppose, but that's beside the point). Oh well, my
rant is over. "Play it to the Bone" may be a movie about boxing, but there is
surprisingly little involved. The first hour and a half or so of this film is
about the fighters getting to the arena. They drive, and drive, and chat
incessantly about topics which no one could care less about, and then drive
some more. I'm fortunate I didn't fall asleep before the wonderfully filmed
bout, which takes place at the film's conclusion.
Cesar Dominguez (Antonio Banderas) and Vince Boudreau (Woody Harrelson) are two
washed up ex-boxers. When a fight promoter (Tom Sizemore) asks them to duke it
out with each other for the first time, the friends can hardly refuse. So, they
jump in Cesar's girlfriend's (Lolita Davidovich) car, and head for Vegas. The
prize for the winner of this matchup? A chance to fight the world champ, and
win back the title. On the way to Vegas, the two friends find themselves at
each other's throats as they quarrel over who is the better boxer.
I know I usually write a little more about a film's plot than this, but there's
nothing more to say. I think "Play it to the Bone" is supposed to be a comedy,
but I'm not entirely sure about that. I might have smiled once, but for the
life of me I can't remember when or why. Most people know by now that I am a
strong advocate of directors shortening movies by losing useless scenes. Never
has a movie screamed to be shortened quite like this one. In between short,
pointless discussions between Banderas, Harrelson, and Davidovich, we watch the
car drive around. We watch it from overhead, behind, inside, and from anywhere
else Shelton can think to place the camera. Occasionally, the group will stop
at a diner and have a few more painfully humorless conversations. At one point
they pick up the horribly miscast Lucy Liu, who plays a sex and drug crazed
wanderer.
There are three high points to the film, and they all involve actual boxing.
The first two involve Dominguez and Boudreau describing how they fell from
grace. While brief, the scenes do offer some insight into the minds of the
characters, and what is driving them to fight one last time. When the two
finally reach their destination, we are treated to what is really a very
interesting match. I found myself truly wanting to find out how the fight would
end, even though I knew from the start what was bound to happen. I might even
have granted the film a three star rating, had it ended directly after the
fight rather than subjecting us to more pointless dialogue.
I've never been a fan of Woody Harrelson, but I've always found Banderas to be
a rather entertaining actor. I'm sorry he chose this script, which didn't give
him any amusing dialogue to work with. Davidovich's character is a bit hard to
understand. She's supposed to be the ex-girlfriend of Harrelson and the present
girlfriend of Banderas, but she's more like a mom than a love interest. She
does nothing but break up fights between the two men and try to give them
encouragement about their chances against one another. As for Tom Sizemore, a
very gifted actor, he's completely wasted in the role of the evil, greedy
promoter. The film runs far longer than necessary at 124 minutes. I suppose if
you're desperate for a movie about boxing, I'd recommend "Play it to the Bone".
Otherwise, I advise you to give this one a miss and grant it a generous two and
a half stars.
Comments are always appreciated, e-mail to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
Directed by: Wolfgang Petersen
Written by: Sebastian Junger (book), William D. Wittliff
In the Fall of 1991, the Andrea Gail left Gloucester, Mass. and headed for 
the fishing grounds of the North Atlantic. Two weeks later, an event took 
place that had never occurred in recorded history. That's the tagline for 
Wolfgang Petersen's ("Air Force One") "The Perfect Storm", and it pretty 
well sums up the film's entire plot. All we really have are George Clooney 
playing the Captain of the Andrea Gail, Billy Tyne; and Mark Whalberg 
("Three Kings") playing his second in command, Billy Shatford, sitting on a 
boat getting tossed around by a hurricane. This is generally all that 
happens throughout the film. Oh sure, there's a little side story about a 
coast guard crew and a family trapped on a sail boat, and we get the 
occasional glimpses of the crew of the Andrea Gail's families back home. Yet 
all the movie really involves is watching six men stumble around on the deck 
of a small fishing ship. When I first heard about this film I thought that 
sounded like a ten minute movie stretched out to no more than an hour and a 
half, right? Wrong, Petersen and Wittliff ("Legends of the Fall") manage to 
drag this bloody movie out for more than two excruciating hours!
I'll grant it, "The Perfect Storm" does succeed admirably on one level. It 
tests your abilities to both sustain disbelief and endure sappy melodrama 
like few films have before. As for the suspension of disbelief, that I could 
handle (afterall, I watched "Battlefield: Earth", now nothing can compare). 
This is despite the fact that we are required to believe a man could climb 
up the side of a ship while in the middle of the worst hurricane in recorded 
history. Now I'll admit, I don't know much about boats. In fact I despise 
the things and wild horses couldn't drag me onto one. However, I'm pretty 
sure when the wind is strong enough to make waves two to three hundred feet 
high it's going to knock you around a bit more than it does the Andrea 
Gail's crew. As for enduring the sappy melodrama, that I couldn't do. I'm 
sure when this really happened emotions ran high for some time both during 
and after the event, but I doubt people were running around screaming cheesy 
speeches while VERY dramatic music constantly played around them. Of course 
I could be wrong.
I can forgive a lot in a bad movie if the acting is exceptional, but it's 
certainly sub-par in "The Perfect Storm". George Clooney doesn't even act 
like George Clooney (like he usually does). He acts like a man doing a bad 
impersonation of George Clooney. As though his regular acting wasn't bad 
enough, just wait till you see him get mad. I've never actually seen him act 
really angry in a movie before, and now I see why he's never been asked to; 
it's hilarious. Mark Whalberg, who "acted" alongside Clooney in the equally 
terrible "Three Kings" last year, seems to have improved some since then, 
but given some of the horrifying dialogue he's given it's sometimes hard to 
tell. The rest of the cast amounts to little more than cameos. We get the 
always good Michael Ironside ("Total Recall") as Clooney's evil, money 
grubbing boss (is there another kind in Hollywood?); and the usually 
adequate Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio ("The Abyss") as Clooney's love 
interest of sorts. The only other person worth noting is William Fichtner 
("Drowning Mona"), that poor man's Christopher Walken himself, as the crew's 
requisite slacker who redeems himself at some point in the story.
So, you're probably asking yourself, is there anything good about this 
movie? Sure, the special effects are quite good. Anything else? I'm afraid 
not. Fear not, because there's plenty more that's so laughably bad you might 
almost enjoy the film as a result. The dialogue is so painfully bad I 
actually covered my ears at one point. We get lines like: "One more trip out 
there and the Andrea Gail will own you! Like it owns Billy Tyne!". Ouch, or 
how about: "Fish will gather again for the Andrea Gail." If this was a 
parody that would actually be funny. I'm not sure who should be blamed for 
the film's overly dramatic score, James Horner for composing it or Wolfgang 
Petersen for using it in every scene, dramatic or not. I think certain 
scenes near the film's beginning were intended to show how joyous and fun 
fishing for a living can be. If that was the intent it failed, because 
fishing for a living still looks dull and monotonous, just like the film. 
I'd recommend "The Perfect Storm" to those with nautical minds, because 
they'll probably get something more out of it than I did, and to those who 
for some reason enjoy heart tugging, sentimental movies. I give the movie 
two out of five stars. Oh, and did I mention the special effects? They're 
ever so impressive.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)
Directed by: Paul Verhoeven
Written by: Gary Scott Thompson, Andrew W. Malowe
Sebastian Caine (Kevin Bacon) is a brilliant research scientist working on a 
project for the military. He and his six person team are searching for the 
secret to invisibility. The team consists of his ex-lover, Dr. Linda Foster 
(Elizabeth Shue), her current lover, Dr. Matt Kensington (Josh Brolin), a 
veterinarian (Kim Dickens), a computer expert (Joey Slotnick), and two 
assistants (Mary Jo Randle, Greg Grunberg). While causing test animals to 
attain invisibility hasn't proven difficult, bringing them back to normal 
has. after almost two weeks of tirelessly searching for a "cure", Sebastian 
finds it and decides it is time to move on to the next phase of the project 
- human experimentation. Offering himself up as a guinea pig, Sebastian 
undergoes the procedure and finds the experience exhilarating. The only 
problem is, the cure that worked for the animals doesn't work for humans. 
While the team works tirelessly to return Sebastian to normal, Sebastian 
slowly loses his sanity as the power invisibility grants him becomes more 
and more enticing.
For those of you out there who don't know this, Plato once wrote a theory on 
what would happen to a person who was granted invisibility. I think these 
writings were, in some small way, part of the inspiration for Gary Thompson 
and Andrew Marlowes' script. Plato theorized that a person who was invisible 
could do anything they wanted to, and therefore their morals would vanish. 
The first half of "Hollow Man" attempts to delve into this idea, and almost 
succeeds. If the film had been a character study about the effects of such a 
power on a person's morals and beliefs, it could have been quite fascinating 
(it would have needed a different director than Paul "Starship Troopers" 
Verhoeven however). Instead, the part of the film focusing on Sebastian 
losing his sanity is rushed through and Verhoeven turns the movie into a 
typical monster/slasher film. I've decided a new law should be implemented 
in Hollywood: All films will cost half what they do now, and will have a 
maximum running time of one hour. That's because it seems most Hollywood 
writers can only keep a good plot going for an hour before transforming an 
otherwise interesting film into a shapeless mass of cliches.
Kevin Bacon, while by no means a bad actor, is not someone I would call a 
great talent. He has given a few very good performances ("Stir of Echoes" 
and "Apollo 13" spring to mind), but he's given a few truly horrendous ones 
as well ("The River Wild" anyone?). His performance in "Hollow Man" falls 
squarely in the middle. While he does a decent job playing a man losing his 
sanity (I think "Stir of Echoes" gave him some practice), his scenes where 
he is given a chance to display this talent are few and far between. Much 
more often are the scenes where he gets to act like a deranged lunatic, and 
he gleefully overacts in these scenes. The biggest problem with Bacon's part 
isn't actually his fault. The problem is that Sebastian never comes off as 
particularly sane to begin with, so when he begins losing his mind we're 
really not too surprised. The majority of his supporting cast has very 
little screen time, with only Elizabeth Shue ("Palmetto") and Josh Brolin 
("Mimic") given any time to develop. Of course, the writers' idea of 
developing a character seems to be to make that character have a past love 
life or a past rivalry with another character. Shue and Brolin are required 
to give slight performances, and they do so beautifully. Watch for William 
Devane ("Payback") in a very small part as Sebastian's boss.
Let's face it, the main reason everyone's going to see this movie is because 
the trailers promised two things: some great looking special effects, and a 
few good scares. On the first count, "Hollow Man" succeeds admirably. The 
special effects are just about guaranteed a nomination at this year's 
Oscars. Everything from watching a person turn invisible one layer of skin 
at a time to seeing a person's hand being bitten into by an invisible ape is 
masterfully crafted. Unfortunately these effects are completely wasted, and 
as a result become tiresome after a short while. As for the scares, I can 
honestly say I didn't jump once, no matter how many startle effects 
Verhoeven threw at me. I think the reason none of the startle effects worked 
is because Verhoeven only used them when the audience was anticipating them. 
If he'd thrown a few at us during scenes when we weren't sitting there, 
counting down the seconds till the next time Sebastian was going to leap out 
of the shadows, they might have been fairly effective.
The most painful thing in the entire film must be the last half hour. Up 
till this point things have been bad, but I could at least tolerate it 
because I could tell a really interesting story was just aching to break 
free. In the last half hour the writers throw out everything they had done 
up till that point and turned the film into a straight out slasher movie, 
complete with a villain who simply will not die no matter what you do to him 
(in this case electrocution, fire, being beaten to a bloody pulp, etc.). We 
also get those two most irritating of all cliches, characters calling out 
someone's name even when it's obvious who is really there, and a group 
splitting up so they can be picked off one by one. The dialogue up till the 
last half hour was at least tolerable if not good, but it falls flat on its 
face and becomes downright painful during that excruciating segment of the 
film. The score composed by Jerry Goldsmith ("LA Confidential") for "Hollow 
Man" isn't quite appropriate to the film; though that's probably not his 
fault. While it should have been low and creepy, Verhoeven decides on loud 
and obnoxious instead (a disturbing trend in Hollywood these days). At one 
point Sebastian says "You don't make history by following the rules, you 
make it by seizing the moment." I wish Verhoeven and company had followed 
this advice. "Hollow Man" runs far too long at 114 minutes. I recommend it 
to fans of "special effects over story" movies and give it two and a half 
out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
Before entering "The Haunting", it's important for the viewer to consider what
kind of movie they're looking for. If it's a terrifying horror movie, look
elsewhere. If it's a special effects extravaganza with fine acting and some of
the best sets ever seen, this is the movie to see. It should also be noted that
as a remake of the chilling original, the film is not quite up to par. If taken
on its own merits however, this is a rather fun, brainless summer movie.
Dr. David Marrow is a professor whose speciality is fear. Taking a group of
subjects consisting of the timid Eleanor; the perky, gorgeous Theo, and the
goofy Owen, he travels to Hill House. Hill House is a tremendous mansion in the
middle of nowhere which has a rather checkered past (I don't want to say more,
as further explanation would be a spoiler). Dr. Marrow does not, however, tell
the group that they are there to examine the effects of fear. They are
supposedly there to cure the insomnia experienced by the group. Upon reaching
the house, it slowly dawns on the three, and eventually on Dr. Marrow, that the
house is indeed haunted, and out for their blood. The house seems to take a
special interest in Eleanor. As the nights go by, the house becomes more and
more dangerous.
I was rather disappointed at the bad reviews this recieved (except from the
always reliable Roger Ebert). So many critics seemed to grade this based
entirely on how it compared to the original. If viewed on its own merits, I
found this to be quite an enjoyable film. The acting is quite good, although
the characters really are underwritten. The standout in my opinion is Liam
Neeson, but I've always been a fan of his. The one person I was not so
impressed by was Lili Taylor, though she seems to be receiving all the praise
from other critics. Owen Wilson does get a little annoying at times, but for
the most part he adds some neccesary comic relief.
The greatest part of this film is amazingly not the visuals, though they are
impressive. It is the house itself, that steals the show. Filled with long,
dark corridors which seem to lead to nowhere, and are filled with chilling (and
sometimes moving!) statues, the house is truly awe inspiring. The fireplace,
and its possible denizens, is one of the few truly frightening parts of the
film.
This brings us to the flaws, and there are quite a few of them. As I mentioned
before, the characters are very underwritten. We know nothing about Dr. Marrow,
Theo, or Owen, and very little about Eleanor. The dialagoue is, at times,
positively abysmal. For example, Liam Neeson climbs a very rickety flight of
stairs to help an apparently suicidal Eleanor. The stairs collapse, all over
the place, and Owen points at them, open mouthed saying "Look, the stairs are
falling." My only other really major complaint is the film's end, which was
really quite terrible. Eleanor confronts the evil spirit in a huge (but
strangely disappointing)special effects event, while spouting out some sort of
strange speech about family values!
As I stated earlier, do not see this film if you want a terrifying horror
movie. It simply doesn't inspire much fear. However, I do reccomend it simply
to see the amazing, bone chilling sets. For this, some fine visual effects, and
some good acting, "The Haunting" earns three and a half stars.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
After watching this film, I sat back and realized I'd been on the edge of my
seat the entire time, and my hands were gripping the armrests. Looking back on
this, I can't for the life of me figure out what it is about this particular
movie that so engrossed me.
Ronin are samurai who have no master. Modern Ronin appear to be men trained in
arts such as espionage, assassination, and combat who have no country to serve.
Therefore, they choose to line their own pockets. Five such men are hired by an
irish woman who goes only by the name of Dierdre. They are hired to steal a
silver briefcase from a band of men, and deliver it to her. The plan hardly
goes off without a hitch since none of the men trust each other. One of them
grabs the case for himself with the intent of selling it to the highest bidder.
The remaining men, led by Sam go after him in an attempt to get the case, and
thus their money.
Let me say right now, that I'm not entirely sure how to go about reviewing this
film. It sounds like so many other typical action movies, complete with some
great looking car chases and a whole lot of explosions. However, there is
something strangely different about this one. More enthralling. I'm sure part
of the movie's charm is the presence of DeNiro and Reno, two wonderful actors.
There is nothing even remotely resembling character development, but this
strangely adds to the story. It makes these men more mysterious and dangerous.
A lot of things are never adequately explained, such as why the group is
attacked in one of the first scenes involving them, and to warn everyone right
now, we never discover the contents of the much sought after case. Also worth
noting, Stellan Skarsgard is quite good as the cold blooded Gregor, but there
is an early scene in which he demonstrates his amazing reflexes for no apparent
reason since we never see them used in the rest of the film.
So, a few pointless scenes are present, but the majority of the film is quite
well done, and the car chases are enthralling. For some great action, good
acting, and a rather bizzare plot, Ronin earns four stars.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
Directed by: Martin Scorsese
Written by: Joe Connelly (novel), Paul Schrader
If there is one thing Martin Scoresese's new film, "Bringing out the Dead"
proves, it is that great actors and great directing cannot save a weak script.
Don't get me wrong, Paul Schrader's script does contain quite a few truly
hilarious scenes, and some wonderful characters, but it is marred by long
stretches of boring, useless material. While the previews talk about Nicholas
Cage's character, Frank Pierce, seeing ghosts all around him, this is really
nothing more than a rather pointless subplot.
Frank Pierce is a paramedic in New York city. While once good at this job,
witnessing the suffering and death around him has taken its toll. Now, he
hasn't saved a life in months, and his nights are filled with ghostly images of
a young lady he was unable to save. His three partners, Larry (John Goodman),
Marcus (Ving Rhames), and Tom (Tom Sizemore), each deal with their jobs in
different ways, but aren't able to help Frank with his troubles. The only
person able to bring anything into Frank's life is Mary Burke (Patricia
Arquette), a young lady whos father has suffered a heart attack and is staying
at Frank's hospital.
"Bringing out the Dead" certainly contains moments of shear brilliance. The
greatest example of this can be found in the use of the film's wonderful
soundtrack. Each song completely enhances the scene in which it is played. From
UB40's "Red, Red Wine" being played during a scene in which goldfish lie dying
upon a blood soaked floor, to "You Can't Put Your Arms Around a Memory" playing
while Frank's ambulance flies across the darkened city streets. If only the
music had been able to enhance scenes in which Frank stares out at the ghost of
the girl, Rose (Cynthia Roman) appears at random, for no apparent reason.
The supporting cast is wonderful here, though underused. John Goodman, great in
an almost pointless role, plays a character similar to Frank, though less
haunted. Ving Rhames, in one of his best performances yet (and that's saying
something), plays a much more hopeful man, who believes he is playing an
important role in these peoples' lives. Last but not least, the always
wonderful, if underrated Tom Sizemore plays a man who can't seem to decide if
he wants to help people or hurt them. If these three men had been present a bit
more often, this truly would have helped the film.
Nicholas Cage plays Nicholas Cage to perfection. No, that is not a typo, I
personally believe that Mr. Cage simply plays himself in dozens of different
roles. Always a depressed, moody, dour man who mutters on and on about how he
can't take life any longer. Patricia Arquette fares better as the troubled drug
addict who can't come to terms with how she feels about her dying father. The
scenes between the two are well written and well acted, and the blossoming
romance never feels forced.
>From what I have said so far, it must sound as though my star rating is a
little too harsh. This is not the case, since I found myself falling asleep
during many segments which served no purpose, and which seemed to drag on
forever. The other major fault, as mentioned earlier, is the underuse of the
other three paramedics. While they were on screen, those three actors brought a
spark to the otherwise rather lifeless script. When absent, the film sputtered
and died.
"Bringing out the Dead" runs too long at 120 minutes which could easily have
been chopped down to 100. I reccomend that if you really want to see it, wait
for video, since little should be lost in the transition. I grant it three
stars. One last comment. For those of you who noticed that the title was taken
from "Monty Python and the Holy Grail", there is a brief line in the film
acknowledging this.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
Benjamin Martin (Mel Gibson) is a former war hero who now runs a plantation 
with his family in late 18th century South Carolina. The rest of the country 
is up in arms about King George's taxation from England, and they are crying 
for revolution. Martin says he will not fight, but his son, Gabriel (Heath 
Ledger), joins the colonial army against his father's will. Martin's friend, 
Col. Burwell (the excellent Chris Cooper), is Gabriel's commanding officer 
and promises to look after the boy. Martin tries to go on with his life, but 
soon finds himself drawn into the conflict when the sadistic British Colonel 
Tavington (Jason Isaacs) destroys his home and his life. Martin decides to 
seek revenge by joining and eventually leading the local militia. His ambush 
tactics and countless victories cause the British to give him the nickname 
"The Ghost". As Benjamin and Gabriel continue to win victories, the British 
decide that more brutal tactics are in order. General Cornwallis (Tom 
Wilkinson), who is in charge of the South Carolina aspect of the war, 
employs Colonel Tavington to use whatever means are necessary to bring 
Martin in. This includes going after his family, being watched by his 
deceased wife's sister, Charlotte (Joely Richardson).
I must admit, "The Patriot" wasn't quite what I expected after seeing the 
movie's trailers. I think I expected a massive, three hour long epic like 
"Braveheart", but it was... well, something quite different. Actually, 
that's one of the biggest problems with this movie; "The Patriot" is never 
quite sure what kind of movie it's trying to be. It switches around amongst 
several possible genres without ever finding one that quite fits. At times 
the movie is a glorious war movie, then a movie showing the horrors of war, 
then a social commentary, a history lesson, a heart-warming family movie, a 
sappy romantic movie. The list goes on and on, but I'll stop here rather 
than driving what I'm trying to say through your head like a rail road 
spike. Despite this and a cliche ridden plot, "The Patriot" is still a 
decent and entertaining movie thanks to some great acting, costumes, 
scenery, and music. It also features some magnificent battle scenes, 
courtesy of Roland Emmerich's ("Independence Day") astute direction. When 
"The Patriot" stays on the battlefield, it's rousing and entertaining; when 
it tries to be more emotional, things go somewhat awry.
Mel Gibson gives an outstanding performance and leads a strong cast through 
an otherwise weak script. Gibson's acting is interesting; he appears wooden 
and emotionless at first but develops more and more emotion as the story 
goes on. Heath Ledger ("10 Things I Hate About You") delivers a promising, 
if somewhat inexperienced performance, as the brash and willful son. Off the 
battlefield, the film is at its best when dealing with the father-son 
relationship. Ledger and Gibson are backed up by a colorful supporting cast 
composed of good, reliable actors like: Rene Oborjonois (Star Trek: Deep 
Space Nine) as a Reverend turned warrior; the always great Chris Cooper; and 
Tcheky Karyo ("The Messenger") as a French soldier who offers his services 
to the revolution. The only weak link in the cast (but what a weak link it 
is) is newcomer Lisa Brenner as Gabriel's love interest, Anne. Not only does 
she give a terrible performance, but she delivers a key dramatic speech to a 
crowd of supporters, at one point, and does it so poorly I actually started 
laughing out loud. Last we have Jason Isaacs ("Armageddon", "Event Horizon") 
giving a great performance in a horrible part. Isaac's historically 
inaccurate character is about as chiched a villain as is possible. The man 
does everything but laugh maniacally and twirl his moustache (thankfully he 
doesn't have a moustache). Yet Isaacs is such a good performer and was 
obviously having such fun with the part, it really didn't matter.
There are a lot of things working for "The Patriot" and nearly as many 
working against it. On the for side we have some great performances, good 
direction, interesting battle scenes, and yet another wonderful score from 
John Williams (can the man do no wrong?). Against it we have a cliched 
script, one really bad performance, and a story that doesn't know where it's 
going. You'll have to weigh the pros and cons before deciding whether or not 
to see this. I felt the battle scenes tilted the pros in favor of a higher 
rating. Speaking of the battle scenes, one of the first ones we see is truly 
fascinating. It involves Benjamin Martin attacking a caravan, practically on 
his own, and defeating every soldier in it. This was a fascinating scene 
because the tactics used by the British were quite historically accurate 
(and obviously very poor since they were beaten by one man), and there was a 
realism to the scene that you don't often get in these kinds of movies. I'd 
best warn those of you who are faint of heart, "The Patriot" takes no 
prisoners and edits nothing out. We see all the horrors that come with war, 
including innocent men, women, and children being slaughtered by the enemy. 
A few of these scenes are absolutely heart wrenching (some people in the 
theater broke down crying). "The Patriot" runs a long 164 minutes, and as 
interesting as the movie may be, it feels that long. I'd recommend it to 
fans of Gibson since he turns in a stellar performance, and to anyone who 
enjoyed "Braveheart" since the similarities are obvious. History buffs (like 
me) will find certain segments painfully inaccurate (I'm pretty sure 18th 
century muskets weren't capable of that kind of accuracy, and George 
Washington played a slightly more significant role in the war), but should 
still have a good time catching historical references. I give the film three 
and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Remember the Titans (2000)
In the early '70s, a school in Alexandria, Virginia has just become 
integrated. That means an all black school and an all white school have 
combined and tempers are flying through the roof. Coach Boone (Denzel 
Washington) has been chosen to lead this new school's football team, 
replacing long-time and much loved Coach Yoast (Will Patton). Yoast will go 
on to become Boone's assistant coach and defensive coordinator, but that 
doesn't please him too much. Nevertheless, the two coaches decide to take 
all the prospective players out to training camp in preparation for the 
coming season. Obviously, the two races don't get along too well at first. 
Boone runs the camp like a drill sergeant, and forces players of different 
races to spend time together. The players don't react well at first, but 
slowly come together as the team's captain, Greg Bertier (Ryan Hurst), and 
his new friend Julius (Wood Harris) set an example. Camp ends, the players 
have all become friends, but can their friendship survive when they return 
to town and find nothing there has changed at all?
What is the most powerful force in a Hollywood movie? Love? Of course not, 
that's not a strong enough emotion for Hollywood. Hatred? A case could be 
made, but I don't think so. Possibly tragedy? Nope. No, the correct answer 
is schmaltz. Schmaltz so strong it tugs at the heartstrings of audiences 
everywhere and brings tears to the eyes of the most jaded film critics 
amongst us (well, except me, but I don't think I have tear ducts). You know 
the stuff I'm talking about. I'm talking about dramatic music pounding in 
your ears while statements about family and friendship are proudly brought 
to the screen. I'm talking about the sort of thing Producer Jerry 
Bruckheimer ("Con Air") is a master of. Make no mistake, "Remember the 
Titans" isn't a football movie (unfortunately), because we see very little 
actual football. It's not even yet another statement about racism 
(fortunately). It's a Jerry Bruckheimer movie, through and through. If you 
don't like having your emotions manipulated to the point where you're ready 
to cry rape, avoid the film. If, on the other hand, you're the kind of 
person who cried a river at "Armageddon", you probably don't need me to tell 
you that you should see this movie.
"Remember the Titans" does have one thing working strongly in its favor: the 
cast. Denzel Washington ("The Hurricane") leads the way, doing a great 
impersonation of George C. Scott impersonating General George S. Patton. 
Yes, Washington overdoes it at times, but during the film's rare quiet 
moments (a scene where he's reviewing plays with Yoast's daughter), he does 
an admirable job showing a man with two very different sides. Will Patton 
("Armageddon") has grown on me more and more with every film I've seen him 
in, and he continues this trend in "Remember the Titans". Patton underplays 
the role, which is a nice foil to Washington's occasional grandstanding. The 
other three stand-outs are nine year old Hayden Panettiere ("A Bug's Life") 
as Yoast's daughter; Wood Harris ("The Siege") as Julius; and the comical 
Ethan Suplee ("Road Trip") as Lastik, the only player who doesn't care one 
bit about race. Ryan Hurst ("Patch Adams") does an adequate job, but nothing 
special. The remaining cast members all do fine jobs, particularly 
considering the often painful dialogue they're given. One of my favorite 
lines was: "We aren't going to let anything, NOTHING, come between us! We're 
a team!" Ouch.
Only in a Jerry Bruckheimer movie could the problems of race relations be 
solved as easily as they are here. It turns out that all young people of 
different races need is to be yelled at by a drill sergeant, football coach, 
or whatever suitable authority figure might be handy. You think I'm joking, 
don't you? I wish I were, but the fact is, this is the sort of world 
Bruckheimer shows us in "Remember the Titans". I say Bruckheimer gives us 
these things, even those he's not the director. That's because Bruckheimer's 
legion of directors all direct in the exact same way (I've given up trying 
to tell them apart). Boaz Yakin (Ack, he wrote "The Punisher" back '89. 
How's that for a film credit?) is no exception, directing like all good 
Bruckheimer boys do. In other words, the film is frantically shot and 
chaotically choreographed, but it still manages to be quite dull. That's 
really all "Remember the Titans" is at its core: loud, frantic, predictable, 
and boring. Take the final game for example (oh come on, you knew in your 
heart it was all going to come down to a final game). It's loud, with 
players rushing about and yelling to the point where we can't understand 
anything; it's frantic, so much so in fact that I couldn't follow any of the 
action on the field; it's predictable because you know well in advance how 
it's going to end; and it's boring because we really see only a minute at 
the half, a minute in the locker room, and a minute at the end of the game. 
A game can't be interesting if we only see little bits and pieces of it.
So other than the acting, is there anything good about "Remember the 
Titans"? I suppose it depends on who you are. Being the cynical, hard-nosed 
critic I am, I don't get much enjoyment out of movies so predictable I've 
figured the ending out before the movie starts. If you like predictable, 
feel good movies you'll probably find more to like here than I did (that 
shouldn't be too hard). One last thing I want to note is the score, by 
composer Trevor Rabin ("Armageddon"). Rabin is a long time collaborator with 
Bruckheimer, and it's little surprise since the man is a master of dramatic 
music. Everything he composes swells to epic proportions at just the right 
moments. Take a scene where, uh, well every scene in the movie actually. 
Washington makes a dramatic speech (like his painfully bad one at 
Gettysburg); the camera pans slowly over the awed faces of his students; the 
camera flashes to the sun shining through dark clouds; the music swells high 
and our spirits are meant to soar. I, meanwhile, am rapidly jotting down 
notes about feelings of nausea sweeping over me. "Remember the Titans" runs 
far too long at 113 minutes. I'd recommend it to fans of cheesy, 
predictable, dramatic movies; or to any avid Bruckheimer devotees, and give 
it two and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis) is an ex-fighter pilot in the 23rd century who 
now flies a cab. His life takes a sudden turn when a beautiful young woman 
named Leeloo (Milla Jovovich) falls into his cab. Leeloo is a perfect 
entity, sent to Earth to fight the ultimate evil, which comes every five 
thousand years. Four groups are searching for Leeloo: Priest Vito Cornelius 
(the excellent Ian Holm), whose line has assisted in the fight against evil 
for centuries; Jean-Baptiste Emmanuel Zorg (the wonderful Gary Oldman) and 
his flunkies, who work for the ultimate evil; an evil warrior race known as 
the Mangalores, who were betrayed by Zorg; and the Earth government, led by 
the ever uncertain President Lindberg (Tom "Tiny" Lister Jr.) and his chief 
General, Munro (Brion James). Now Korben and Leeloo have to meet up with 
Cornelius, find four sacred stones needed to fight the evil, and get back to 
Earth in just a few days or all life in the universe will be destroyed. 
Along the way Korben will meet such peculiar characters as a cross-dressing 
radio host named Ruby Rhod (Chris Tucker), a galactic Diva named Plavalaguna 
(Maiwenn Le Besco), and a mugger (Mathieu Kassovitz) with a very interesting 
hat (don't ask, it has to be seen).
"The Fifth Element" is not a movie designed for all tastes. Viewers will 
most likely be divided into two groups: those who don't like their movies 
far-fetched and ridiculous, and those who love their movies to be comically 
bizarre (I fall into this category). The first group is going to loathe this 
movie because it represents all they detest in cinema. The plot (despite my 
rather confusing description) is child like in its simplicity. The 
characters are really nothing more than cartoon characters given human form; 
and all the movie's events are so ridiculous these people will no doubt be 
hitting the stop button after about thirty minutes. The other group is going 
to have an absolute blast. These people won't care about how ridiculous the 
movie is, so long as it entertains with fantastic visuals and off-the-wall 
humor. Is "The Fifth Element" entertaining? It is, quite possibly, the most 
flat-out entertaining movie I've seen this decade. It has no qualities one 
would associate with a great film, but if that's what you're looking for 
when you watch this movie you've obviously heard nothing about it. Rather 
than giving a deep, meaningful, Oscar worthy (you know, boring) picture, Luc 
Besson ("The Professional") instead chooses to give us a movie which 
promises to be just one thing - fun. "The Fifth Element" delivers on this 
promise in spades.
Dramatic acting is obviously not going to be of supreme importance in a 
movie like this, but comic acting is all important. Bruce Willis does quite 
a good job as the jaded Korben Dallas, dead-panning nearly everything but 
occasionally letting just a trace of amusement at his surroundings leak out 
(watch for his scene with the mugger; it's too funny for words). Milla 
Jovovich delivers a very amusing performance since she spends over half the 
movie speaking in gibberish. Word has it she actually made up her chattering 
language as she went along. Chris Tucker's ("Friday") performance is 
something of an acquired taste. When he first showed up on screen, I'll 
admit, I was rather shocked; but as the film went on, his character grew on 
me (maybe like fungus, but whatever works). The two actors who truly deliver 
outstanding comic performances are Gary Oldman ("Lost In Space") and Ian 
Holm ("Brazil"). Oldman hams it up like you've never seen as the 
multi-zillionaire Zorg. Zorg has a limp, a southern twang, a bizarre 
wardrobe, and an even stranger haircut. In the hands of anyone else, this 
character would have been a pathetic failure. Oldman actually manages to 
make Zorg likeable enough that a small part of you wants to see him get 
away, if not win. Ian Holm displays some of the best comic timing I've seen 
from an actor, well, anywhere. The way he delivers some of his lines is 
nothing short of perfection (one of my personal favorites was Ian Holm 
saying, "We're going to save the world my son." Korben responds with, 
"You're um, heh, gonna save the world?" Holm says, in an exasperated tone, 
"Yes!").
"The Fifth Element" is one of those marvelous movies which contains scenes 
that will stick with you for days, weeks, possibly even months afterwards. 
My favorite scenes were Leeloo's reconstruction in a futuristic (though very 
peculiar looking) laboratory; Korben's cab being chased by the police 
through the futuristic city; and the Diva's scene where she sings a 
beautiful (though very alien) opera while Leeloo fights a horde of 
Mangalores. Those first two I mentioned show Besson's visual imagination in 
two very different ways. The scene where Leeloo is being assembled is 
something quite extraordinary. It shows her skeleton being assembled 
quickly, piece by piece, then muscle and tissue being created over it, and 
finally skin being created. It's a remarkable scene in a remarkable movie. 
Korben's car chase gives us a chance to see most of Besson's futuristic 
city, and it's a sight to behold. The city is comprised of massive 
skyscrapers, surrounded by row after row of flying cars, going up as far as 
the eye can see. The scene with the Diva singing her opera while Leeloo 
beats up the Mangalores is exquisitely filmed (I must have re-watched that 
one scene five or six times). It combines Leeloo's martial arts style 
fighting with the singing flawlessly. Again, none of these scenes are going 
to win any major awards, but they're ever so much fun to watch.
Those who have seen Besson's work on "Nikita" and "The Messenger" know he is 
one of the more erratic directors in Hollywood. "Nikita" was a suspenseful 
tale which bordered on masterpiece, while "The Messenger" was quite the 
opposite. His work on "The Fifth Element" is far closer to that in "Nikita". 
One of Besson's trademarks is his frantic pacing throughout the film; this 
didn't work in "The Messenger", but it works perfectly in "The Fifth 
Element". The movie runs 126 minutes, which should have felt like an 
eternity, but with the combination of Besson's quick pacing and constant 
laughs, it feels more like 45 minutes (I'm not kidding). The soundtrack to 
"The Fifth Element", by composer Eric Serra ("Goldeneye"), is one of the 
film's strongest points. It's such a bizarre mix of different types of music 
(everything from something which sounded Jamaican during the car chase to 
beautiful instrumental music at the film's conclusion) that it could have 
sounded awful, but each song is somehow perfectly suited to its scene. I'd 
recommend the movie to anyone who likes their movies more than a little on 
the strange side and give it four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Get Carter (2000)
Directed by: Stephen T. Kay
Written by: Ted Lewis (novel), David McKenna
Jack Carter (Sylvester Stallone) beats people up for a living. Or, as he 
says, people make promises and break them; he refreshes their memories (I 
still don't get that. They broke the promise, they didn't forget it. Oh 
well). When his brother dies in a car accident, Jack goes back to his 
hometown to find out what happened to him. He meets his brother's daughter, 
Doreen (Rachael Leigh Cook), who obviously doesn't like Jack, but confides 
in him that she doesn't think her father's death was an accident. He 
proceeds to question his sister in-law, Gloria (Miranda Richardson); his 
brother's boss, Cliff (Michael Caine); Cyrus, an old acquaintance who now 
runs a porn shop (Mickey Rourke); and a rich computer geek named Jeremy 
Kinnear (Alan Cumming). None of them will give him straight answers, so Jack 
decides to beat the information he needs out of anyone he can find. He says 
he's going to fix things, but as Gloria points out, Jack doesn't fix things, 
he breaks things.
Ahh where to begin. Let me start by saying that there is really nothing good 
about "Get Carter". I mean nothing at all. I hunted and searched endlessly 
for a good thing here, pinching myself occasionally to stay awake. Alas, it 
was all for naught. It's never a good sign when the car chases bore you, the 
story loses you, the jokes hurt you, and the nicest thing you can say about 
the movie is, "boy, that's a nice looking golf course." That was a very nice 
looking golf course by the way. Wish I could play there. It was nestled away 
on a mountain, perfectly kept, surrounded by a deep forest of evergreen 
trees. Beautiful scenery. Sorry, I just don't want to talk about the stupid 
movie. Still, I can't procrastinate any longer, so here goes.
Try to imagine getting deposited right in the middle of a film that makes no 
sense at all. When I first walked in, I thought I'd somehow missed half the 
movie since the characters were all talking to each other like we were 
supposed to know what was going on. Here's an example of the dialogue 
between Sly and one of the Bobs from "Office Space". Bob: "I've covered your 
a** for long enough Jack." Sly: "What are you talking about?" (my sentiments 
exactly) Bob: "Well, you know, people are talking about you and Gertrude (or 
something like that, I just remember her name started with a "G")." Sly: "If 
people are talking it's because you gave them something to talk about." Now, 
bear in mind, this is at the very start of the film. We don't know who 
Gertrude is, who Bob (that's not the character's name, but that's what I 
kept mentally calling him) is, what Jack's job is, what in the world is 
going on. Already I was starting to not really care all that much. None of 
these questions are ever fully answered (especially not the last one), and I 
never did start caring what was going on. I tried my best though dang it, I 
tried to get into this story, but I couldn't. It was too... too... what's 
the word I'm looking for? Stupid! That's it.
As for the actors, first up we have the great Sly Stallone. Sly's career has 
been on the rocks lately, and he... uhh.. line? Sorry, Sly's career has been 
on the rocks, and he needed a boost to rev-reval-revitilz... line? Sly 
needed this movie to revitalize his diminishing career, after box-office 
failures such as... uhh.. line? Forget it, take five. Sorry about that 
folks, but Sly's acting in "Get Carter" really is that bad. The man looks 
completely lost during half his scenes, and I'm willing to wager they took 
several hundred takes before he got it right. During a few of the so-called 
"dramatic" moments, he has long pauses during his varied speeches, during 
which he gazes into the distance for dramatic effect. I'm sorry, but it 
looks like he forgot his lines and is looking desperately for cue cards 
somewhere. Miranda Richardson ("Sleepy Hollow"), is wasted in nearly every 
movie she appears in these days, that trend doesn't change with "Get 
Carter". The great Michael Caine ("The Cider House Rules") is completely 
wasted as the brother's friend and boss. I didn't think it was possible for 
Mickey Rourke ("The Rainmaker") to be considered wasted (I'm usually fairly 
happy when he has limited screen time), but it was pulled off here. Robin 
Leigh Cook ("She's All That") plays Robin Leigh Cook to the hilt, looking 
vaguely like a deer caught in the headlights of a semi; and the less said 
about Alan Cumming ("Titus") the better off we'll all be. Don't ask me to 
explain Bob's (John C. McGinley) presence, or the character's significance 
in the story, because I can't.
I don't get it. How does a movie this bad get made in this day and age? 
Don't the studios read the scripts before green-lighting a film? Guess not. 
I'd like to say that in the hands of a more capable director this could have 
been something, but that's not the case. Still, the direction (if you can 
call it that) from relative newcomer Stephan T. Kay doesn't help matters. To 
start with, I like a movie that throws me right into the middle of the plot; 
a movie that skips all that often pointless exposition of plot that will be 
revealed again later on. What I don't like is a movie that throws us into 
the middle of things and never explains itself, and "Get Carter" is just 
that kind of movie. Kay seems to consider himself something of an Oliver 
Stone fan, since he's fond of quick cuts all over the place, sudden shifts 
to slow motion, and anything else he can think of to "dazzle" the eye. Yet 
while Stone's technique is irritating, Kay's is excruciating. I didn't think 
it was possible to mangle a car chase to the point where you could no longer 
tell who was driving what, or who just smashed into whom, but Kay manages to 
do it. Or how about this? Sly walks up the stairs, putting on leather gloves 
and getting ready to crack some skulls. Rather than just filming Sly walking 
up the stairs, Kay films Sly walking up the stairs in quick little bursts. 
First he's at the bottom, then half-way up, then at the top. Why was it 
filmed like this? Possibly to make the film look more artistic (heh), but 
your guess is as good as mine.
Next up we have the dialogue, which is amusingly bad at its best, painful at 
its worst. Here are a few examples: "You've got as much chance as a one 
legged man in an a** kicking contest." Gee, clever Sly, never heard that one 
before. Sly approaches Alan Cumming on that neat looking golf course. Alan: 
"Who are you?" Sly: "Tiger Woods." Wow, that was clever too. Mickey Rourke, 
referring to his eyes: "Are they still pretty?" Sly: "Yeah, pretty like cat 
urine in the snow." Now that was REALLY clever. One of my "favorite" lines 
from Sly was "We're going to take this to the next level." He only says it 
twice, but it was old the first time. Hey Sly, how about taking your acting 
to the next level? Didn't think so. The film's score, from composer Tyler 
Bates is grating, obnoxious, and fairly useless. "Get Carter" runs an unholy 
115 minutes, which should have been cut down to.. uh.. well it just should 
have been cut. I'd recommend the movie to those who think Stallone was 
jilted when he didn't get an Oscar nomination for "Judge Dredd", and give 
the film a much deserved one out of five stars. One last note, I know I had 
a full plot summary up there, but here's the real plot: Jack asks question, 
person won't answer, Jack threatens then with cheesy catch phrase or twists 
a limb till they cry uncle, person answers. What's the final threat of the 
movie? Possible sequel is hinted at. Uncle! Uncle!
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
Directed by: William Friedkin
Written by: James Webb (story), Stephen Gaghan
"Rules of Engagement", the new film from William Friedkin (you remember, the
guy who directed "The Exorcist" way back when), is something of an enigma.
It's one of those films which is entirely predictable, not particularly well
written, and it's all stuff we've seen before. However, there is something
about it that holds your attention despite all of this. I suppose it could
be the two leads, Tommy Lee Jones and Samuel L. Jackson, two of the better
actors working in Hollywood today. It could also be that Friedkin somehow
manages to keep the action going throughout the entire film so that you're
never distracted by having seen all this before. Whatever the reason, "Rules
of Engagement" is one of those bizarre movies like "The 13th Warrior" which
has no discernible redeeming qualities, but I was incapable of disliking.
Colonel Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) is a decorated marine and Vietnam
veteran. His latest assignment is to fly into Yemen with a squad of marines
and rescue an ambassador (Ben Kingsley) and his family from protestors at
the American embassy. When the protestors turn violent and marines are
killed, Childers orders his men to open fire on the crowd, killing over 70
people. Now he faces a court martial and up to fifteen years in prison
unless he can prove that the crowd had weapons, and he was only returning
fire. His attorney is Colonel Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), a friend whose
life Childers saved in Vietnam. The prosecuting attorney is the slimy Major
Mark Biggs (Guy Pearce), who has been hired on by the even slimier William
Sokal (Bruce Greenwood), who wants everything pinned on Childers so the US
can save face.
As I said, this is hardly an original movie since obvious similarities to
1992's "A Few Good Men" exist. There are several things besides the lack of
originality which really hurt this film. One is the absence of a good score.
In fact, there is hardly any music at all in "Rules of Engagement". During
the courtroom and battle scenes, where the tension is palpable and the
audience is on the edge of their seats, a nice dramatic score would have
been welcome. Instead, we are given overwhelmingly loud sound effects of
explosions and gun shots which make it impossible to hear what is being
said. On the bright side, the battle scenes are very realistically filmed,
especially the opening scene of the skirmish in Vietnam involving Childers
and Hodges' unit and a VC squad.
The acting in "Rules of Engagement" is certainly the film's high point.
Samuel L. Jackson is the perfect choice for his role. A man consumed with
passion (Jackson is at his best when playing a character consumed by
passion) for his job and his country. Jones may be a bit miscast as an
alcoholic loser of a lawyer, but he turns in a great performance anyway. Ben
Kingsley ("Species", "What Planet Are You From?") is given nothing to do
other than look shifty eyed and stutter over his testimony in court. Guy
Pearce, who gave a brilliant performance in "LA Confidential", is horribly
miscast as the prosecuting attorney. There is something about Pearce's
performance that makes Major Biggs seem incredibly slimy (too much so in
fact) despite the fact that his introduction sets the character up as
something of a boy scout.
There are certain things about this film which make very little sense. For
example, Bruce Greenwood's ("Double Jeopardy") character is given a video
tape that would not only clear Childers of all charges, but would get the US
out of trouble as well. Instead of submitting the tape as evidence, he tells
his aid: "I don't want to think about it, I don't want to see it, I don't
want it to exist." Not only does it not make sense that he didn't want it to
exist, but it makes even less sense that he would tell a witness. The only
other thing that bothered me was the poor editing job performed here. Not
only are long, sometimes boring sequences not edited down to size, but we
are sometimes given quick camera cuts from person to person during the
courtroom scenes which make things very confusing. "Rules of Engagement"
runs a little too long at 127 minutes. I recommend it to fans of Tommy Lee
Jones and Samuel L Jackson since they are both given a chance to shine here.
I give the film two and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
Directed by: Joel Coen
Written by: Joel Coen, Ethan Coen, Homer (for "The Odyssey")
Ulysses Everett McGill (George Clooney) just broke free of a chain gang with 
two fellow prisoners, Pete (John Turturro) and Delmar (Tim Blake Nelson). 
They plan on heading back to Ulysses' home town to recover 1.2 million 
dollars in stolen money (that's 5 hundred thousand each! Delmar happily 
exclaims) that Ulysses has buried. Little do they know their journey will 
take them through hazards and wonders aplenty. Before their journey ends, 
the trio will have encountered George "Baby Face" Nelson (Michael Badalucco) 
in the midst of one of his crime sprees; three sirens by the river who will 
attempt to seduce our heroes and have a habit of changing some men into 
amphibians; a one-eyed bible salesman named Big Dan Teague (John Goodman); a 
massive Ku Klux Klan rally; a heated race for the Governership between the 
angry Pappy O'Daniel (Charles Durning), and the jovial reform party 
candidate, Homer Stokes (Wayne Duvall); and Ulysses' wife, Penny (Holly 
Hunter), who is getting re-married since Ulysses was conveniently hit by a 
train without his knowing about it. The group will also meet up with a 
guitar player named Tommy Johnson (Chris Thomas King) who sold his soul to 
the devil so he could play his guitar masterfully. Along with Tommy, the 
trio records a hit song under the assumed band name of "The Soggy Bottom 
Boys," but they're traveling so much they don't yet realize just what a hit 
it is.
"I never         met a Coen movie I didn't like," I told a friend of mine before 
heading out to see the brothers' latest flick. Even Barton Fink, with 
its plunge into utter nonsense at the half-way mark, kept me quite 
entertained. If you want to view that as a sign that I'm biased toward Coen 
movies and my opinion therefore counts for less than it normally would, go 
right ahead. If you're willing to accept my opinion, then let me sum it up 
this way: I loved this movie. Gee John, what a loquacious description. How 
long did it take you to think that one up? Well I'm sorry my friends, but 
unlike Ulysses Everett McGill and Big Dan Teague, I'm not blessed with the 
gift of gab. Besides, what did you expect me to do, sit here and ramble 
about the sheer beauty of every scene of this movie? Did you think I'd 
babble on and on about how I could watch this movie on mute just to gaze in 
awe at its sheer majesty, but then I'd miss the outstanding and highly 
amusing banter between the characters? That I'd talk about how the movie was 
funny, clever, good natured, and a great time all around? Well, if that's 
what you thought, you were obviously wrong. No, I think the words "I loved 
this movie" will do quite nicely on their own.
I've never fully understood why people like George Clooney so much. He 
always seemed afflicted by Nic Cage syndrome to me. In case you're 
wondering, that means he plays the exact same character with different 
names. This works at times, like it did in Out of Sight, but usually 
fails miserably, as exemplified in the horrendous The Perfect Storm 
and, even worse, in Batman and Robin. Imagine my surprise when I 
witnessed his truly hilarious, frankly Oscar worthy performance as the 
silver tongued Ulysses. I have to admit, this movie has given me a whole new 
appreciation for Clooney's acting talents. Of course, he's supported by a 
host of great actors. Long time Coen collaborator John Turturro is perfectly 
cast as the embittered Pete, while Tim Blake Nelson (The Thin Red 
Line) manages to turn the brainless Delmar into an endearingly naive and 
funny character. I tend to like John Goodman in everything, and though his 
appearance in O Brother is brief, it's quite funny and he's just the 
man for the role. Holly Hunter (The Piano) and Charles Durning 
(I.Q.) are given fairly small roles, but they makes their appearances 
memorable.
Who am I kidding? I feel a burning need to praise this movie up and down; 
but while I won't waste your valuable time doing that, I'll at least provide 
a touch more insight than "I love this movie." Reading the reviews before 
walking into the film, I had this sick feeling that I was about to witness 
the Coens' first failure. "It's dull!" The critics cried; "It's not funny!" 
"It makes fun of the south!" I must have seen a different movie. The one I 
saw may have been leisurely paced, but I was never bored, and I didn't look 
at my watch once. Not funny? Are you kidding me? Curious as to how they 
could feel that way, I went back and looked at a few of their reviews for 
The Big Lebowski (which I feel is the funniest movie of the '90s). 
Sure enough, they all hated that one too. My friends, if you enjoy the 
Coens' brand of quirky, subtle comedy, you'll find this movie to be a laugh 
riot. Otherwise, go watch Dumb and Dumber for the umpteenth time; I'm 
sure it hasn't lost any of its comic genius for you. As for the film making 
fun of the south, I'm not sure just what these critics were talking about. 
There's a little gentle prodding I suppose, but nothing remotely vicious. 
Even the scene involving a Ku Klux Klan rally is played for comedy (Klan 
members dance about in a very funny homage to The Wizard of Oz) 
rather than as an attack on the south for housing such groups. In fact, 
there's nothing remotely mean spirited about this movie. Damnit all you 
nay-sayers, I'm mad as hell, and I'm not gonna take this anymore.
It breaks my heart to say this, but I can't honestly recommend O Brother, 
Where Art Thou? to everyone. Like most Coen brothers movies, this one 
will only find its way into the hearts of a small group of people; typically 
those society describes as just a little... off. Why is that? Well, because 
it's come to my attention that American audiences tend to like their humor 
as in-your-face as possible (what else can explain the success of Scary 
Movie?), and the humor in O Brother, Where Art Thou? is as subtle 
as it can be. The second, and perhaps most important reason, is that the 
film is leisurely and pleasant. There's next to no action (aside from 
"Babyface" Nelson's bank robbery and car chase); and the film is filled will 
long sequences of the Coens' trademark wide, panning camera shots of the 
beautiful south. Sorry folks, but if that doesn't sound like your cup of 
tea, go catch Guy Ritchie's frantic film, Snatch, instead. It's 
probably best that I mention one more thing which could certainly be seen as 
a flaw. Animal lovers will probably be shocked and horrified at a few scenes 
like one where a toad gets squished, or one where a cow is plowed over 
during a high speed chase. If you're one of those people who can't handle 
the very idea of anything happening to an animal, this will probably disgust 
you. If you're like me, and you can realize it's not really happening to the 
animal, you should do just fine (if you're really sick, like me, you might 
even get a chuckle out of these scenes).
I'm pretty sure someone will shoot me if I don't mention the film's 
soundtrack, and that someone could very well be me. So, here's the 
soundtrack description for ya: it's old, it's southern, it's country, it's 
twangy, and it's brilliant. That's coming from a guy who doesn't normally 
like anything resembling country music. I bought the soundtrack the day 
after I saw the movie, and not just for the outstanding song by the Soggy 
Bottom Boys, "I am a Man of Constant Sorrow." Granted, that song will be 
stuck in your head for days, but the entire soundtrack is simply brilliant. 
>From the Sirens' song, to the beautiful and haunting "O Death", this 
soundtrack makes me wonder one thing: how did this sort of deep roots, 
lovely music give way to the moronic country and pop rock of today? O 
Brother, Where Art Thou? runs a leisurely, gentle 106 minutes, and I 
treasured every moment of it. I'd recommend the film to fans of George 
Clooney since he really shines this time around, and to fans of the Coen 
brothers who will probably appreciate the film's quirky humor. I give the 
movie a much deserved four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
Imagine watching the superbowl, it's a goal line stand with four seconds left
in the game. The tension is palpable as you clench and unclench your hands into
fists, waiting for the final play. Then, just as the play commences, you're
surrounded by blaring rap music and the screen suddenly cuts to a bunch of
people in the stands beating each other up. This seems to be the way Oliver
Stone pictures football. I'm sure some will call his filming ideas here moden
and innovative, but I think obnoxious is a more fitting adjective. Stone's idea
of direction seems to involve the camera never sitting still for more than two
seconds at a time, and never allowing people to speak without pounding music
accompanying them which drowns out all that they say. 
The Miami Sharks are having a terrible season. Led by head coach Tony D'Amato
(Al Pacino) and aging quarterback Cap Rooney (Dennis Quaid), they've lost their
past four games. The team's owner has just passed away and left things in the
hands of his money grubbing daughter, Christina Pagniacci (Cameron Diaz).
Chistina wants to permanently bench Cap after he is injured, and place third
stringer Willie Beaman (Jamie Foxx) at the head of the team. The problem is,
the team doesn't much respect Beaman despite his skills. Tony tries desperately
to bring the team back together as everything he has worked to build crumbles
around him.
After watching this film, something interesting occured to me. I haven't
enjoyed a single movie which LL cool J (playing the team's star running back
here) has appeared in, yet I've found his performance in each of his films to
be rather entertaining. The man is not without talent, but he doesn't seem
capable of selecting a good film to appear in. As for the rest of the cast,
they most likely would have performed well if it weren't for some of the worst
dialogue ever written. Then again, I'm only assuming that all the dialogue was
terrible. I couldn't hear half of it because the "music" was playing so loudly.
On those rare occasions when the film actually tries to deliver a message,
we're interrupted by a cutaway to clouds moving across the sky or something
similarly pointless.
I always try to point out the good qualities in every film I see, but I'm hard
pressed to do so here. Lawrence Taylor, the hall of famer shows up playing the
team's linebacker and actually turns in one of the film's better performances.
James Woods shows up in what amounts to little more than a cameo as the team
doctor, and Charleton Heston is seen briefly playing the commisioner. The final
game of the movie is vaguely interesting, despite being incredibly predictable.
That about does it for the good points here. The remainder of the film is
composed of pointless pop culture references, music videos and inane speeches.
"Any Given Sunday" runs insanely long at 162 minutes. Don't worry though, you
won't fall asleep because the music will constantly be pounding in your ears.
I'd recommend the film only if you're a die hard fan of either Oliver Stone or
Al Pacino, although Pacino appears rather embarassed to be in this movie. The
movie contains a rather amusing little twist at the very end, but it's shown
during the credits. Good luck staying through the rest of the film to catch it.
I give "Any Given Sunday" one and a half stars and a recommendation to stay
far, far away.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for What Planet Are You From? (2000)
Directed by: Mike Nichols
Written by: Garry Shandling (story), Michael Leeson
How do you think an alien would react if forced to experience the trials of
human dating  rituals? This is the main idea behind "What Planet are you
From?", the new comedy from director Mike Nichols ("Primary Colors", "The
Birdcage"). Garry Shandling ("The Larry Sanders Show"), who also developed
the film's story, plays the lead role. The truth is, I went into this movie
not expecting a whole lot out of Shandling. I've never cared for his
previous roles, and the previews looked somewhat bland. Much to my surprise,
"What Planet are you From?" turned out to be quite an enjoyable movie with
fairly consistent laughs throughout. This is mainly because not only does
Shandling do an admirable job, but he is surrounded by a great supporting
cast.
On a planet way the hell out there, a race of men is preparing to take over
the universe by sending minions to have sex with women from every other race
in the galaxy. Harold Anderson (Garry Shandling) has been chosen to
procreate with a female from Earth. His planet's leader (Ben Kingsley)
prepares him with the necessary training (in a very amusing opening scene)
and gives him two days to conceive a child. However, upon his arrival,
Anderson finds that his training has not prepared him for the illogical
behavior of humans. He immediately seeks help from a co-worker (Greg
Kinnear) and is soon introduced to a suitable mate named Susan (Annette
Bening). Anderson is faced with two problems now: First, Susan will only
mate with him after they are married, and second, his arrival on the planet
has aroused the suspicions of an airport employee (John Goodman) who soon
discovers who Anderson really is.
I think the funniest thing about Shandling's performance throughout "What
Planet are you From?" is that he reacts to everything thrown at him in such
a logical manner. For example, in one scene Susan is upset with Harold for
watching television rather than paying attention to her. She hurls the
remote against the wall, smashing it. Harold immediately decides to purchase
a new remote, which further infuriates Susan. She then shouts "Fine, just
go!" Harold promptly nods his head and leaves. Annette Bening is perfectly
cast as Susan, managing somehow to look hassled, angry, and deeply confused
all at once. She also manages to save Shandling at times when his lack of
experience in a leading role begins to show.
The supporting cast is, in fact, one of the best things about this film.
Greg Kinnear ("Mystery Men", "As Good as it Gets") is perfect as the king of
sleaze balls everywhere. Ben Kingsley ("Species", "Schindler's List") is a
great choice as the straight as an arrow ruler of Anderson's planet, though
he is a bit underused. John Goodman ("The Big Lebowski"), who I believe is
one of the best comic actors in Hollywood, is hilarious in his role as the
one man who thinks he knows the truth. One of the biggest problems I had
with the film was that Goodman was so underused that his character seemed
rather pointless. Linda Fiorentino ("Dogma") makes a brief appearance as
Kinnear's wife, and Janeane Garofolo shows up in a cameo as an airline
passenger.
The film may not make a whole lot of sense, since we are never told just how
Anderson's impregnating a woman will bring about the downfall of the
species, but plot isn't exactly the point here. While "What Planet are you
From?" manages to keep the humor going through the majority of its length,
things do get a bit too sappy and sentimental towards the end. If it had
been trimmend down some from its 112 minute running time I probably would
have given it four stars. One last thing I must note is that Annette Bening
plays a real-estate agent in the film ("American Beauty", anyone?). For a
very funny script, a surprisingly good turn by Garry Shandling, and a great
supporting cast, I give "What Planet are you From?" three and a half out of
five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Exorcist, The (1973)
Regan MacNeil (Linda Blair) isn't exactly your average twelve year old girl 
living in Georgetown. She does things like speak in tongues she's never 
learned, send objects flying around her room with her mind alone, and even 
makes her head twist around backwards. Her mother, Chris (Ellen Burstyn), 
has tried every doctor she can find, but they've been no help. After a 
psychiatrist tries hypnosis and is attacked by Regan, it is suggested she 
try more unorthodox methods. She gets in touch with Father Damien Karras 
(Jason Miller), a psychiatrist/priest at a local church. Father Karras is 
going through a spiritual crisis of his own, since his mother died just 
recently and he is questioning his faith. Nevertheless, he decides to visit 
Regan and determines she may, in fact, be possessed by a demon. The church 
decides to attempt an exorcism to remove the spirit, but that means calling 
in Father Merrin (Max von Sydow), the only man they know of who has 
performed one before. So Father Merrin travels to Georgetown, despite his 
health problems, and teams up with Father Karras to take on the demon in 
Regan.
While watching the "new and improved" version of William Peter Blatty's "The 
Exorcist", it occurred to me that I probably should have gone back and 
watched the original one more time. Afterall, I haven't seen the original 
for about six or seven years. So, I had to decide if I was going to review 
the film based on the changes, or simply review it as I would an original 
cut. Frankly, I still can't decide, so I'm going to try both. Even now, 
twenty seven years after its release, it's difficult to put your finger on 
just what it is that makes "The Exorcist" so eerie. Yes, I say eerie rather 
than scary. I know it scared audiences stiff back in '73, but "The Exorcist" 
has been downgraded from terrifying to really creepy over the years. Don't 
get me wrong, it's still an excellent film, it just can't compete with 
modern scares. So what makes the film so creepy? I know part of it is the 
way Friedkin sets up shots, but I think what really gets to us is the 
script, and specifically how well the characters are drawn. These characters 
seem like real people, with real problems, and as a result it hits close to 
home when things happen to them.
A lot of what makes the film's characters so real is that the actors 
portraying them are quite gifted. First up we have Jason Miller ("Rudy"), 
who almost underacts as Father Karras. I was sorry to see that Miller 
decided to go on to a career in writing rather than acting, because he 
brings a real humanity and depth to his character. On the other hand, we 
have Ellen Burstyn ("Alice Doesn't Live Here Anymore"), who overacts with 
abandon. If I had any faith in the Academy awards, I'd have been shocked by 
the fact that she received a nomination for her part in this film. Next up 
is Linda Blair (who has gone on to do nothing of import), who does an 
admirable job for being so young. Frankly, I'm a little shocked that her 
parents allowed her to appear in this movie. I can't help but think some of 
her actions here are what influenced her to go into the exploitation films 
later in her career ("Red Heat", anyone?). Lee J. Cobb ("How the West was 
Won") is excellent, if sadly underused, as the likeable Lt. Kinderman, who 
investigates a murder Regan may have committed. Finally we have Max von 
Sydow ("Needful Things") himself. I hate to use '90s jargon, but I simply 
have to utilize this term in regards to Sydow: he is the man. From an early 
scene where he squares off against a satanic statue on a hill, to a scene 
where Regan throws up on his face while he keeps reading from his bible, you 
know this is the guy you want to call to fight the forces of evil.
I said I was going to point out the few changes I actually noticed, so here 
goes. First, the infamous "spider walk" has been integrated into the film. I 
know peoples' opinions of this scene vary drastically, but I belong to that 
camp which finds the scene impossibly creepy. That one, brief scene alone 
gave me nightmares back when I first saw it, and I still can't handle seeing 
it now. Don't ask me to explain why I react that way, because I can't. 
Second, the film's ending has been altered slightly, and this was a bad 
idea. In the original version, Ellen hands Father Dyer (Reverend William 
O'Malley) the medallion dropped by Father Karras. Father Dyer walks to the 
house with it, stares down at those menacing concrete stairs, and the 
picture fades. In the new version the above events occur, but Father Dyer 
gives it back. No, wait, it doesn't stop there. He then meets up with 
Lieutenant Kinderman and the two talk about going to lunch and a movie. They 
wander off together and the film ends. Why these changes? I haven't the 
foggiest, but it ends the film on entirely the wrong note. The only other 
change I noticed was a minor one, but I'll note it anyway. In the middle of 
the exorcism, Father Karras and Father Merrin sit at the top of the stairs 
and have a philosophical discussion. It's an interesting discussion, but I 
don't think it was a necessary addition. It detracts from the action that 
takes place before and after.
I've often heard that the only people who will find "The Exorcist" scary are 
those who have deep religious beliefs. I don't think that's quite true. I 
don't have any deep religious beliefs (I'm a deist), but when I first saw 
the film it scared me silly. I've decided that a lot of the film's scares 
come from two elements: the set design, and the soundtrack. I didn't think 
it was possible for a simple concrete staircase to look eerie, but Friedkin 
pulls it off. A lot of his success is due to keeping the film's lighting low 
and giving each set a claustrophobic feel. As for the music, well, the music 
is everything. Jack Nitzsche's original score is brilliant, but I'd never 
want to buy the soundtrack since I'd never be able to sleep at night. I 
didn't think it was possible for "Tubular Bells" to inspire such feelings of 
dread. Are there flaws to "The Exorcist"? Of course, but they're negligible. 
The most prominent is the amount of time spent on the film's setup. It takes 
about an hour to get to the really spooky stuff. There is one scene I want 
to point out, one which makes me laugh like a madman whenever I see it. 
Regan is floating above the bed, the two priests are throwing holy water at 
her and shouting "The power of Christ commands you." They yell it over, and 
over, and over again. I didn't count the number of times but it must have 
been at least fifteen. I just want to reach in, shake Father Merrin, and 
shout "We get the point!" Oh well. The original version of "The Exorcist" 
runs a full 122 minutes. The new version runs a long 131. I'd recommend the 
film to those who want to see how to make a classic horror film and give it 
four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
Serial killer Carl Stargher (Vincent D'Onofrio) is murdering young women by 
placing them in a sealed glass room for forty hours and then flooding the 
room till they drown. FBI agent Peter Novak (Vince Vaughn) has finally 
tracked the killer down, but Stargher has fallen into a coma from which he 
will never awaken. This wouldn't be a problem except for the fact that he 
kidnapped one last girl who is in that very room, and she's running out of 
time. Novak has no idea where the room is, so he employs the services of Dr. 
Catherine Deane (Jennifer Lopez), a child psychologist, who can use a 
technology to enter peoples' minds. It seems Catherine is able to make her 
patients trust her better than any psychologist who has tried the machine 
before. Novak hopes Stargher will trust her and tell her the location. She 
agrees to enter Stargher's mind, but she's never experienced anything like 
Stargher's mind before. Soon she's lost in the disturbing world of 
Stargher's sub-conscious, unable to tell she's no longer in the real world. 
So Novak decides to go in and fetch her, but Stargher's mind is ready for 
him.
Stephen King once said, regarding Stanley Kubrick's adaption of "The 
Shining", "I think you want to hurt people with this movie." I disagree with 
his assessment of Kubrick's horror masterpiece (In my humble opinion 
anyway), but I think his words can be accurately applied to Tarsem Singh's 
travesty, "The Cell". There's nothing remotely likeable about this film. The 
only thing I could think of that I somewhat enjoyed were a few special 
effects sequences. Other than that, I was experiencing only three different 
emotions: bored, confused, and outraged. It's also the only movie this year 
that I've almost walked out of. Is it worse than "Battlefield Earth"? Of 
course not, but at least that piece of tripe was so bad I could laugh at it. 
"The Cell" is one of the most pretentious, stuck up movies I've ever seen 
(it even beat out "Magnolia"), completely convinced of how important its 
message is. It's one thing for a movie to feature a controversial message, 
it's quite another for the writers to cram that message down your throat. 
Singh and Protosevich do just that in "The Cell", and I hope never to see 
another film from either of them.
So how does the acting fare in this horrendous movie? Well, you've got 
Vincent D'Onofrio ("13th Floor") playing a serial killer; something he seems 
to enjoy very much, but he sleepwalks his way through the role. I heard him 
in a recent interview discussing the types of roles he now takes, and he 
stated "I take only the roles which interest me." If that's the case, and 
this role interested him, I think Mr. D'Onofrio might be in need of serious 
medical attention. Jennifer Lopez (who was wonderful in last year's "Out of 
Sight") seems to be convinced, throughout the film, that speaking softly all 
the time is the same thing as acting concerned. The only problem is I 
couldn't hear half the "concerned" things she was saying. Vince Vaughn 
("Swingers", the horrible "Psycho" remake) isn't given much of a chance to 
act since his character is so underdeveloped. Protosevich's idea of 
developing the character seems to be for him to say that he doesn't agree 
with killers blaming their crimes on their childhood. When Lopez's character 
argues with him about this however, he doesn't really fight back. Watch for 
a cameo by James Gammon ("Major League") as a local police officer.
In that first paragraph I mentioned a message being crammed down our 
throats, and that message is basically all there is to "The Cell". Singh 
tries to hide it behind bizarre visuals and overly dramatic dialogue, but 
all I noticed was the message being shoved in my face. What was this message 
that I refer to with such bitterness? Simply, that inside every psychopathic 
serial killer there's a scared little person trying to get out. What a 
serial killer does is really just a cry for help so people will listen to 
him, since his parents were abusive when he was a child. I figure there will 
be three different groups of people seeing this movie: first will be the 
group to which I belong - outraged that this message was being thrown at us; 
second is the group that agrees with the message and thinks it's wonderful 
that it's being shown in a movie; and last is the luckiest group, those who 
either don't notice or don't care about the message and just sit there 
dazzled by the pretty colors on screen. If you're in the first group, I urge 
you to stay away from this movie. If you're in the second group, I adamantly 
disagree with you. If you're in the third group, I envy you.
Obviously, one of the biggest draws of "The Cell" is the shocking visuals, 
and I'll admit, they look nice in about a scene and a half. Other than that, 
they generally resemble poor attempts to imitate Clive Barker. It's as 
though the film makers were thinking "let's see what bizarre/disgusting 
image we can hurl at them next", without using images that went along with 
the story. Tarsem Singh's filming style involves giving all the dream 
sequences a washed out look for no other reason than to distinguish between 
dreams and real life (as though the floating people and pools of blood 
weren't tipping us off). It also involves making everything from the 
dialogue (except Jennifer Lopez's) to the music (an obnoxious score by 
Howard Shore) to the sound effects gratingly loud and in-your-face. Tarsem 
Singh is a first time director, and I can only hope he'll never be handed 
another project. "The Cell" runs a long 105 minutes. I'd recommend it only 
to psychology majors who want to either argue or agree with the film's 
message and to aspiring directors so they can see how not to present strange 
visuals. I give the movie one and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
In a review of "The House on Haunted Hill", I stated that Hollywood was slowly
growing devoid of original ideas. I stand corrected. "Being John Malkovich" has
been called the most original movie of the year by some, but I disagree. It is
the most original movie of the decade. If it had only been trimmed down some
from its 112 minute running time, I would have happily granted it a full five
star rating.
Craig Schwartz (John Cusack) is master of his profession, but it's not a
profession appreciated by the general public. Craig, is a puppeteer. His wife,
Lotte (an almost unrecognizable Cameron Diaz), is a pet store owner who is
supportive of Craig, but feels he should try something new until his career as
a puppeteer takes off. So Craig aquires a job as a filing clerk on the 7 1/2
floor of a downtown office building. Here he meets Maxine (Catherine Keener), a
woman he is immediately smitten with. Maxine has no interest in Craig, but when
Craig discovers a tiny door behind a filing cabinet which leads into John
Malkovich's brain, Maxine partners with him to create a business where one can
buy a ticket for 200 dollars to be John Malkovich for fifteen minutes.
Due to the unusual plot at work here, my summary cannot possibly do the film
justice. Suffice to say that nothing like this has been made since Lewis
Carroll's "Alice in Wonderland" was turned into a film. In fact, I think
Charlie Kaufman owes quite a debt to Lewis Carroll, and was disappointed at not
seeing his name in the credits as a "special thanks to" mention. Still, I
personally believe that this film deserves a special oscar from the academy
come award time.
The script, which is clearly the high point here, is backed up by such
fantastic performances from the cast that I would be shocked if there were not
at least one oscar nomination amongst them. John Cusack is perfect as the
constantly haggard looking Craig, and Cameron Diaz is hysterical as a woman who
so loves her pet store that she brings all the pets home with her (the
apartment in which they live is filled with iguanas and chimps). However, the
real standout performance here comes from John Malkovich, playing an
exaggerated version of himself. How the man was convinced to play such a
self-effacing role is beyond me.
One last point which deserves mention, is the very brief, but fantastic
appearance by Charlie Sheen as Malkovich's best friend. If there is one man in
Hollywood who really needs a jump-start to his career, it's Sheen, and this
might just do it. His hair, by the way, at the end of the film, has to be seen
to be believed. Also watch for Brad Pitt's quick appearance, which involves him
doing nothing but making an amusing facial expression. As stated, "Being John
Malkovich" runs a little too long, but don't let this stop you from seeing the
most original movie in ages. I give it a well earned four and a half stars, and
a full recommendation.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Clue (1985)
It's the 1950's, the height of McCarthyism, and six strangers have been 
invited to a mansion in middle of nowhere, New England. The strangers are 
Colonel Mustard (Martin Mull), whose mother's health is questionable and who 
drives an expensive car for a man on a Colonel's pay; Mrs. White (Madeline 
Kahn), who has had many husbands, both her's and other womens'; Professor 
Plum (Christopher Lloyd), who works with the paranoid delusional folks at 
the UN; Mrs. Peacock (Eileen Brennan), who does her senator husband's dirty 
work; The timid, accident prone Mr. Green (Michael McKean); and Mis Scarlett 
(Lesley Ann Warren), who has helped men find the company of a young lady for 
a short while. These six strangers all have one thing in common, they're all 
being blackmailed. They have been invited to the mansion by Wadsworth (Tim 
Curry), the butler, to meet Mr. Boddy (Lee Ving), who knows something about 
each of them that they don't want made public. The plan is to confront Mr. 
Boddy and make him stop blackmailing them. Unfortunately, things don't go 
quite as planned, and Mr. Boddy is soon dead. With only the six guests, 
Wadsworth, and the maid, Yvette (Colleen Camp) in the house, they now have 
to determine who killed Mr. Boddy, where, and with what.
I have to admit, I'm a big fan of the "Clue" board game from Parker 
Brothers. It's probably because I love mysteries, and "Clue" is the closest 
I can get to solving one in real life without getting shot at. So, I'll get 
this out of the way right now. As a mystery film, director Jonathan Lynn's 
("The Whole Nine Yards") "Clue" fails miserably. I'll let your gasps of 
disbelief subside. Okay, how can a movie called "Clue" fail as a mystery? 
Because the writers thought up an interesting little idea where there are 
three endings. Since there are three different endings, and thus different 
killers, there is no way to guess who the killer is. Afterall, if you guess 
it right in one ending you're wrong in the other two. So if "Clue" fails as 
a mystery, why did I give it a four star rating? Because it succeeds on 
every level as a comedy. All the various types of comedy are used in the 
movie (except that irritating romantic kind) to full effect. We get a 
healthy dose of slapstick, with people running into each other and various 
objects. We also get some great banter, particularly in a scene where 
Colonel Mustard is grilling Wadsworth about who is in the house. We even get 
some satire in a scene which takes a jab at Agatha Christie's "Murder on the 
Orient Express".
Obviously a film like this is going to be entirely dependent on two factors: 
the script, and the actors. I'll get into the script in a minute, so let's 
cover the actors. Tim Curry ("Legend") leads the cast with a manic, 
over-the-top performance like you've never seen (unless you're a fan of John 
Lithgow). The performance is, in fact, so manic that Curry is sweating and 
out of breath during a few scenes. Sounds like a painful thing to watch, 
right? Strangely enough, it's not at all. His manic performance fits the 
part so well, you can't picture Wadsworth being played in any other way. The 
other cast members display great comic abilities, but two stick out in my 
mind as turning in really memorable performances. Martin Mull ("Mrs. 
Doubtfire"), playing the dim-witted Colonel Mustard, has some of the best 
comic timing I've ever seen. He even manages to pull some humor out of an 
otherwise stupid scene where Miss Scarlett says, "Search me" and he proceeds 
to frisk her. The other stand out is, obviously, the late, great Madeline 
Kahn ("Blazing Saddles"). This great woman could make anything funny, and 
when she gets truly funny dialogue she's a riot. My favorite scene with her 
is one where Colonel Mustard says, "There is only one admitted killer here 
and it is not me, it is her!" Madeline backs away, panic in her eyes, and 
says, "I've admitted nothing."
The biggest point in this movie's favor is certainly the hysterical script 
from Lynn and John Landis ("The Blues Brothers"). I'd say no more than three 
minutes go by at a time before we get hit between the eyes by another 
uproarious joke. Some of my favorites are Wadsworth re-creating the crime 
using Mr. Green as a prop; Mrs. Peacock expressing her fear that the brandy 
is poisoned; and the revelation of what each person is being blackmailed 
for. This is also the kind of movie you'll find yourself quoting for weeks, 
months, even years after you've seen it. For example, whenever anyone says 
"To make a long story short," I still say "Too late." What really makes the 
comedy work is that Lynn and Landis never re-use jokes till we're tired of 
them. Even the funniest lines and scenes are only used twice at the most. 
These are guys who know how to avoid wearing out their welcome. The other 
way the avoid wearing out their welcome is by changing the types of jokes. 
You'll seldom get several slapstick jokes in a row, you're more likely to 
get a couple slapstick jokes, a scene of great banter, a snappy one liner or 
two, and then maybe some really dark humor (watch for the singing telegram 
girl for a great example of that). I wish modern comic writers would try 
this approach rather than throwing ten gross-out jokes at us in a row.
The primary reason I've decided to go back and review a movie like "Clue" is 
because I recently got it on DVD. The disc's special features may be rather 
limited, but it does contain the theatrical trailer. Why do I point this 
out? Because for some reason there are a few scenes on the trailer not 
contained in the film. Normally these sorts of cuts make perfect sense since 
they aren't funny, but these scenes were really quite good. For example, Mr. 
Green is screaming and Colonel Mustard slaps him across the face. Colonel 
Mustard: "Why are you screaming?!" Mr. Green: "Because I'm frightened!" 
Colonel Mustard: "Of what?" Mr. Green: "Screaming!" Trust me, it sounds much 
funnier when Michael McKean says it. Clue's soundtrack is a pleasant 
combination of old, fifties songs ("Shake, Rattle, and Roll" for example) 
and a lively little musical number composed by John Morris ("Dirty 
Dancing"). "Clue" runs a nice, quick 97 minutes, and I actually wouldn't 
have minded it being a touch longer. I'd recommend the movie to those who 
enjoy eighties style comedies, and to fans of both Tim Curry and Madeline 
Kahn since both really shine here and give it four out of five stars. If you 
enjoy "Clue", I'd also recommend going back and checking out Neil Simon's 
"Murder by Death" from 1976.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad? or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
Directed by: Eric Leighton, Ralph Zondag
Written by: Thom Enriquez, Walon Green
Aladar (D.B. Sweeney) is a dinosaur with none of his own kind to be
with. As an egg, Aladar was carried away to an island dominated
entirely by monkeys.  While there, the lead monkey, Yar (Ossie Davis),
takes Aladar into his home as a son after some coaxing from his wife,
Plio (Alfre Woodard).Years later, Aladar is grown up and wishes he
could be with one of his own species.  However, before he has a chance
to think too much about how lonely he is, meteorites hit the
planet. Aladar, Yar, Plio, and Plio's children, Zini (Max Casella) and
Suri (Hayden Panettiere), are forced away from their home.  The five
soon come across a herd of other dinosaurs who are heading across the
vast deserts for the fabled nesting ground; the one remaining spot on
the planet which still has water and life. The herd is led by the
arrogant Kron (Samuel E. Wright) and his sister, Neera (Julianna
Margulies). A rivalry soon grows between Aladar and Kron. They aren't
given much time to feud however, because two cartosaurs (t-rex's) are
on their tails.
"Dinosaur" is the kind of movie which is going to have two age groups
gaping at the screen in awe. Kids are going to be thrilled by the
chance to see dinosaurs brought to life like they haven't been able to
see before (granted, I'm assuming their parents haven't allowed them
to see "Jurassic Park"). Anyone over the age of forty or so is going
to be shocked by how far animation has come, since "Dinosaur" is (in
some ways) even more impressive than "Toy Story". The problem is that
anyone between those two age groups will be used to seeing effects
this impressive, and there isn't enough of a story to "Dinosaur" to
hold their attention. Much of the movie consists of watching dinosaurs
walk, and walk, and walk over a whole lot of desert.  In the beginning
of the film, when we were able to see all sorts of different dinosaurs
in interesting looking jungles, this was enough to keep our
attention. Watching the same herd of dinosaurs walk over a lot of sand
for forty five minutes just doesn't work.
The voices in "Dinosaur" are a mixed blessing. Joan Plowright (1996's
"101 Dalmations") and Della Reese (television's "Touched by an Angel")
give some wonderful personality to two elderly dinosaurs, who befriend
Aladar and his family. Ossie Davis ("Grumpy Old Men") does a nice job
providing the elderly Yar with a subtle, comic touch. Samuel Wright
("The Little Mermaid") is a perfect choice for the stubborn, haughty
Kron. The weak links are, unfortunately, the lead
voices. D.B. Sweeney, who usually gives great performances in shows
like Fox's short lived "Strange Luck", is a rather poor choice for
Aladar. Sweeney simply sounds too experienced and, frankly, too old to
be playing a naive young "man" going out into the real world for the
first time. Julianna Margulies ("The Newton Boys") sounds strangely
cold and detached as Aladar's perspective girlfriend. Scenes where she
is forced to intervene between her brother and Aladar there is almost
no emotion in her voice. She sounds as though she's reading directly
from a que-card.  Alfre Woodard ("Love and Basketball") nicely
underplays her role as Yar's sometimes submissive, sometimes tricky
mate.
Let's face it, the main reason everyone is going to see "Dinosaur" is
for the insanely expensive computer animation. In fact, this is the
most expensive animated film ever created by Disney. The effects may
have cost a fortune, but they certainly are impressive. Every dinosaur
is detailed right down to the last scale and the intricacies of their
eye movements. The landscapes look shockingly real at times, and the
oceans reflect images perfectly. The animation makes up for what is
lacking in the rest of the script, but not by much. The story is even
more predictable than your usual Disney film, but the usual Disney
humor is sadly absent throughout most of the film. In movies like "Toy
Story", Disney writers did a great job combining juvenile humor and
jokes adults would find amusing. The humor in "Dinosaur" is so cheesy
and childish that adults will only be rolling their eyes while their
kids squeal in delight. The only exception is a little spiked
dinosaur, named Earl, who doesn't say a word but runs around like a
typical family dog. I hate to admit it, but I couldn't help but laugh
at his antics. I'd recommend "Dinosaur" to anyone who loves computer
animation and certainly to every kid who ever had a thing for the
giant lizards (I know, I know, they're warm blooded yadda yadda). The
movie runs a nice, fast 84 minutes, and I give it three and a half out
of five stars.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to:
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at either: http://www.dependentfilms.net or
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
Directed by: Michael Apted
Written by: Neal Purvis (story), Robert Wade
Well my friends, it's official, James Bond is obsolete. The once suave secret
agent has become little more than another goofy action hero. His gadgets are no
longer impressive, his banter is childish, and his once interesting adversaries
have been reduced to petty thugs. "The World is not Enough" should be a sad
conclusion to what is possibly the greatest spy series of all time, but we all
know that it won't end here. Bond won't be allowed to leave on this sad note.
He'll suffer through four or five more films before exiting on an even sadder
note. The Bond franchise is dead, and it should be buried, but like everything
in Hollywood ("Star Trek", every horror series ever made) it will continue to
be milked till reduced to a dried out husk of a film. Such is the way of things
(sorry, I'm feeling strangely philosophical).
Bond (Pierce Brosnan) is back, and this time he's protecting oil tycoon,
Elektra King (Sophie Marceau), from a villain named Renard (Robert Carlyle).
Bond seeks the aid of Valentin Zukovsky (Robbie Coltrane), an ex-KGB agent who
is now a Casino owner, in finding out just what Renard is planning. Bond's
search soon leads him to a plot involving nuclear weapons and a young,
beautiful scientist named Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards). Renard strikes
first, kidnapping Bond's boss, M (Judi Dench), and setting a bomb off at MI6
headquarters. However, just when Bond thinks he has things figured out, it
turns out that nothing is what it seems.
Remember Bond's once witty exchanges with both his enemies and companions?
Well, this is what they have now been reduced to:  says "I need to get that
back or someone's going to have my butt." Bond's response? "First things
first." Very clever Mr. Bond, for a teenager perhaps. While we listen to these
juvenile comments, we're treated to some of Q's (Desmond Llewelyn) famous
gadgets. As everyone knows, Q's gadgets have only one use, yet Bond always ends
up in a situation which requires them. However, they're really pushing it when
they find a use for one of the devices here. It would appear that Q has gotten
a bit too old for this business, and they have brought in a replacement named R
(John Cleese). I personally believe that bringing John Cleese in was a
brilliant idea. Cleese is a great comic actor, and should provide some much
needed comic relief now that Bond has lost all of his wit.
As for the Bond girls, Sophie Marceau ("Braveheart", "A Midsummer Night's
Dream") is adequate I suppose, but Denise Richards (while certainly nice to
look at) couldn't act to save her life. In addition to her lack of talent, she
has films such as "Starship Troopers" and "Wild Things" under her belt, which
immediately destroy any chance of her being taken seriously. The reappearance
of Robbie Coltrane ("Message in a Bottle", "Goldeneye") is certainly welcome,
but something was done with his character that was completely uneccesary, but I
suppose I can't complain about that one instance too much, as the entire film
was rather unecessary. The largest disappointment here is the character of
Renard. The previews for the film constantly bring up the fact that he is
incapable of feeling pain, and he can drive himself harder and faster than any
other man. Nothing whatsoever is done with this talent of his. Renard is
nothing more than a petty little thug, who appears to feel pain just as easily
as anyone else but can't push himself nearly as hard as Bond can.
So the question, is how can the Bond franchise be rejuvenated? I'm not entirely
sure that it can. Bond's anitcs simply seem out of place in this day and age.
People want explosions, gunfire, and lots of action. While Bond may contain
these elements, they are not in sufficient quantity to satisfy most people. The
problem is that rather than ending the series, the geniuses and MGM have
decided to change Bond's image in a manner that is not welcome. "The World is
not Enough" would already have been a bad film, but it appears even worse when
compared to previous films in the franchise. The movie runs far too long at 127
minutes. Unless you're desperate for a new James Bond film, I'd recommend
steering clear of this one. Even if you are desperate, I'd suggest waiting for
video. I give it two out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)
Directed by: Keenen Ivory Wayans
Written by: Shawn Wayans, Marlon Wayans, Aaron Seltzer, Phil Beauman, Buddy 
Johnson, Jason Friedberg
I'm going to keep the plot summary fairly short, because "Scary Movie" is 
really nothing more than a mix of different slasher films rolled into one. 
Cindy Campbell (Anna Faris) is your typical high school student. Her 
problems include: dealing with school; her overly amorous boyfriend, Bobby 
(Jon Abrahams); a pushy reporter (Cheri Oteri); a psychotic, though inept, 
serial killer stalking the student body; and the fact that she and her 
friends, Buffy, Brenda, Ray, and Greg (Shannon Elizabeth, Regina Hall, Shawn 
Wayans, and Lochlyn Munroe respectively), ran over a fisherman and dumped 
his body in the ocean. They've all managed quite well to move on with their 
lives after killing that fisherman, but problems are developing. Now the 
serial killer is after the group, and they can't help but think it may be - 
oh forget it - if you've seen "I Know What You Did Last Summer" and/or 
"Scream", you know the rest. Those two current teen-slasher films are the 
main targets of "Scary Movie".
Someone at the MPAA should be fired (preferably everyone) for allowing this 
movie to hit theaters with an "R" rating. Children shouldn't have been 
allowed to view this film, and I saw several in the audience. The movie 
features such colorful scenes as a girl being plastered to the ceiling by 
her boyfriend's, um, release while the two are having sex; or a character 
being killed by a male's, uh, organ being shoved through his head. However, 
none of that really matters, because "Scary Movie" is intended for adults. 
So how does it succeed on that level you ask? The results are varied. When 
it's spoofing other movies, "Scary Movie" can be fairly amusing. When it 
starts hurling gross-out jokes at the audience, it falls flat on its face.
So what films fall victim to this most recent spoof's attacks? Obviously, "I 
Know What You Did Last Summer" and "Scream" are the primary targets, but 
"Final Destination", "The Usual Suspects", "The Blair Witch Project", "The 
Matrix", and a dozen or so others take a beating as well. How well these 
jabs work seems to depend on the film being spoofed. "The Blair Witch 
Project" is hit fairly well, with Cheri Oteri talking into the camera ala 
Heather Donahue's now famous moment. The small jab at "The Usual Suspects" 
doesn't work half as well because it doesn't fit in with the rest of the 
film. "The Matrix" takes an interesting hit; while it works brilliantly at 
first, the scene drops dead when Anna Faris starts doing an Irish jig in 
mid-air, for no apparent reason.
This is the part of the review I usually devote to an analysis of the acting 
in a film. However, that's a touch more difficult with a movie like this 
because it's difficult to tell if the actors are intentionally acting badly, 
to add to the satire, or if they simply cannot act. So I've decided to rate 
the actors based on their comic abilities and timing. Marlon and Shawn 
Wayans (best known for starring in the WB's horrendous "The Wayans 
Brothers") give two very different, though equally irritating performances. 
Marlon (in the role of Randy, made famous by Jamie Kennedy from "Scream") 
overacts to the extreme, while Shawn (as the gay boyfriend - that's funny 
right?) underacts to the point where we believe he's dead long before the 
character actually bites the dust. Newcomer Anna Faris gives an interesting 
turn, switching from a horrible performance to a great impersonation of 
Jennifer Love Hewitt in a split second. The film's best performance comes 
from Shannon Elizabeth ("American Beauty") as the school's resident phony. 
Watch for the scene where she confronts the masked killer for one of the 
movie's best moments. Kurt Fuller ("Wayne's World") shows up in an amusing 
performance as the town sheriff, and watch for a cameo by David Lander 
("Laverne and Shirley") as the school principle.
The only times "Scary Movie" really works well is when the jokes are clever 
observations about the faults in horror films. The movie fails when these 
observations are about as idiotic as possible, and this happens fairly 
often. The joke about David Arquette's character from "Scream", Deputy 
Dewey, is one of these moronic jokes. Gee, we'll make his character 
handicapped in this one and have him drool - that's funny too, right? The 
quick jab at "Final Destination" is more unexpected than funny, but that's 
more than we get out of most the film's jokes. "Scary Movie" runs a quick 88 
minutes, but it feels a bit longer than that. I'd recommend it only to those 
who are big fans of the Wayans brothers (assuming there are any out there) 
and fans of gross-out humor. I did notice that even people who found that 
kind of humor amusing seemed to get tired of it after a while. When the 
movie started the audience was cracking up, but by the end this had died 
down to nervous chuckles. For a lot of wasted opportunities, I give "Scary 
Movie" three out of five stars. By the way, if you enjoyed this movie I'd 
suggest seeing 1981's "Student Bodies", assuming it's possible to find it 
anywhere.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Dracula 2000 (2000)
Directed by: Patrick Lussier
Written by: Joel Soisson, Patrick Lussier
Abraham Van Helsing (Christopher Plummer) is an antiques dealer with a 
secret in the cellar of his massive home. No one is entirely sure what he 
has buried down there, guarded by a high tech security system, but Marcus 
(Omar Epps) and his team of cyber thieves intend to find out. What they 
discover is not the gold and jewels they came for. Instead, they find 
Dracula himself (Gerard Butler), buried for over a hundred years. Dracula is 
soon released from his prison and seeks out Van Helsing's daughter, Mary 
(Justine Waddell), whom he is connected to in ways even he doesn't fully 
understand. So, Van Helsing and his assistant, Simon (Jonny Lee Miller), 
track the prince of darkness across Europe. As they travel, Simon (Belmont 
maybe?) soon realizes that all the legends aren't true. Dracula may hate 
crosses, but they don't exactly hurt him. Silver stakes are the way to go, 
and Drac's hatred of Christianity and silver may be the key to finding his 
weakness and killing him once and for all.
Hey Patrick, Dracula may be immortal, but we're not, and you just wasted two 
precious hours of our lives. Oh and what a waste of time this movie is. If 
you're like me, you'll spend your time trying vainly to keep from falling 
asleep (I asked the girl next to me to please slap me upside the head if I 
started drifting off. She seemed to like that idea and hit me even when I 
wasn't falling asleep) or chatting with folks next to you about the good old 
days when Dracula movies were entertaining. You know, the moment Dimension's 
logo hit the screen at the film's start, I got this sick feeling in my 
stomach. I had to wonder, why should I feel this way? Afterall, Dimension 
brought us Scream and From Dusk Til Dawn; two films which 
perfectly combine horror and comedy for a rousing good time. Then it dawned 
on me, while Dimension may have given us those great flicks, what have the 
brought us lately? Highlander: Endgame? Reindeer Games? That's 
not much of a resume there, and despite my hopes that Dracula 2000 
would pull them out of their rut with Wes Craven's name attached to it, this 
was not to be.
Hey, look everyone, it's another cast full of young and talentless actors. 
Jonny Lee Miller (Mansfield Park) leads our fairly talentless cast 
with a performance that almost borders on tolerable at times. He tries to 
deliver his lines with something resembling flair, but when your dialogue is 
about as wooden as the stake your trying to stick through Dracula (sorry, 
they're silver stakes now; when did that happen?), you can't be expected to 
do too much. Then there's Justine Waddell (Mansfield Park... 
interesting), about as attractive as your average teen actor, and just about 
as talented. How about Gerard Butler as the prince/princess/wolf/bat/leech 
of darkness? Try to imagine a nancy boy wearing a black trench-coat that's 
about two sizes too large, staring at everyone with a wide-eyed look that 
seems to say "Hey, look at me, I'm in a movie! Teehee!" That's our boy. The 
only saving grace comes from Omar Epps (The Wood), who does what he 
can with a seriously underwritten role, and the great Christopher Plummer 
(The Insider). When these two are on screen the film is almost 
tolerable. Almost being the key word there.
Here's a quick lesson for all you aspiring directors out there: a few 
startles do not a horror movie make. Does Dracula 2000 have startles? 
Oh yes, of the cheap, cheesy, I would have seen it coming if I'd been paying 
attention to the movie variety. Does it have any scares? Not only does it 
not have a single scare, it doesn't have anything even remotely resembling a 
scare. It's as though Lussier intentionally avoided scaring his audiences. 
Yet it wasn't the lack of scares that surprised me. I've come to expect that 
from modern horror movies. What really surprised me is that there was no 
humor here either. The closest the film ever gets to a humorous moment is 
Dracula watching a music video filled with images of fire and people wearing 
leather. There is a look of sheer admiration on his face as he whispers, 
"brilliant." Other than that, don't expect a chuckle this time around. Why 
is this lack of humor surprising? Because most modern horror and slasher 
films have decided to forgo horror in favor of self-aware humor. Dracula 
2000 has ditched horror in favor of... what exactly?
So, what works in the film? The first twenty or so minutes, in which we see 
the high-tech, high energy break in is quite entertaining. After watching it 
I'd settled in for what looked to be an entertaining movie. My mistake. 
That's about all that works in the film, but let me tell you right now what 
really, REALLY doesn't work. You ready? This is a minor spoiler (not that 
you should care). Forget everything you thought you knew about Dracula, 
folks. Forget all those stories about his once being Vlad the Impaler, a 
Transylvanian. According to Patrick Lussier, Dracula was actually the man 
responsible for turning Jesus in for his ten pieces of silver. Umm... what? 
I can forgive a bad horror movie, but I'm not too willing to forgive a bad 
horror movie that rewrites a good one. I've got to briefly mention the 
film's soundtrack, which is an unusual combination of modern rock songs and 
operatic singing which sounds like a bad Hans Zimmer imitation. While the 
soundtrack's disjointed feeling does rather fit the tone of the movie, 
that's not necessarily a good thing. Dracula 2000 runs far too long 
at 127 minutes. I'd recommend the film to those who think modern horror 
movies "rule" (you people confuse me) and give it two and a half out of five 
stars. By the way, there is one legitimate scare in the film. It's preceded 
by five, count them, five different teen-flick previews. Lord have mercy.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Se7en (1995)
Detective David Mills (Brad Pitt) just moved to a new city with his wife, 
Tracy (Gwyneth Paltrow). His temporary partner is Detective William 
Sommerset (Morgan Freeman), an old veteran who is retiring in seven days. 
Greeting Mills is the corpse of an overweight man, found in his own home, 
who was apparently forced to eat till he burst. While the police are willing 
to file the murder away as just another typical homocide, Sommerset believes 
this is the start of something much larger. Soon his suspicions are proven 
when more corpses show up. It seems our serial killer has an affinity for 
Dante and the like, and he is killing those people he believes have 
committed one of the seven deadly sins. While Mills decides to pursue the 
killer through traditional police methods, Sommerset researches deeply into 
the seven deadly sins in an attempt to find the killer's current interests. 
Yet despite both their efforts, the killer seems to always be two steps 
ahead. As Sommerset points out, the killer is methodical, exacting, and 
worst of all, patient.
Making a film in the serial killer sub-genre is fraught with peril. One has 
only to look at failures like "The Bone Collector" and "The Cell" to see the 
dangers inherent in these types of films. For every "Silence of the Lambs" 
we get a dozen films like "Fallen". However, every so often, we get a movie 
like David Fincher's "Se7en". This is the kind of movie that will be hated 
by some for its blatant depictions of horrifying murders. Truth be told, I 
can't blame people for disliking it for that reason. If you can look past 
that (and I can't blame you for not being able to), you'll find that "Se7en" 
is a fascinating look into the mind of a truly twisted killer. This is the 
sort of plot-driven, atmospheric, suspense filled movie Hollywood only puts 
out once in a great while. Fincher manages to deftly side-step every Serial 
killer cliche. There's only one chase scene, but it's short and essential to 
the plot; the ending doesn't come flying at you out of left field ("The Bone 
Collector", anyone?); and the killer isn't just your typical nutcase. In the 
film's most chilling scene, he actually presents the reasons for his crimes. 
Why is this chilling? Because he presents his arguments in such a cold, 
calculated, logical fashion, you'll almost find yourself buying into what 
he's saying.
"Se7en" is a film which requires only two actors to carry the entire acting 
burden on their shoulders alone. Thankfully, Fincher chose two actors who 
are up to the task; one good, and one great. The good actor is, of course, 
Brad Pitt. Anyone who doubts Pitt is a good actor has only to go back and 
watch his performance in "12 Monkeys". In this case, Pitt is actually the 
perfect choice for this role. The character of David Mills is so impetuous, 
headstrong, and reckless, you can only picture an actor like Brad Pitt 
playing him. On the other hand, the character of William Sommerset is one 
who displays nothing but patience, intelligence, and thoughtfullness. Morgan 
Freeman is the very embodiement of these three traits. To call his 
performance in "Se7en" excellent should go without saying, because I've 
never seen Freeman deliver anything less than a great performance. The two 
actors play off each other perfectly; each antagonizing the other with 
opposite character traits, without ever causing the situations to descend 
into cliche and melodrama. The only other actors worth noting are Gwyneth 
Paltrow ("The Talented Mr. Ripley"), who delivers a nicely understated 
performance, and the man playing the serial killer, whose name I will not 
mention (on the off chance you haven't heard who it is). Let's just say the 
actor delivers the creepiest performance this side of Anthony Hopkins as 
Hannibal Lecter. Watch for Richard Roundtree ("Shaft") in a small appearance 
as the DA.
Fincher and Walker ("Sleepy Hollow") take an interesting approach to dealing 
with the detectives' roles in this story. Detective Sommerset states their 
parts in the film perfectly at one point: "We're picking up the pieces, 
putting everything into neat little piles and filing it away on the off 
chance it will ever be needed in the courtroom." This means that throughout 
the film the detectives never get all that close to catching the killer. 
Some people won't care for that approach, since they'll think it takes the 
suspense away from the story. I have the opposite view. I think it adds 
suspense because it makes the killer that much more frightening. The police 
are completely at his mercy, unable to predict what he'll do next. Each 
scene shows us the aftermath of the murders and how everyone reacts to them. 
A word of caution - these are very powerful and disturbing scenes. If you've 
got a weak stomach, steer clear of this one. Back when I saw the movie in 
theaters I actually remember people running for the exits in a panic, their 
hands over their mouths. You have been warned.
One thing I really have to hand Fincher is that "Se7en" is beautifully 
paced. The film never feels rushed, and it never drags. When we're not 
looking at the disgusting aftermath of a murder, we get scenes like the two 
detectives sitting in a bar, discussing the lives of people in a big city. 
Sounds boring right? Not at all. In fact, I would have liked even more 
scenes like this. They never go on for very long, and with two actors like 
these (one good and one great) delivering the dialogue, they're really a 
treat. There's another excellent scene where we see the two conflicting 
detection styles of Mills and Sommerset. While a beautiful classical piece 
(Bach's suite no. 3, for those who care) plays softly in the background, 
Mills sits and stares at crime scene photos all night, while Sommerset stays 
in the library studying the seven deadly sins. The soundtrack, by Howard 
Shore (who also scored the reprehensible "The Cell"), is perfectly low-key 
and dreary for the film. "Se7ven" does run a full 123 minutes, but it's well 
worth two hours of your time. I'd recommend the movie to anyone who thinks 
they can handle disturbing images in favor of a truly interesting story and 
give it a full, well earned five out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)
Kip Raines (Giovanni Ribisi) has a problem. He was hired by the local crime 
lord, Raymond Calitri (Christopher Eccleston), to steal fifty cars. 
Unfortunately, the cops caught him before he finished and impounded the 
cars. Now Calitri is going to kill Kip unless Kip's older brother, Memphis 
(Nicholas Cage), fulfills the contract. Memphis used to be a master car 
thief but retired to keep Kip from following in his brother's footsteps. Now 
Memphis has just three days to steal all fifty cars or his brother will be 
crushed like a tin can. So Memphis goes back and tracks down his old crew, 
which consists of four experienced thieves. Otto Halliwell (Robert Duvall) 
is the leader of the group, a feisty old man who has tried to retire and 
lead a straight life. Sway Wayland (Angelina Jolie), Memphis's former lover, 
has gone straight by working herself into the ground at two-full time jobs. 
Atley Jackson (Will Patton) still works as a car thief for Calitri, but his 
loyalties are with Raines. Donny Astricky (Chi McBride) and The Sphinx 
(Vinnie Jones) have obtained regular jobs, but both seem eager to re-enter 
their former life styles. As the group rushes to beat the clock, they are 
being closely followed by detectives Castlebeck (Delroy Lindo) and Drycoff 
(Timothy Olyphant). They have a history with Memphis and are waiting to 
catch him in the act of stealing a car so they can put him away for good.
Okay everyone, we all know what to expect from a Jerry Bruckheimer ("The 
Rock", "Con Air") movie. We're going to get a weak story, lots of 
explosions, predictable plot twists, and a lot of fun. If you go into "Gone 
in Sixty Seconds" expecting a typical Jerry Bruckheimer movie you should 
have fun. If you expect something deep and dramatic, well, you've obviously 
never seen a Jerry Bruckheimer movie before. His latest outing is as 
mindless as ever, but boy is it entertaining. "Gone in Sixty Seconds" is a 
movie packed with car chase after car chase, with very little tying them 
together. The car chases are made amusing by Bruckheimer's desire to keep a 
PG-13 rating attached to the movie. This means that he goes out of his way 
to show that no one gets killed in the chases, no matter how disastrous the 
accidents might be. In one scene a cop car gets smashed through a massive 
concrete wall by a wrecking ball, and the cop climbs out looking slightly 
dazed. I think the other reason for this was because the cops are obviously 
the good guys, and the car thieves, while played like good guys, are 
obviously the villains. Everyone, myself included, would have been in an 
uproar if the cops had been mercilessly slaughtered while we were supposed 
to be cheering for their killers.
With the exception of "The Rock" and possibly "Enemy of the State", most 
Bruckheimer movies aren't known for featuring great actors. "Gone in Sixty 
Seconds" is a delightful exception to that rule. While Nicholas Cage acts 
like Nicholas Cage (as always), he occasionally shows some (gasp) emotion. I 
think this is because Cage's passion in life is cars, and he was now given 
the chance to make a movie about them. He looks like a little boy in a candy 
store through most of the film. While I may not like Nicholas Cage, I like 
nearly every member of his supporting cast. Will Patton ("Entrapment", 
"Armageddon"), who was one of the best actors in "Armageddon" shines once 
again. Robert Duvall ("A Civil Action") can't help but be good in everything 
he appears in, and he sticks to that trend here. The other stand-out actor 
is Delroy Lindo ("Romeo Must Die"), who seems to be making a name for 
himself. Lindo has quite a talent for snapping back and forth from looking 
angry to looking calm and collected with believability. The two most unusual 
casting choices were Angelina Jolie ("Girl Interrupted") and Timothy 
Olyphant ("Go"). Angelina Jolie was an odd choice because, contrary to what 
the previews would have you believe, she plays little more than a bit part. 
This was a waste of one of todays most talented actresses. Timothy Olyphant, 
who was great as the slightly off-kilter drug dealer in "Go", is given 
nothing to do in "Gone in Sixty Seconds". His character serves no purpose 
other than to follow Delroy Lindo about and make not-so-smart-alec comments.
A common trait amongst Bruckheimer films has always been the strangely 
frantic editing. It doesn't seem to matter who directs, Michael Bay 
("Armageddon"), Simon West ("Con Air"), or Dominic Sena, Bruckheimer must 
set the style in advance. Dominic Sena's only sense of style seems to be to 
film chase scenes at night in unlit areas so we can't tell who is chasing 
who. Bay did something similar in "Armageddon" on the asteroid, but at least 
it made some sense there. I have only one other major complaint with "Gone 
in Sixty Seconds", but it's a very big complaint. This is a movie filled 
with interesting and bizarre characters, but they're all given next to no 
screen time. Vinnie Jones' ("Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels") character 
of The Sphinx is possibly the most unusual, being an apparently mute 
mortician who walks through punches and explosions without a scratch. He 
also seems the most eager to kill and maim things, but he's never given the 
chance since he shows up in only four or five scenes. The other interesting 
character is Patton's, who seems to be the mediator of the group, and has a 
history of some sort with all the other characters. Unfortunately his past 
is never gone into, and we still know nothing about him by the end of the 
film. Okay, I'm done complaining. "Gone in Sixty Seconds" boasts two things 
which put all my complaints to rest. One is the best car chases this side of 
"Ronin"; the other is a terrific soundtrack which features classic songs 
like "The Lowrider" combined with yet another great score from composer 
Trevor Rabin ("Armageddon"). Like all Bruckheimer films, this one runs too 
long at 117 minutes. I'd recommend it to anyone who has enjoyed his previous 
films and to anyone who enjoyed "Ronin" for its car chases. I give it a well 
earned three and a half out of five stars.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to: 
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at either: http://www.dependentfilms.net,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Watcher, The (2000)
Directed by: Joe Charbanic
Written by: Darcy Meyers, David Elliot, Clay Ayers
Joel Campbell (James Spader) is an FBI agent whose life was destroyed by one 
case. The case involved a killer named David Griffin (Keanu Reeves), who 
would study young women for weeks before strangling them with piano wire. 
During the course of his exploits, and Campbell's search for him, the hunt 
turned into a game for Griffin. Now Campbell has moved from Los Angeles, 
where the murders took place, to Chicago to escape the case. He's also 
seeing a psychiatrist, named Polly (Marisa Tomei), who is helping him slowly 
put his life back together. However, David Griffin isn't done with him yet. 
The killer has followed Campbell to the windy city and is trying to make 
their game more interesting. He's sending Campbell photos of the young women 
he will kill, one day before he murders them. Campbell and the Chicago 
police have that much time to find the woman in the photos before Griffin 
kills them, and Griffin won't interfere in any way. Campbell has to fight 
his personal demons about the case and face the fact that he and Griffin are 
connected. Time is running out too, since the killer has gone through four 
of the sins, there are only three left, and - oh, sorry, wrong movie.
Newcomer Joe Charbanic's idiotic film, "The Watcher", couldn't have come at 
a better time. I just finished a review of "Se7en", in which I said for 
every good serial killer movie we get, we're hit with a dozen poor ones. 
Well, we got "The Cell", and "The Watcher", so only ten more to go. I don't 
know about you, but that brings a smile to my face (that was sarcasm by the 
way). I will give "The Watcher" one thing, it's bad enough that you'll get 
quite a few unintentional laughs (I actually laughed harder at this movie 
than at many so called comedies this year). "The Watcher" bills itself as a 
horror/mystery/thriller. Let's take a look at those, shall we? Horror? Well, 
it's kind of horrifying to think this was made, but other than that, notta. 
Mystery? Uhh, I'll give it away right now. Keanu Reeves is the killer, 
sorry. Thriller? Aside from being thrilled when the end credits rolled, 
didn't happen. So what kind of movie is this? I haven't the foggiest. I 
don't think dull qualifies as a genre yet (but thanks to this year, it's 
getting there), but once it does this movie will fall nicely under that 
category.
The acting, the acting, where do I begin? Well, as everyone knows by now, 
Keanu Reeves is indeed the black hole of acting. In other words, not only 
does he act horribly himself, but his very presence can make other actors 
look bad. You want to know what made "The Watcher" look even worse? I was so 
bored by the proceedings I was actually looking forward to Reeves' 
appearances on screen so I could be entertained in some way (you'd be amazed 
how entertaining bad acting can be). James Spader (Of all his films, I've 
only liked him in "Two Days in the Valley") gives his usual emotionless 
performance, no surprise there. I was, however, surprised that the one 
intentionally humorous (at least I think it was intentional) scene involved 
Spader displaying some good comic talent. In the scene, Spader is yanking 
people off the streets, forcing them to look at a girl's photo. I know, it 
doesn't sound funny, and it wasn't hysterical or anything, but it was 
somewhat amusing watching the peoples' faces when they get yanked off the 
street. Should I spend time on Marissa Tomei? Why bother, Charbanic sure 
didn't spend any on her. You'll see Ernie Hudson's ("Ghostbusters") name in 
the credits, but don't bother looking for him since I think he appears in 
two scenes.
Don't get me wrong, I have a multitude of problems with this movie, but my 
biggest one was the suspension of disbelief factor. Now, on a scale from one 
to ten, your average Schwarzenegger movie has a SD factor of seven or eight. 
"The Watcher" nearly broke the charts. You want an example, eh? Alright, try 
an entire city hunting for one girl, her picture all over the place, cops 
hunting every building, and not only does no one find her, but she doesn't 
notice any of this? To top that one off, she works in a bloody mall! She's 
surrounded by television screens, all showing her face and shouting her 
name. I'm as oblivious as the next fellow (okay, maybe a little more so), 
but you've got to be kidding me. I guess it's possible this was all supposed 
to be some comment about how people ignore each other in a big city, but if 
that's the case it sure didn't fit in with the rest of the movie (plus we 
already know that, this wasn't exactly groundbreaking). I also have to give 
the film this, I did learn a few things. For example, I didn't know you 
could hotwire a car in less than five seconds. Keanu does it though, just by 
snapping the steering console open and turning a wire. Neat, eh? I also 
learned that police helicopters serve one purpose only: to light the 
killer's way while he makes his escape. Hey, I didn't say it taught me 
anything useful.
Perhaps in the hands of a more competent director (or even a film school 
student) this picture would have worked (but probably not). Instead, we get 
Charbanic trying such "innovative" techniques as showing things through the 
killer's eyes by making the screen go blurry, black and white, and shaking 
the camera around. How does this guy even move, much less stalk young women 
when his eye sight is that bad? Charbanic also has an irritating affinity 
for flashbacks. He loves them so much in fact, that he shows the same ones 
repeatedly. If that wasn't bad enough, they're filmed in that same "killer 
vision" we see when viewing things through Keanu's eyes. I guess I should 
mention a few good points, so here goes. There's one supporting character, a 
cop named Hollis (Chris Ellis), who provides some entertaining moments (he 
has a phone conversation during a high speed chase for example). There is 
also a nice score playing during the film's very long opening credits, but 
unfortunately the soundtrack turns into your typical popular music 
compilation after that. The film only runs 93 minutes, but I sure thought 
I'd been in the theater for a week or so. I'd recommend it to those who love 
unbelievable, cliched serial killer movies (it's sad, but such people are 
out there. You know who you are) and give it a generous two out of five 
stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad? or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Limey, The (1999)
I've always disliked the saying: "A triumph of style over substance". This
might be because it is so overused when applied to movies with both style
and substance (like last year's "Fight Club"). However, I can think of no
more accurate description for Steven Soderbergh's ("Out of Sight") "The
Limey". Soderbergh's film is so steeped in style that you may not even
notice what a hollow movie it really is. You'll most likely be too busy
marveling at the way Soderbergh shifts time periods in a split second while
continuing one narrative; or the way he manages to make footage from old
Terence Stamp movies fit seamlessly into this current story to notice what a
frightfully boring and often incoherent film "The Limey" really is.
Wilson (Terence Stamp) is a man just released from prison after serving time
for armed robbery. He receives a letter from a man in America, named Ed
(Luis Guzman), telling him that his daughter, Jenny (Melissa George), has
just died in a car accident. Wilson travels from England to meet with Ed, in
order to determine who "snuffed" his daughter. His search soon leads him to
Jenny's ex-boyfriend, Valentine (Peter Fonda). Valentine is a rich music
producer who also dabbles in drug running. Wilson also meets up with Elaine
(Lesley Ann Warren), Jenny's voice coach in acting school. Wilson, Elaine,
and Ed decide to take Valentine down, with a little unwelcome help from the
police, who are looking for the money from Valentine's last run.
If you sit back and just look at the plot of this film, without any of the
style or interesting camera work, you'll see what a simple film it really
is. When you get right down to it, "The Limey" is nothing more than a
simplistic revenge story. While Soderbergh's direction may be innovative,
it's also rather confusing at times. Images we sometimes see in the middle
of the movie have already happend long ago, or will happen at the end of the
film. While we're being shown these scenes which may not have happened yet,
the characters in the present keep chattering on even though we can no
longer see them. It seems interesting at first, but eventually it's just
annoying. It also hinders the story because half the scenes shown during
these moments are never explained.
The acting in "The Limey" is certainly the film's strongest element. Terence
Stamp (who most of today's audiences will only know from his brief
appearance in "Star Wars: Episode One") is simply brilliant as a vengeful
man who was going to start his life over. Peter Fonda, who gave a great
performance in "Ulee's Gold", is sadly miscast yet still manages to do an
adequate job. Luis Guzman ("Magnolia") is one of those actors who shows up
in almost everything, and all you can think is "I know that guy from
somewhere". He does quite a good turn here as Wilson's rather reluctant
sidekick. Last, we have Lesley Ann Warren ("Twin Falls Idaho") giving a
great, understated performance as the mother Jenny never had. Unfortunately,
Warren and Guzman are given very little screen time considering what
interesting characters they play.
"The Limey" will certainly go down in history as one of the most fashionable
movies of the '90s, but I do hope people in the future are able to see it
for what it really is: candy coated outside, empty inside. The movie may
only run 86 minutes, but a lot of that time is filler because there is so
little plot. As a result, the subplot about Valentine's drug running and
troubles with the law are hardly touched upon. Instead, we get scenes like
Terence Stamp walking in front of a wall while he talks about his mates back
in England. I recommend "The Limey" to arthouse film students, but I can't
recommend it to anyone else because I guarantee the rest of you will be
quite bored. I give it three out of five stars for acting and technical
merit.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to:
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
Directed by: Don Bluth, Gary Goldman
Written by: Randall McCormick, Hans Bauer
It's the 31st century, and mankind has no home. The aliens, known as the 
Drej, destroyed the earth because they believed mankind was becoming a 
massive threat to their existence. Before the earth was destroyed, some of 
the population managed to escape and form colonies on ships out in space. 
Cale (Matt Damon) is one such person, working out a miserable existence and 
wandering about the stars without a home. The difference is that Cale's 
father created a device called the Titan, which is said to be mankind's last 
hope. He hid it from the Drej before they destroyed the earth and implanted 
a map showing where to find it in Cale's hand. Captain Korso (Bill Pullman) 
has been searching for Cale for 15 years so he could find the Titan and give 
humans a fighting chance. Cale joins with Korso's crew, which includes the 
lovely Akima (Drew Barrymore), the bizarre but intelligent Gune (John 
Leguizamo), the wise cracking Preed (Nathan Lane), and the kangaroo like 
weapons officer, Stith (Janeane Garofalo). The six search desperately for 
the Titan, but the Drej are right on their tails.
Back in 1981 there was an unusual animated film called "Heavy Metal", based 
on a series of semi-adult magazines. "Heavy Metal" was actually 
groundbreaking at the time because of two factors: One, it was clearly made 
for adults due to the graphic violence and sexual content; and two, it 
didn't follow one specific storyline, but contained several short stories 
which were interconnected. If "Titan A.E." had been released back in 1981, 
it might have been hailed as groundbreaking and developed a cult following. 
The animation style is very similar to "Heavy Metal", and the story is 
complex enough that only teens and adults are going to understand exactly 
what's going on. Unfortunately, being released in 2000 has guaranteed the 
movie a short run in theaters. The animation in "Titan A.E." is nice, but 
nothing spectacular; the storyline may be complicated, but it's loaded with 
every cliche in the book; and the 3-D animation is nothing we haven't seen 
before. So why the three and a half stars, you ask? Because despite all 
these faults the film is just so darn enjoyable and amusing that you can't 
help but have a good time watching it.
Most of the voice casting in "Titan A.E." is rather unusual. The character 
of Cale seems to have been made with Matt Damon ("Good Will Hunting") in 
mind, so he can't help but do a fairly good job. Drew Barrymore, as the 
obviously Asian Akima, is one of the most unusual choices, but she actually 
does a decent enough job. The weak links are Bill Pullman ("Lake Placid") 
and Janeane Garofalo ("Mystery Men"). Pullman has always seemed too whiny 
and annoying to me, and he's playing the rough world weary Captain Korso 
here? I don't think so. Janeane Garofalo, usually a talented comic actress, 
doesn't add anything to the character of Stith, but I'm not sure this is 
entirely her fault since the character is so underdeveloped. The other two 
casting bits are a bit more interesting. Nathan Lane ("Mouse Hunt") and John 
Leguizamo ("Spawn") are given the two most unusual characters in the movie, 
and they handle them in very different ways. Preed looks like a hairy 
version of Jar Jar Binks, a stuttering goof who can't do anything right. 
Lane plays him in exact opposite fashion, as a conniving, sneaky character 
who thinks he's a lot smarter than he actually is. Leguizamo's character of 
Gune is not the kind of character you would expect in a movie aimed at kids. 
His insane ramblings will only confuse youngsters, but they sure made me 
laugh out loud. Here's an example of one of his best lines: "I made this 
last night in my sleep. I'm not sure just what it does, but it has a button 
on it which I'm eager to press, but I'm afraid of what might happen if I 
do."
Obviously if you're going to see "Titan A.E." it's because you like either 
animated movies, sci-fi movies, or the rare combination of the two. The sad 
fact is that this movie fails at being any of these. If you want really nice 
animation you'd be best off going to see a Disney movie. If you want sci-fi, 
you'll want something original like "The Matrix" rather than something 
saddled with this cliche ridden mess of a plot. "Titan A.E." actually 
succeeds when it throws things at us which we'd never expect. An example of 
a great scene was one where the group tries to sneak past a guard at a door 
by pretending to be slave traders. The guard pretends to be fooled and then 
laughs and points out that Korso doesn't walk like a slave, Preed should 
have threatened him rather than bribed him, and they're all obviously 
wearing bed sheets as disguises. Preed gives the film's best line here: "An 
intelligent guard, that was unexpected." If the movie had been full of more 
scenes like that one it may have been something great. Instead we get every 
cliche from reluctant hero has change of heart when seeing the plight of his 
people, to turncoat is saved by hero and subsequently changes sides again. 
Still, "Titan A.E." is fun, with an interesting if out of place '80s 
soundtrack and a hysterical ending. I give it three and a half out of five 
stars and a recommendation to wait for video since it won't take long to get 
there.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to: 
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at: http://www.dependentfilms.net,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
As a summer movie, The Mummy does not disappoint. It's a great, popcorn movie
that's a blend of comedy and action, and which is for all intents and purposes,
a poor man's Indiana Jones. As a horror movie living up to the original, it
falls more than a bit short. The movie opens with a rather corny, though
appropriate telling of how the mummy came to be. We're then taken to Egypt in
1923, where the French Foreign legion (led by Brendan Fraser after his
commander turns tail and runs)  is fighting a band of Desert raiders. The
foreign legion is crushed, and we're taken to Cairo, where we meet Evelyn and
Jonathan. Siblings who've found a map to the city of the dead. they then
proceed to wake the mummy, and the fun begins.
First of all, don't go into this film expecting a ghoulish horror movie. For
the most part, the movie is actually an action/comedy. Secondly, this film has
no deep, meaningful messages. This is pure movie going fun. As for acting, I
must commend Brendan Fraser. Normally I'm not a large fan of his, but his comic
abilities really shine here. Rachael Weisz and John Hannah both do respectable
jobs, and Arnold Vosloo is quite menacing as the title character. Though the
fact of the matter is, the mummy is usually shown as a CGI creation. 
The only real problems I had with the entire film, were the lack of horror, and
the fact that the movie never really figured out what kind of movie it wanted
to be. I frankly went in, expecting a Horror movie with comic bits thrown in.
While I still got a good, fun movie, it just wasn't what I was hoping for
personally. The other problem, is that the film switches from being deadly
serious at parts, to mocking itself at others, and then back again. Perhaps
being warned in advance of the lack of horror will help readers to enjoy the
movie more. I simply hope that when the sequal is made (and I guarantee they'll
make one) the writers figure out what sort of film they're trying to make.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Loser (2000)
Like no one in his family before him, Paul Tannek (Jason Biggs) has been 
accepted to college with a full scholarship. His father (Dan Aykroyd) leaves 
him with some parting advice on how to make friends with people in the big 
city: "Look them in the eye when they're talking to you and be interested in 
what they're saying." Obviously this isn't going to work, as Paul soon finds 
in dealing with his three alcoholic roommates, Noah (Jimmi Simpson), Adam 
(Zak Orth), and Chris (Thomas Sadoski). The only high point in Paul's 
college experience is meeting Dora Diamond (Mena Suvari). Dora is a cute, 
slightly naive student who is struggling to make enough money to stay in 
school while dating the sleazy Lit professor, Edward Alcott (Greg Kinnear). 
These two hit it off wonderfully, both being outcasts of sorts. Yet, while 
Paul grows more and more attracted to Dora, he finds himself constantly 
living in the shadow of Edward, who Dora seems to be truly in love with. Add 
to that constant problems arising from dealing with his now former 
roommates, and Paul's college career isn't looking too bright.
Any teen movie like this is bound to possess three qualities: it's going to 
be more than a touch on the predictable side; it's going to feature a lot of 
young actors that older audiences have never heard of; and it's going to 
have a soundtrack full of modern pop songs that will be played at the worst 
times. Knowing the movie was going to be like this, I wondered to what 
extent these three teen movie qualities would be displayed. Thankfully, only 
one was prominent throughout the film. Like all teen movies (and an 
unfortunate number of regular adult movies these days), "Loser" is about as 
predictable as it can be. I don't mean it's as predictable as "The In Crowd" 
(also released this week, and I was guessing what characters were going to 
say before they said it in that movie), but you knew exactly how things had 
to end in this movie, and sure enough it stays true to this form. As for the 
other two traits, the cast may be comprised mainly of young actors, but most 
people now recognize Jason Biggs ("American Pie"), and Mena Suvari 
("American Beauty"); and Greg Kinnear ("Mystery Men") should be well known 
to adult audiences. As for the soundtrack (which I dread in all teen 
movies), comprised entirely of current popular songs, Amy Heckerling 
("Clueless") proves remarkably adept at keeping it toned down and used only 
in the appropriate scenes.
The acting in "Loser" is one of the film's few highpoints. Jason Biggs, who 
turned in quite an amusing performance in the grossly overrated "American 
Pie", is just about perfect for the role of small town boy Paul Tannek. 
There's something about him (probably that goofy grin) that looks so naive 
and, well, small town like, that we have no problem believing he is Paul 
Tannek. Mena Suvari shows she has a remarkable acting range given what a 
different character Dora is from Angela Hayes in "American Beauty". Not only 
does she give a great performance here, but she looks and acts too cute for 
words. Greg Kinnear is developing something of a reputation for playing 
sleaze ball characters. His character of Captain Amazing in "Mystery Men" 
was quite a jerk, his performance in "What Planet Are You From?" knocked him 
up a few notches towards king of jerks, and the way he treats poor little 
Mena in "Loser" nearly gives him the crown. Of the three roommates, only 
newcomer Thomas Sadoski makes any sort of impression. What impression does 
he make? That he can play a complete loser quite well (is that necessarily a 
good thing though?). Watch for cameos from David Spade ("Tommy Boy") and 
Andy Dick (television's "News radio").
I think one of the largest problems with "Loser" (besides the title, but 
I'll go into that later) is that it never quite finds a target audience. 
While I was trying to figure out what age group the movie applied to, the 
following thought ran through my mind: "Teens will probably like - no, well, 
adults will most likely - no, hm, little kids might - oh god no." After 
thinking this, all I could conclude was there really was no audience for the 
movie. The title is the second largest problem with the film for two 
reasons: First, it really doesn't make a whole lot of sense, considering the 
character of Paul Tannek. Paul's a little out of his element, but he's 
smart, kind, quick-witted, and a heck of a fighter. He's apparently a loser 
because he doesn't drink, do drugs, and take advantage of drunken girls? 
That makes sense, and okay, my public service announcement is over. The 
second reason it's a bad idea for a film title is because whenever a movie 
gets a name like that (think "Screwed") it does poorly at the box office. My 
final, and largest, complaint with the movie is a bit more simplistic. If 
I'm not mistaken, "Loser" is being advertised as a comedy. During the entire 
film I don't remember chuckling even once. Coming from me this is quite bad 
because I've been told I giggle at air.
I have two other minor complaints, but they pale in comparison to that last 
one. First, I would like to have seen more of Dan Aykroyd since the last 
thing I remember him from was his horrendous performance in the otherwise 
great "Grosse Pointe Blank", and I don't want to remember the man who 
created "Ghostbusters" that way. My second small complaint was with Amy 
Heckerling's pacing. It wasn't necessarily bad (for bad pacing, see the 
afore mentioned "The In Crowd"), just a bit too languid given the kind of 
movie this was. It can be easily assumed that teenagers would be the primary 
target audience (though I don't believe they'll like this movie). I've 
noticed teens tend to like films that move quickly (granted, they did seem 
to enjoy "The Blair Witch Project" for some reason, and look how slowly that 
moved). At its heart, "Loser" is a cute little movie which could have been a 
lot better if its writer/director had bothered to stick some laughs into the 
script. "Loser" runs a decent 95 minutes, and I'd recommend the movie to 
fans of Jason Biggs and Mena Suvari, since both give great performances, and 
to anyone who enjoys watching Greg Kinnear act like a sleaze. Even if you 
fall into one of these categories, I'd suggest waiting for video or at least 
catching a matinee. I give "Loser" three out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Drowning Mona (2000)
Have you ever known someone who was so detestable that everyone hated him?
Imagine if that person was murdered, who would the suspects be, everyone?
Now, imagine if someone, we'll just call him Nick, were to make a movie
entirely about a person like this; what kind of movie would that be?
Apparently, it would be a movie called "Drowning Mona", one of the most
despicable, mean spirited, evil little movies I have ever seen. The only
thing that saved this movie from a one star rating, was the presence of
Danny DeVito as the only likable character in a movie filled with abhorrent
people. "Drowning Mona" managed to cause me to stare, slack-jawed and
horrified at the screen during its full running time. There aren't too many
films out there which can do that.
Mona Dearly (Bette Midler) is an evil, loathsome creature, whose life is
filled with caustic remarks and hate-filled glares. Her husband, Phil
(William Fichtner), is a depressed looking man who makes it through life
only because of the happiness he finds in his affair with Rona (Jamie Lee
Curtis), a local waitress. Then one day Mona's brakes fail while driving
along a mountain road, and she flies into the river. Of course, everyone in
the town is suspect: Her husband; her one handed son, Jeff (Marcus Thomas);
his business partner, Bobby (Casey Affleck); Bobby's fiancee, Ellen (Neve
Campbell); and a slew of other people all had plenty of reason to want Mona
Dearly dead. Chief Wyatt Rash (Danny DeVito), the local sheriff, must try to
determine who the killer might be out of the hundreds of possible suspects.
It's only March, and already a candidate for worst movie of the year has
arisen. Seldom have I seen a movie audience so silent during a comedy. On
those rare occasions where I was able to tear my eyes from the horrors on
display, I would glance about to see other audience members staring at the
screen with looks of shock plastered on their faces. "Drowning Mona" is an
amazingly evil, twisted movie, which nearly gives "Very Bad Things" a run
for its money as most disturbing film of the past five years. Not only is
the movie evil, but its attempts at actual humor fall completely flat. I
think that "Drowning Mona" was supposed to be a dark, dark comedy, but it
succeeds only in being very dark.
Perhaps most terrifying of all is that the actors involved appeared to be
having a grand old time acting like Yugo driving demons (everyone in the
film drives a Yugo). Bette Midler is amazingly convincing as the queen of
this hell on earth, and her fellow stars, particularly Marcus Thomas
("Palmetto"), are very nearly as loathsome. The running gag with Thomas
involves him having a stump for a left hand (pretty funny, huh?). Thomas's
character, Jeff, does wonderful things such as run over his neighbor's dog
with a lawnmower and hit on a thirteen year old girl. I think this was all
supposed to be funny, but if that's the case it failed miserably. DeVito
plays the only fully likeable character here - the sheriff with a heart of
gold. The truth is, DeVito can't help but be great in any moive, no matter
how otherwise terrible it might be ("War of the Roses", for example).
"Drowning Mona" is a waste of both talent and time. I wouldn't wish it on
anyone except perhaps Nick Gomez and Peter Steinfeld for creating this heap
of garbage. I'll grant you, the two men must have talent because it takes
some to create a film so thoroughly revolting. The film runs 95 minutes,
which is about an hour and a half too long. I don't recommend it to anyone,
anywhere. If you're really desperate to see Bette Midler in something new
(and I mean desperate enough that you're going to die without seeing her),
I'd still suggest you wait for video or at least catch a matinee. With any
luck, "Drowning Mona" will be out of theaters in a few weeks. I give this
sorry movie one and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Dungeons & Dragons (2000)
Directed by: Courtney Solomon
Written by: Topper Lilien, Carroll Cartwright
In another world, the Empress Savina (Thora Birch) has decided to eliminate 
the caste system by making commoners equal to mages. The mage council, led 
by the ambitious Profion (Jeremy Irons), obviously doesn't like this, and 
demand that Savina turn her scepter of what's his face over to them. The 
scepter gives its user control of gold dragons. Profion decides that to 
combat the empress, he must obtain the rod of so and so, which will give him 
control of red dragons. He sends his henchman, Damodar (Bruce Payne), after 
it. Meanwhile, two thieves, Ridley and Snails (Justin Whalin and Marlon 
Wayans), and a young apprentice wizard named Marina (Zoe McLellan) are 
trying to locate the rod so they can destroy it for the empress. They team 
up with a drunken dwarf (Lee Arenberg) in desperate need of a napkin, and an 
elven tracker (Kristen Wilson) in desperate need of a personality, and go 
out to face the armies that await them. Yet time is running out for the 
Empress, and Profion is gaining more and more allies in the council. Can our 
heroes succeed? Will justice prevail? Will you manage to stay awake?
I have to admit, when I first heard about the Dungeons and Dragons project a 
couple of years back, I was rather looking forward to it. I'd enjoyed the 
game years ago, and we get so few fantasy movies I thought it would be a 
nice change of pace. Then, perhaps eight months ago, I saw the first screen 
shots from the film and doubts began to form in my mind. It would appear 
these doubts were well justified. In fact, it could be argued that Dungeons 
and Dragons is the worst film of the year (though in my opinion that crown 
still belongs to Battlefield Earth). Yet in some ways, the film reminded me 
more of Highlander: Endgame, in that it should never have hit the big 
screens, but been marketed as a direct to video release. The special effects 
are of the same cheesy lot found on afternoon action shows like "Xena: 
Warrior Princess" (I know, after Dragonheart no dragon would look good 
enough, but these are really bad); the costumes look like they were 
purchased at the local Halloween costume shop; the acting is so atrocious it 
cannot be adequately described; and the story will most likely baffle those 
over the age of 12 who have never played the role playing game.
Can no one act in this god forsaken movie?! That's the thought that was 
running through my head throughout the film, and alas, it seems no one 
could. Justin Whalin (Jimmy Olsen from "Lois and Clark") leads our 
talentless cast with a performance that would have been more appropriate to 
your average high school play. Marlon Wayans (Scary Movie) goes out of his 
way to prove he's the least talented Wayans brother. His brand of completely 
out of place ghetto speech is so annoying it might just make you wish Jar 
Jar Binks would show up (well... maybe not that annoying). Zoe McLellan is 
certainly attractive, but don't expect her to win any major awards for her 
performance other than the razzie. Bruce Payne (Highlander: Endgame, what do 
you know?) is painfully bad as the bald, lipstick wearing, and not even 
remotely intimidating Damodar. The man's idea of acting consists of 
whispering horrible dialogue while contorting his face into various looks of 
disgust (possibly at his lines). Amongst a legion of bad actors, Payne 
stands out as the worst. I'm still in shock that Jeremy Irons (The Mission) 
of all people actually signed on to this movie, but there he is, hamming it 
up like you've never seen before. At least he seems to be having a good 
time, even if the audience isn't. As for Thora Birch, who showed real 
promise with her performance in American Beauty, all her talent seems to 
have vanished into thin air. Of course, she only has about ten minutes of 
screen time, and in a movie filled with really horrible dialogue, she gets 
the worst. Every word that comes out of her mouth is simply dripping with 
cheese. An example of her average line would be "I know this within the 
depths of my soul." Ouch. Of course, she delivers all these lines in the 
same, monotone voice, which somehow manages to make them even worse. Tom 
Baker, Doctor Who himself, turns up briefly as the king of the elves; one of 
the film's few pleasant surprises.
When a film starts with a voice-over narration explaining things that still 
don't make any sense afterwards, you know you're in for a bumpy ride. 
Unfortunately, this movie wasn't just bumpy, it was more like being stuck in 
a hurricane for an hour and a half. This piece of garbage has single 
handedly destroyed the good name of D&D. Wait, it didn't have a good name... 
that's a neat trick. In addition to the horrible effects, costumes, 
dialogue, acting, direction, sets, etc., the film makes one more major 
blunder. At times, it actually tries to convey some sort of moral message. 
When the film tries to be profound, it's really, really bad. When it sticks 
to being light-hearted and kind of goofy, it's.... really, really bad. 
You're no doubt wondering if a movie called Dungeons and Dragons has any 
dungeons. There are legions of cheesy looking dragons, and yes, there is one 
dungeon. It consists of Ridley going through three different traps while a 
group of thieves watch, betting on whether or not he'll survive. We're told 
that countless people have tried to beat these traps and failed. I don't 
know who these people were, but they must have been blind and wheel-chair 
bound since I could have beaten these traps and I'm none too light on my 
feet.
The question now, is what could have been done to improve this movie? Well, 
targeting things at an adult audience would have helped. Perhaps with a real 
adult cast (I'm so tired of teenage "actors" I can't see straight), and a 
real adult director (this is Solomon's first film and it shows), and a real 
adult script (why do all bad movies seem to have multiple writers?), this 
could have been something. In other words, if you had completely changed 
everything about the movie, it could have been tolerable. So is there 
anything good about this movie other than Tom Baker's appearance? Well, the 
final battle scene is alright, I suppose, in a cartoonish sort of way. It 
features a lot of obviously fake dragons battling it out over an obviously 
fake city while obviously fake actors playing wizards hurl fireballs at 
them. As for the film's score, by composer Justin Caine Burnett (who? 
exactly), it's perfectly suited to the movie because it's just as irritating 
and cheesy as the antics on screen. Dungeons and Dragons runs 105 minutes, 
although it will feel like three times that. I'd recommend the film to fans 
of cheesy movies, because this is one of the cheesiest I've seen in some 
time; and to people who thought Battlefield Earth was unfairly panned. I 
give it one and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
Directed by: Brian DePalma
Written by: Lowell Cannon (story), Jim Thomas
As I was walking out of "Mission to Mars", the first thing that flashed
through my mind was: "I think I just watched a really cheesy version of "The
Abyss". This isn't surprising, as director Brian DePalma has a history of
bad movies. While he may have experienced a brief moment of brilliance with
"The Untouchables", back in 1987, the majority of his career has consisted
of films such as "Bonfire of the Vanities" and "Snake Eyes". "Mission to
Mars" is no exception. While it may have an occasional moment of humor,
mainly due to the presence of Tim Robbins and Jerry O'Connell ("Scream 2",
"Jerry Maguire"), the majority of the film is packed with horrifyingly bad
dialogue and some amazingly cheesy special effects.
The year is 2020, and mankind is finally going to send astronauts to the
surface of Mars. The mission will consist of four astronauts, led by Luc
Goddard (Don Cheadle). While things appear to be going well at first, the
group is suddenly attacked by a massive hurricane on the surface. A rescue
attempt is immediately planned by Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), who was
originally supposed to lead the first mission, but suffered from something
of a nervous breakdown when his wife died. Going with McConnell are Phil
Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell), Woody Blake (Tim Robbins), and Woody's wife Terri
(Connie Nielsen). This group's mission is to discover what went wrong on the
surface and bring back any possible survivors.
With a great cast like the one here, you have to ask yourself how even Brian
DePalma could go wrong. Perhaps the biggest problem is that most of the
characters have no personality. Robbins and O'Connell may be humorous, but
we couldn't care less about their characters. Gary Sinise, normally a great
actor, looks half asleep throughout the entire film, and Connie Nielsen
("Rushmore", "Soldier") is given absolutely nothing to do. Only Don Cheadle
("Out of Sight", "Bulworth") manages to spark some life into his role. I
think "Mission to Mars" was supposed to be something of a disaster movie,
but it's hard for a disaster movie to work if the audience isn't attached to
the characters.
Another thing I noticed, as I was slowly being put to sleep, is that
everything in this film moves very languidly. The movie is filled with
boring scenes such as the camera panning sluggishly over the horrible
looking Mars sets; or a trio of astronauts descending towards the planet for
several minutes without the camera moving or even any music playing. I was
actually, at times, reminded of "2001: A Space Odyssey", but without the
wonderful music. On the rare occasions  the music is present in "Mission to
Mars", it's corny and melodramatic, even during scenes which aren't remotely
emotional. To go along with this trite, stale music, we're usually given
cheesy and overly dramatic dialogue in even more overemotional scenes.
I will admit that "Mission to Mars" starts to pick up near the last thirty
minutes or so, only to fall flat on its face in the last ten minutes. The
one remarkable thing about this film is the amazing cyclone used near the
middle of the story. However, after the extraordinary effect created here,
we're then given some of the worst effects seen in the past five years near
the end of the film. I found it surprising that while "The Abyss" changed
from disaster movie to emotional alien encounter movie flawlessly, this same
transistion in "Mission to Mars" feels incredibly out of place. Actually,
I'd suggest that everyone go back and rent "The Abyss" rather than see this
film. "Mission to Mars" runs an amazingly long 113 minutes, and I can't
honestly recommend it to anyone. I give the film two out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Kid, The (2000)
Russell Duritz (Bruce Willis) is a professional image consultant, which 
means he makes his living telling people what is wrong with them and bossing 
them around. Russell is blunt, rude, demanding, and absolutely miserable. He 
spends his time insulting his two employees; his sharp tongued secretary, 
Janet (Lily Tomlin), and his adoring assistant, Amy (Emily Mortimer). His 
life has been this way for some time now, until one evening when a familiar 
looking boy, named Rusty (Spencer Breslin), shows up in his house. After a 
few tests for scars and birthmarks, Russell determines that Rusty is his 
younger self, somehow arrived in the future. He first thinks he's crazy, and 
tries the "very powerful medication" his psychiatrist prescribed. After that 
doesn't work he asks Janet to make the boy go away (she finds this very 
amusing). Finally he decides the boy was sent to him so Russell could 
improve his childhood, and he has to figure out how to do that, and then how 
to send him back. While his interests first lie entirely in getting rid of 
this boy, he slowly realizes Rusty may have been sent to improve Russell's 
life, not vice-versa.
Walking into a live action Disney movie (or an animated one for that 
matter), one expects a certain level of sappiness and schmaltz. I'm not sure 
why the execs at Disney think kids like this (I sure didn't when I was a 
kid), but I suppose it's hard to argue with the kind of money these movies 
keep pulling in. In the beginning of "The Kid" I was pleased to find the 
schmaltz level was surprisingly low, and it stayed this way for the first 
half of the film. Instead of the expected cheesy sentimentality, we get 
Bruce Willis acting like a highly amusing jerk and Lily Tomlin delivering 
lines in a hilarious dead-pan style. Yet just as I was getting my hopes up, 
and thinking maybe this would be quite an entertaining movie, Audrey Wells 
("George of the Jungle") lays on the schmaltz in the last half like she was 
storing it up, hoping to kill us with one big blast. As I sat there, reeling 
from blow after blow (everything from childhood redemption against bullies 
to cute little puppy dogs named Chester), two thoughts were flying through 
my mind: "how could a movie change so drastically in five minutes?" and "why 
did Bruce allow this to happen?"
Speaking of Bruce, he turns in one of his most deadpan performances to date. 
By that I mean for the entire first half of the film, he shows next to no 
emotion. This may not sound great to everyone, but it's a comfortable, 
familiar style coming from Willis. The problem comes in the second half when 
he is asked to act in a way he has never acted before, jubilant and happy. 
Saying things like "Holy Smokes" just doesn't seem like Bruce, and he 
actually looks pained when saying it. Newcomer Spencer Breslin gives an 
adequate turn as Bruce's most recent adolescent co-star, but he's no Haley 
Joel Osment. The two standout performances come from Lily Tomlin ("Tea With 
Mussolini"), as mentioned earlier, and Emily Mortimer ("Scream 3") as 
Bruce's perfect foil. Mortimer pulls off an amazing feat, she acts bubbly 
and happy with enough restraint to avoid becoming irritating. The only 
problem I had with her character was that Wells underused her to the point 
where we developed no attachment to the character except to hate Bruce for 
being mean to her. Watch for Jean Smart (From back in the days of "Designing 
Women") in a strange supporting role as a television anchor-woman that Bruce 
unwillingly gives advice to.
I wasn't entirely sure how to write this review, because by the end I'd 
gotten the distinct impression I'd witnessed two very different movies. One 
was fun and entertaining, the other was irritating and schmaltzy. I decided 
the first half earned a four star rating and the second earned a two, so it 
averaged out to a three overall. I would have been tempted to give it a 
three and a half if it weren't for the fact that (this is a minor spoiler 
folks, read no further if you don't want to know anything about the movie) 
nothing is really explained in the end. We get some sort of weird, quasi, 
psuedo-explanation involving the future and a bi-plane, but that hardly 
qualifies. In fact, Jon Turteltaub ("Instinct") doesn't do much to explain 
things here. He throws an occasional sci-fi like scene of a '50s airport 
diner vanishing into thin air into the mix just to spice things up, but he 
doesn't even attempt to explain how all the events portrayed were made 
possible. Another point to mark against "The Kid" is the irritating score by 
Marc Shaiman ("South Park: Bigger, Longer, and Uncut"). The music blasts 
throughout the theater in a deeply dramatic fashion all the time, even when 
dramatic music isn't needed. "The Kid" runs a little too long at 104 
minutes, and I'd recommend it only to die hard Bruce Willis fans and to 
those interested in seeing a younger talent on the rise in Emily Mortimer. 
For a lack of any explanation for how the events in the movie occurred and 
for a very Disney like second half I give it three out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Way of the Gun, The (2000)
Directed by: Christopher McQuarrie
Written by: Christopher McQuarrie
Mr. Parker (Ryan Phillippe) and Mr. Longbaugh (Benicio Del Toro) are two 
lazy fellows who spend their days unemployed and making cash off petty theft 
and trips to the sperm bank (I think their names were an homage to 
Tarantino's "Reservoir Dogs"). One day they hear about a woman, Robin 
(Juliette Lewis), who is carrying the child of a millionaire named Chidduck 
(Scott Wilson). So, the two decide to kidnap Robin and ransom her back to 
Chidduck for fifteen million dollars. The catch is, Chidduck works with the 
mob and soon has his army of goons, led by the world weary Joe Sarno (James 
Caan), after our daring duo. So the two and their kidnappee are now on the 
run, and right on their tails are Sarno, Chidduck's two chief bodyguards 
(Taye Diggs, Nicky Katt), and a young doctor named Allen Painter (Dylan 
Kussman), who may be more than just Robin's doctor. In the meantime, 
everyone is backstabbing everyone. One of the bodyguards, Jeffers (Taye 
Diggs), is sleeping with Chidduck's wife, Francesca (Kristin Lehman); Allen 
Painter is plotting against everyone; and Sarno has a personal interest in 
the affair and is willing to kill anyone for his own inscrutable purposes. 
In fact, the only people who aren't scheming are Parker and Longbaugh.
Sound a little confusing? Well that's because it is. Yet nearly every fault 
with Christopher McQuarrie's (writer of the brilliantly twisted "The Usual 
Suspects") "Way of the Gun" can be attributed to one man: the editor, 
Stephen Semel (he also edited "Three to Tango", which explains a lot). "Way 
of the Gun" is a good movie which could have been a lot better if about a 
half hour of its running time had been cut out. The film starts off with a 
bang, as our two protagonists get mobbed in a fight for sitting on a guy's 
car. After the rather long opening credits it stays interesting as the duo 
plans the kidnapping and then carries it out. Yet just as I was getting my 
hopes up things start to lag - a lot. So my hopes began tumbling through the 
floor, and things pick up again. Then come crashing back down. You get the 
general trend here? This keeps happening till the film's climax, which 
actually managed to run longer than the climax to "What Lies Beneath". The 
climax, while entertaining, wears out its welcome after about fifteen 
minutes (yes, it's that long). Then, finally, after this roller-coaster ride 
of a movie, the film just sort of stops. I was starting to think Hollywood 
writers, particularly an intelligent Oscar winner like McQuarrie, had 
learned how to end a movie. Guess I was wrong.
"Way of the Gun" does feature an impressively large and talented cast. 
Leading the cast is Ryan Phillippe ("Cruel Intentions"), who I usually think 
has about as much acting talent as your average parking meter. Yet he proves 
me wrong here, giving an adequate performance which might even have 
qualified as good if it wasn't held up next to Benicio Del Toro's ("The 
Usual Suspect") performance for comparison. Del Toro gives an awe inspring 
turn and I only hope he is recognized by at least one awards committee out 
there at year's end. Next up we have Juliette Lewis ("What's Eating Gilbert 
Grape"), playing the film's only truly sane character. She does a good job 
with her speaking lines, but her portrayal of a pregnant woman just doesn't 
work. I've seen pregnant women walk, even women due to give birth at any 
time, and they don't waddle around like large penguins. James Caan ("Mickey 
Blue Eyes") does a surprisingly good job as the bag man, Sarno. Taye Diggs, 
who was the very definition of cool in "Go" plays a similar, though far 
colder character here. The only weak link (but what a weak link it is) is 
Dylan Kussman ("Dead Poets Society"). It doesn't help that this guy gets the 
film's only really bad dialogue (a monologue about how his life turned out), 
but I think he could have made even the best dialogue sound like your 
average highschool playwright wrote it. Nicky Katt ("Boiler Room") is given 
very little screen time as the other bodyguard, but watch for a quick 
appearance by SNL's Sarah Silverman as a raving girlfriend.
Let me first cover the things that really work in "Way of the Gun". First, 
the dialogue is quite wonderful. McQuarrie's dialogue in "The Usual 
Suspects" was good (who doesn't know the line about the greatest trick of 
the devil?), but some of the dialogue in this film puts it to shame. One of 
my favorite lines was: "You wanna know what I'm gonna tell god when I meet 
him? I'm gonna tell him I was framed." There's also a great scene where 
Parker, Longbaugh, and Robin sit down to play hearts. Longbaugh and Parker 
explain the rules to Robin, but everything they say has an intentional 
double meaning about her situation. "Do you understand the game?" Parker 
coldly asks, and Robin breaks down crying. Second, the story is strangely 
interesting, if a little bizarre. No, I don't mean interesting like, "Gee, 
I've never seen a building fall down like that before." I mean McQuarrie 
takes what could have been a basic kidnapping story and turns it into a 
clever, Tarantinoesque tale where everyone is plotting against everyone, and 
there's a surprise waiting around every turn. Finally, the film's score, by 
composer Joe Kraemer, is a wonderful blend of Spanish style music; soothing, 
slow segments; and fierce melodies used during the many gun fights.
On the downside, we obviously have the editing. All I can figure is the film 
was made and released before Stephen Semel even had a clue what was going 
on. I don't mean the movie was poorly edited, I mean it appears to have 
skipped the editing process entirely. The film also suffers from a fairly 
poor ending. Not only does it go on far too long, but the gunfights go from 
being interesting and even realistically made, to tedious and video game 
like. This becomes even more true when a group of bag men show up at the 
film's end for no other purpose than to act as human targets. Last we have 
McQuarrie's direction. Was it bad? No, it was actually rather promising. 
However, this being his first time in the director's chair, his inexperience 
is painfully obvious in the way he paces the film. So, while I enjoyed "Way 
of the Gun", I have no desire to see it again. If you are interested in 
seeing it, I'd suggest catching a matinee or waiting for video (given its 
poor performance at the box office it shouldn't take long to get there. The 
film runs far too long at 119 minutes, which could easily have been cut to 
100 if not 90. I give it three and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
CAST
Trey Parker, Matt Stone and Mary Kay Bergman perform almost all the voices
The is perhaps the first time I have ever been tempted to walk out of a movie,
go to the box office, and demand half of my money back. The first half is
really quite hysterical, and is very true to the television show (which I am a
fan of). The second half, on the other hand, is awful. It spends the entire
time attempting to insult everyone on the planet, and doing little else. I must
say though, I think the film did pull off its goal in this department.
The plot revolves around Stan, Kyle, Cartmen, and Kenny (of course) sneaking
into an R rated movie which stars their favorites Canadian television stars
Terrence and Phillip. They come out of the film knowing a whole slew of bad
words, which they proceed to use quite often in front of everyone including
their parents. The parents (led by Kyle's mother) immediately blame the
Canadians for this, and before you know it Canada and the US are at war.
Meanwhile, Kenny, who died earlier of course, is down in hell with Satan and
Satan's new lover, Saddam Hussein. The two of them are planning on taking over
the earth, which will be made possible by the war above them for some reason.
Kenny hears of these plans and tries to warn the others.
I think the main problem here, is that Trey Parker and Matt Stone are used to
writing 30 minute television shows. In thirty minutes, they can throw in a
thousand jokes and keep you laughing throughout the entire thing. Here, rather
than simply spreading the jokes out a little thinner and keeping the audience
at least chuckling through the film, they cram them all into the first 45
minutes or so. This of course makes those 45 minutes hilarious, but then the
laughs suddenly stop. The theatre I was in was nearly silent for the entire
last half of the movie.
I've heard people say that the film was blunt and honest, and said things that
needed to be said. For the life of me, I can't think of what any of these
things were. The only part that I thought was truly honest, and made sense was
the little jab at the MPAA rating system. I believe the line was something like
"they can have as much gore and violence as they want in movies, as long as
they don't use any naughty words." I'd also better warn all you conservatives
out there. Unless you can really take a joke well, stay far away from this
film.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
Directed by: Stephen Frears
Written by: Nick Hornby (novel), D.V. DeVincentis
Thinking back over all the horrible relationships you've had, could you rank
them in order of how painful they were? Rob Gordon, wonderfully played by
John Cusack ("Grosse Point Blank", "Being John Malkovich"), is capable of
ranking not only his worst relationships, but everything else for that
matter. Rob ranks his favorite songs, albums, movies, performers, and
anything else he can think of. Rob then proceeds to explain to the camera
and the audience why he has ranked things in such a way. I've always felt
that John Cusack was one of the more underappreciated comic actors of our
time, and he has only recently begun to be recognized by audiences and
critics. I was pleased to find that "High Fidelity" gives him the
oppurtunity to really display his comic talents.
Rob Gordon runs a record store called Champion Vinyl with his two employees,
the obnoxious Barry (Jack Black) and the meek Dick (Todd Louiso). Rob has
just been dumped by the light of his life, Laura (Iben Hjejle), and he isn't
handling it particularly well. He now spends his time relating his past
miserable experiences to the camera and trying to determine just where he
went wrong. The thing really driving Rob nuts is that Laura left him for a
guy named Ian (Tim Robbins), or Roy - he's never quite sure which name the
guy goes by. His sister, Liz (Joan Cusack), is first sympethetic to Rob's
problems, but eventually gives up on him. Rob decides to revisit his five
worst breakups to determine where exactly he went wrong in each
relationship.
There's something about "High Fidelity" which is strangely endearing. It may
be Cusack's performance as a man almost everyone can relate to in some way;
or it might be the interesting narrative style used throughout the film.
However, I'm sure it has more to do with Cusack's Rob being such a
sympathetic character, despite the way he acts at times. Certainly one of
the film's greatest features is the wonderful soundtrack (what do you expect
in a movie about a record store). Stephen Frears ("Mary Reilly") manages to
use music of just about every type, each song chosen to perfectly accompany
the scene in which it is used. Speaking of music, Jack Black ("The Jackal",
"Enemy of the State") is given a musical number near the end of the film
that makes me believe the man maybe in the wrong line of work.
If you're going into "High Fidelity" expecting a laugh-out-loud movie like
"There's Something About Mary", you're in for a disappointment. While there
are one or two truly hilarious scenes (the confrontation between Ian and
Rob, for example), the majority of the film is one you can't help but
chuckle at all the way through. The characters are all eccentric and at
least mildly amusing, except for Jack Black's character, Barry, who is an
absolute riot. I'm not sure why Black has been hiding out in minor roles for
the past seven years, but someone has to hand that man a leading role in
something. As for the rest of the cast, Joan Cusack and Tim Robbins are both
sadly underused, though newcomer Iben Hjejle is given plenty of screen time
in which to shine. Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lili Taylor, and even Bruce
Springsteen all show up in what amount to cameos.
"High Fidelity" is certainly a fun movie, but it's far from perfect. The
romantic elements are sometimes a bit overused, which leaves the film
humorless at times. The movie also runs a bit too long at 113 minutes, with
the last fifteen being almost unnecessary (except Black's musical number).
If you're a fan of John Cusack, I would certainly recommend this movie. If
you're one of those rare individuals who doesn't care for him, "High
Fidelity" just might make you a fan of his. I'm not sure if the soundtrack
is out yet, but if it is I'd recommend picking it up. One last thing I
wanted to note, I'm not sure what Frears believes Chicago is like, but I
could have sworn there were more people living there than we see here. I'd
recommend "High Fidelity" to just about anyone (unless you dislike comedies,
of course) and give it four out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
Did you ever hear the one about the Priest and the Rabbi? You did, huh? Well
I promise you never heard it quite like this before. Okay I'm lying. That
may be what I want to say, but Edward Norton's "Keeping the Faith" is a good
natured, and at times very amusing little comedy which suffers from a lack
of originality. In fact, the biggest thing this movie has going for it are
the performances from the two lead actors. Don't get me wrong, "Keeping The
Faith" contains a few hilarious scenes, but a lot of the comedy feels like
its been done a thousand times over. For example, how many times have you
seen a person in a movie ask to be punched to show how tough they are, only
to collapse when actually hit; or seen a rabbi pass out the first time he
sees a circumcision? Strangely, the lack of originality doesn't ruin the
movie. Because the film is so pleasant natured the rehash of past comic bits
makes it feel comfortable and familiar.
Father Brian Finn (Edward Norton) and Rabbi Jacob Schram (Ben Stiller) have
been friends since childhood, and they've both always known exactly what
they wanted to do with their lives. As children their best friend was Anna
Reilly (Jenna Elfman), who acted just like one of the boys. Now, twelve
years since they last saw Anna, she shows up as a career driven business
woman. Jacob, whose congregation has been trying to set him up with someone
for months, finds himself falling for Anna and she for him. The two decide
to get together, but without telling Brian for fear of alienating him. As
Anna falls further and further in love with Jacob, Jacob begins alienating
himself from Anna. He is afraid that his mother (Anne Bancroft) will disown
him, as she did his brother, for falling for a non-Jew.
I must admit, I was impressed by Edward Norton's abilities as a director,
this being his first time behind the camera. Not only is the man an
incredible actor, but he is now showing talent in other areas as well? Does
this strike anyone else as being a little unfair? Okay, I'm done being
Jealous. "Keeping the Faith" is a rare sort of movie these days. It's a
wholesome yet still highly amusing romantic comedy. When was the last time
you saw a movie made for people over the age of 10 which didn't contain some
act of extreme violence or blatant, explicit sexuality? Okay, my sermon is
now done with as well. I'm sorry about getting so preachy, but I just saw a
movie about a priest and a rabbi, what do you expect? Speaking of getting
preachy, I will say that "Keeping the Faith" has a tendency to do just that
from time to time; but not nearly as much as it could have considering the
film's topic.
Edward Norton may be a very gifted actor, but he obviously has no problem
taking a back seat to other actors. In fact, one of the problems I had with
this movie was that Norton's character is never given the amount of screen
time he deserved. Brian Finn could have been a very interesting character
but is never developed to that point. Ben Stiller's character, Rabbi Jacob,
on the other hand, is given ample screen time. Ben Stiller, previously seen
in the funny but overrated "There's Something About Mary", and the sadly
underrated "Mystery Men", is an actor who is capable of switching from
over-the-top physical comedy to serious acting in a split second. In this
movie he finally given the chance to shine as he has so deserved. The last
bit of casting, Jenna Elfman (Dharma and Greg), was a very poor decision in
my opinion. I have never found Jenna Elfman to be a particularly gifted
actress, and in this case she is asked to carry half the film with her
limited talents (she's also a good two or three inches taller than Stiller,
but that's beside the point).
Besides the somewhat dubious casting of Miss Elfman in a leading role here,
there is one more thing which makes "Keeping the Faith" a good film rather
than a great one. I've always said an important part of a movie is the
soundtrack, and that couldn't be more true in this case. Not only is there
very little music, but when the music is present, it is nearly always
inappropriate for the scene. Watch for Milos Forman (Director of "One Flew
Over the Cuckoo's Nest") in a supporting role as Norton's mentor. Anne
Bancroft ("The Graduate") is perfectly cast as Stiller's mother, but Ron
Rifkin ("Boiler Room") is unfortunately underused as an elder member of
Stiller's congregation. "Keeping the Faith" runs a little too long at 125
minutes. I recommend it to fans of Ben Stiller and romantic comedies in
general and give the film three and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
In a Hollywood slowly growing devoid of original ideas, the current trend is to
remake the movies of old. How the 1958 Vincent Price vehicle "House on Haunted
Hill" was ever chosen for a remake will remain a mystery. While the original
film was a fun, cheesy, "b" horror movie, the remake only possesses one of
those qualities. I'll allow you to guess to which one I refer.
Steven Price (Geoffrey Rush) is a multi-millionaire, who has acquired his
fortune by creating a series of terrifying amusement parks. His wife, Evelyn
(Famke Janssen), is utterly miserable in their marriage, but remains with her
husband for his money. Her latest idea for how to spend his cash, is to rent an
old, abandoned mental institute and hold a party. Steven, however, has
different plans. Inviting four strangers in place of Evelyn's chosen guests
(Taye Diggs, Ali Larter, Bridgette Wilson, Peter Gallagher), Steven offers one
million dollars to anyone who can survive a night in the house.
It will forever remain a mystery to me, how great actors are occasionally drawn
to horrible scripts. Geoffrey Rush acts terrifically in almost anything he is
cast in. Here, however, he so shamelessly overacts that you'll find your teeth
grinding whenever a word comes out of his mouth. The other actors are uniformly
terrible, the only exception being Chris Kattan (A Night at the Roxbury) as the
owner of the house, who is given the film's few funny lines, and seems to
realize what a terrible movie he's in.
I try to find something positive in every movie I see, so here goes. Chris
Kattan's performance is one of the few hightlights here, along with three or
four truly eerie scenes in the first 45 minutes of the movie. Among them, a
scene in which a long dead doctor's ghost begins stalking one of the
characters, and where an angry spirit flies from a corner at a character with a
video camera. The amusement park rides shown during Steven Price's introduction
are quite entertaining, as well. 
Now, onto the majority of the movie. The characters here, with the exception of
Kattan's Watson Pritchett and Rush's Steven Price, possess no character
whatsoever. A character dies, and all one can think is "who was that?" while
blood covers the screen. The story attempts one or two shocking moments, though
they can be predicted far in advance. Speaking of predictable events, when the
characters were first introduced, I was able to pick out the survivors right
away.
As I said, there are a few eerie parts in the movie, but just as these begin to
show promise, the last 45 minutes of the film turn into one long, boring chase
scene for no apparent reason. I normally don't give away plot points like this,
but I felt obliged to point the following out. The effects are, for the most
part, rather well done, but the chase scene which is the film's finale offers
one of the most moronic looking ghosts I have ever seen. 
If you're desperate for another haunted house movie, I reccomend seeing the
original version of "House on Haunted Hill" or the original "The Haunting". If
you feel like dishonoring Vincent Price's memory, go ahead and catch this.
Otherwise, I reccomend everyone steer clear. "The House on Haunted Hill" runs
too long at 115 minutes. I grant it a charitable two stars.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
Every now and then a movie comes out which is directed entirely at one
audience. I'm not talking about a film like "Hanging Up", which is directed
entirely at middle aged women; or "The Beach", which has a target audience
comprised only of teenage girls. I mean that the target audience of Sandra
Bullock's "28 Days" must be people who are, or have been, addicted to
alcohol, drugs, or sex. At least this is the conclusion I've reached since I
have never been addicted to anything, and I got almost nothing from this
film. I think if you have been an addict at some point in your life, the
trials of a woman going through rehab would have some meaning for you. That
isn't to say "28 Days" doesn't have its share of funny moments for the rest
of us, but the majority of the film will most likely mean nothing to you.
Gwen Cummings (Sandra Bullock) was always the life of the party. She and her
boyfriend, Jasper (Dominic West), lead lives which consist of drinking hard,
sleeping in late, and forgetting about the previous evening's activities.
However, when she ruins her sister's (Elizabeth Perkins) wedding and smashes
a limo into some poor soul's house, she is sentenced to twenty eight days of
rehab. While in rehab she meets a host of unusual fellow addicts like Eddie
(Viggo Mortensen), a major league ball player who is addicted to cocaine and
sex; and Gerhardt (Alan Tudyk), a gay, German stripper who is addicted to
god only knows what. She also meets her therapist, Cornell (an oddly sane
Steve Buscemi), who is a recovered compulsive gambler and drug addict. While
she is convinced she has no problem at first, it slowly dawns on Gwen that
she may have a strong addiction afterall.
There were a couple of things about "28 Days" that I liked. First of all, I
thought Sandra Bullock did a great job in her first leading role in some
time. After a series of flops ("Forces of Nature", "Hope Floats") she needed
to show that she could carry a movie on her shoulders alone (though I may
have enjoyed it, I must admit that "Gun Shy" was not the movie needed to
revive her career). Second, the humor may fall flat most of the time, but
there is an occasional truly hilarious scene. Now, besides the fact that the
movie clearly wasn't directed at a person like me, there are a few other
things working against "28 Days". First, the soundtrack does nothing for the
film. Filled with high spirited songs, everything played throughout the
movie felt totally out of place. Second, flashbacks are shot in a confused,
disjointed home video style which doesn't add anything. Third, I've seen few
movies that have underdeveloped their characters to such an extent. For
example, Steve Buscemi plays what could have been a very interesting
character, but he is given almost no screen time.
As for the cast, the supporting actors would probably have done just fine if
given more to work with. Steve Buscemi shows that he can play a normal
character as opposed to the psychopaths he plays in "Reservoir Dogs" and
"Fargo". Viggo Mortensen ("Crimson Tide", "G.I. Jane") nicely underplays his
part as Gwen's potential love interest, but again, he is given very little
screen time. The funniest supporting actor is certainly Alan Tudyk ("Patch
Adams"), who shamelessly overacts, but in such a hilarious way that it is
easy to forgive. As good as these actors may be, they can do nothing with
these roles because we are given no information about the characters except
that they have all been addicted to something at some point in their lives.
As far as direction goes, Betty Thomas ("Doctor Doolittle", "Private Parts")
keeps the film strangely frantic in pacing. For example, Gwen ends up in
rehab about eight minutes into the movie, before we get to know anything
about her. You can also add "28 Days" to that ever growing list of movies
that don't exactly end, but just sort of stop in mid scene. I suppose the
only people I can recommend this movie to are recovered or recovering
alcoholics and former drug addicts. I can't quite recommend it to fans of
Sandra Bullock since she has certainly had better material to work with in
the past. Go rent "Speed" or "Demolition Man" (yes, I like "Demolition Man")
unless you're dying for a chick flick. "28 Days" runs only 103 minutes, but
it feels quite a bit longer. I give it three out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Ready to Rumble (2000)
Walking into "Ready to Rumble", the new film from Hollywood's biggest
goofball, David Arquette ("Scream", those annoying 1-800-call-ATT
commercials), I figured there were two possibilities for this movie. It was
going to be stupid, the previews had already given that much away. The
question now, was whether it was going to be the sort of stupid which you
can't help but chuckle at, or the just plain moronic kind. It turns out that
the movie has a little of both. While there are a lot of faults, there are
also one or two really funny scenes and a few others you can't help but find
amusing no matter how low brow they might be. However, the film's biggest
problem is the premise itself. How can one make a movie that pokes fun at
professional wrestling when wrestling already pokes fun at itself?
Gordie (David Arquette) and Sean (Scott Caan) have only one great love in
their lives. This all consuming passion is professional wrestling, and
specifically worship for their idol, Jimmy "The King" King (Oliver Platt).
They have just obtained tickets to the latest match between The King and
Diamond Dallas Page (Page Falkinburg). They are horrified to find that
King's manager, Titus Sinclair (Joe Pantoliano), has rigged the match so
that King will not only lose, but will be ejected from the wrestling circuit
forever. Now Gordie and Sean have only one purpose in life: to get The King
his crown back. However, they soon discover that their idol may not be all
they thought he was, and professional wrestling may be *gasp* fake afterall!
When I said there are one or two really funny scenes in this movie I wasn't
kidding. Fortunately, there are enough mildly amusing scenes to make up for
this. The interesting thing is that, the best part of this movie isn't the
comedy, it's the massive wrestling match at the film's end. The problem with
this is that it's a long, and at times very dull, trip to that payoff.
Another problem is that while the majority of the jokes may fall flat, at
least the actors are trying their best to pull something out of them.
However, at other times the movie seems to be trying to convey some message
about wrestlers and their fans and this not only doesn't work, but seriously
detracts from the rest of the film. I suppose this is because anything
serious seems completely out of place in a movie this goofy.
As for the actors, I've never really cared for David Arquette. He may have
been somewhat entertaining in the "Scream" films, but I think this is
because Wes Craven kept him tightly reined in. Otherwise, he has a tendancy
to overact to the point where the audience expects him to rip out of the
screen and start bouncing off the walls. Scott Caan ("Boiler Room", "Black
and White") hasn't appeared in much till now, but he turns in a remarkably
restrained performance considering his co-star. As for Oliver Platt ("Lake
Placid"), whom I consider one of the better comic actors working in
Hollywood, he is woefully miscast as a professional wrestler. The problem
is, Platt is not particularly tall, rather overweight, and about as vicious
looking as a small dog. Being surrounded by real wrestlers, like Bill
Goldberg throughout the movie, only makes him look more ridiculous in this
role.
"Ready to Rumble" has a typical soundtrack for this type of movie. It's
filled with popular alternative music, and it was certainly a welcome change
from the constant rap soundtracks I've been hearing lately. Brian Robbins
("Varsity Blues") doesn't exactly seem to be directing this movie. He simply
seems to be allowing the actors to do whatever they feel like to try and get
a laugh out of Stephen Brill's ("The Mighty Ducks") rather weak script. I'm
not sure if this was a good idea, but keeping David Arquette under control
certainly couldn't have hurt the film. "Ready to Rumble" runs far too long
at 122 minutes, and should have been no more than 95. I'd recommend "Ready
to Rumble" to wrestling fans since they will most likely recognize a few
familiar faces and give it three out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
 Directed by: Anthony Minghella
 Written by: Patricia Highsmith (novel), Anthony Minghella
"No matter what you've done, no matter how terrible, no one ever thinks that
they're a bad person." These words are uttered by Mr. Tom Ripley, played
perfectly by Matt Damon. The line perfectly sums up the kind of character
Ripley is. Looking back over several of Damon's previous films, one realizes
that while he has always done admirably, he has also been overshadowed by even
greater co-stars. In "Good Will Hunting", Robin Williams stole the glory, and
in "Rounders", audiences were so mesmerized by Edward Norton, that Damon was
overlooked. Here, Damon is able to display his considerable acting talents
without fear of being upstaged
Tom Ripley openly admits that he has three talents: forging signatures, lying,
and impersonating people. When Herbert Greenleaf (James Rebhorn) hires Tom to
go to Italy and bring his wayward son, Dickie (Jude Law), home, Tom puts these
talents to use. Tom soon becomes best buddies with Dickie and his fiancee Marge
(Gwyneth Paltrow). Tom soon becomes so obsessed with the lifestyle he now
lives, that after an "accident" on a boating trip claims Dickie's life, he
decides the best course of action would be to assume Dickie's identity. This
soon has him sinking deeper and deeper into the pits of depravity as he
attempts to keep his lie alive.
"The Talented Mister Ripley" is perhaps the type of film Hitchcock would have
made, were he a director in the '90s rather than the '50s and '60s. Beautifully
shot in Italy, a rather eerie sense lingers behind each scene, even before
Ripley changes. The main difference between this film and a Hitchcock piece is
the so-called subtext. This is most likely due more to the changing times than
to any directing or writing style. If this had been made by Hitchcock, the most
subtext that would have been present would perhaps have been Gwyneth Paltrow's
line: "It's a good thing we're not getting married soon, or else we'd have to
take Tom with us on the honeymoon". In this tale, made for '90s audiences, Tom
is blatantly homosexual, as are several other characters. Whether this should
be viewed as a fault or not is entirely at the discretion of the viewer.
The acting here is truly something to behold. As I've already said, Damon is
amazing, but the entire supporting cast is excellent as well. Jude Law in
particular delivers a particularly amazing performance. Gwyneth Paltrow nicely
underplays the role of the only person who doesn't believe Tom, and Phillip
Seymore Hoffman is perfect as a friend of Dickie's who begins to suspect
everything is not as it seems. Cate Blanchett is unfortunately underused in the
role of a woman who believes Tom is Dickie. Also look for an entertaining
appearance by Phillip Baker Hall as a hard boiled detective.
One of the film's largest flaws is the running time. At 139 minutes things
really do tend to drag, particularly at the beginning where perhaps a bit too
much time is spent setting the plot into motion and introducing the characters.
However, this is the film equivalent of a good "page turner" of a novel. It
does a great job of holding your interest, making you wonder how Tom is going
to get out of each situation created by his lie. An enjoyable film overall,
though far from flawless, I give "The Talented Mr. Ripley" four stars and a
recommendation to try and catch a matinee.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
The ability to suspend ones disbelief is a vital trait when attending a
Schwarzengger movie. However, due to the absence of a good film from the big
Austrian for quite some time, people seem to have forgotten this. The biggest
complaint I hear about "End of Days" is that it was unbelievable. I'm sorry,
but I personally believe it is incredibly naive to expect Arnold to appear in a
realistic film.
Twenty years ago, a newborn girl was chosen by a Satanic cult to be the one who
would bear the child of Satan. Now, young Christine (Robin Tunney) is grown up
and is being stalked by three different groups: Two church factions, one intent
on killing her; and the other, led by Father Kovak (Rod Steiger), attempting to
protect and hide her; the third party is Satan himself, possessing the body of
a Wall Street banker (Gabriel Byrne). Drawn into the conflict are Jericho Cane
(Arnold Schwarzenegger) and Chicago (Kevin Pollak), two bodyguards hired by the
man they do not know to be Satan. As Cane is drawn deeper and deeper into the
conflict, he learns that Christine must not be impregnated or the world will
come to an end. 
If you don't like Arnold movies, chances are you already know to steer clear of
this one. If this somehow hasn't occured to you, let me reassure you that this
is a Schwarzenegger film in the truest sense, so stay far away. Being a typical
film of the Schwarzenegger genre, this movie is a whole lot of fun, but be sure
to leave your brain and sense of logic at the door. There are more plot holes
here than I can begin to count. This movie isn't about plot though. It's about
fight scenes, explosions and special effects. These are certainly present in
abundance.
On the down side, the acting here is certainly less than phenomenal from the
leads. As all know, Arnold isn't going to get any Oscar nominations in the near
future. However, he is charismatic enough to get away with this. Robin Tunney,
on the other hand, is likely to get nominated for at least one award, and
that's the Razzie. Not only is she laughably bad in this role, but she looks
utterly dumbfounded as to what she's supposed to be doing half the time. As for
the rest of the cast, Rod Steiger is as good as ever; Kevin Pollak is certainly
in his element as a smart alec of a side-kick; and CCH Pounder, a remarkable
actress, is woefully underused as a police detective. The real standout
performance here comes from Gabriel Byrne as The Man (this is how he's
credited) himself. Byrne simply oozes charm and authority. Watch for a scene in
which he meets a skateboarder who disrespects him.
"End of Days" is mindless movie fun nearly at its best. It doesn't quite make
it because the film does border on being too mindless at times. Some of the
scenes we are expected to swallow will have you gawking at the screen in
disbelief (such as how Cane discovers the existence of Christine). If you think
you can get past this, just sit back, relax, and enjoy. "End of Days" runs a
touch too long at 120 minutes. I give it three and a half stars, and a
recommendation to catch a matinee.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)
It's 1881, and the royal Princess Pei Pei (Lucy Liu) has fled her home
in China's Forbidden City to visit the west. Unfortunately she has
been kidnapped, and the ransom has been set at one hundred thousand
pieces of gold. Three royal guards have been sent to America to
deliver the gold.  Accompanying them is Chon Wang (Jackie Chan), a
guard who is not particularly popular among his people for reasons
never explained to us.  As Wang's group heads toward Carson City to
deliver the gold, their train is robbed by the surfer like Roy
O'Bannon (Owen Wilson) and his gang of rather brain dead thugs. Wang
is seperated from the other guards. He forms an unlikely alliance with
O'Bannon in an attempt to rescue the princess on his own. Accompanying
the two very different men are Wang's new wife, Falling Leaf (Brandon
Merrill), who turns out to be an expert marksman, and a horse who can
follow commands better than any dog. Against them are a group of
renegade lawmen led by the evil, blood-thirsty Marshall Van Cleef
(Xander Berkeley) and a former Chinese warrior (Roger Yuan), who now
runs a labor camp.
As everyone knows, Jackie Chan movies are not held to the same
standard as most other films. Chan's films are present for no other
reason than to entertain with slapstick humor and amazing acts of
physical dexterity.  I'm happy to say that on both counts, "Shanghai
Noon" delivers. Does that mean this is a great film? No, of course
not. A Jackie Chan movie can never be classified as great. "Shanghai
Noon" Is really nothing more than goofy, mindless fluff that audience
members will forget days after viewing.  Does that mean there's
nothing deep and meaningful about this movie? Frankly, yes. The
subject of the treatment of Chinese workers in the old west is touched
upon briefly; but you'll be pleased to hear that the remainder of the
film is devoted entirely to Jackie Chan and Owen Wilson acting like
goofballs, and the two get some great goofball scenes together. Two of
the funniest ones are where they have to escape from a jail cell, and
another where they play a rather bizarre drinking game in a whore
house.
Jackie Chan has been called the Buster Keaton of the '90s. At first I
didn't believe this to be an accurate statement, since many of his
older films ("Rumble in the Bronx" in particular) are a little more
serious.  However, after the release of "Rush Hour" two years ago,
Chan has shown himself to be quite the comedian. While physical comedy
is obviously his forte, Chan is also a master of hysterical facial
expressions. Watch his face in a scene where tomahawks are being
hurled at him. On the other hand, Owen Wilson ("The Haunting") is
great at dialogue driven comedy. He is given some of the movie's best
lines like, "Stop it! We're men, we're not pinatas." Yet despite some
great comical moments, I had a hard time seeing Wilson as anything
more than a surfer stuck in the old west. Chan and Wilson obviously
make up the majority of the film, with the other characters amounting
to little more than props. Lucy Liu ("Play it to the Bone") gives a
strangely subdued performance and hardly appears in the
picture. Xander Berkely ("Gattaca") is strangely amusing, rather than
scary, considering the type of character he is supposed to be playing.
Okay everyone, you're obviously going to see "Shanghai Noon" to watch
Jackie Chan do some amazing acrobatics using all sorts of
scenery. Thankfully there is quite a bit more action here than was
present in "Rush Hour". He also gets some interesting props to work
with: like a horseshoe tied to a rope; a pair of antlers sans moose;
and in a rather amazing scene, a few pine trees.  It's also a lot of
fun watching Chan's old fashion warrior try and use a six shooter for
the first time. The movie's main faults come from some interesting
minor characters being given no screen time. Brandon Merrill's
character is especially interesting, but she appears in the film for
no more than two minutes at a time. Another problem is a gratingly bad
soundtrack, which doesn't fit the movie in any way. The movie ends
with Chan's trademark outtakes which were some of the funniest I've
seen from one of his movies.  Also, watch for an appearance by
"Revenge of the Nerds" star Curtis Armstrong. "Shanghai Noon" runs a
bit too long at 110 minutes, when Chan's movies should always stick to
a 90 minute running time. I'd recommend the film to anyone who enjoyed
"Rush Hour" and give it three and a half out of five stars.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to:
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at either: http://www.dependentfilms.net or
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
Betty Sizemore (Renee Zellweger) is a waitress obsessed with a soap opera 
called "A Reason to Love". Who can blame her for dreaming of another life 
when she's stuck with a dead-end job and a husband, Del (Aaron Eckhart), who 
couldn't care less about her? One evening, her husband comes home with two 
associates, Wesley and Charlie (Chris Rock, Morgan Freeman), not knowing 
that Betty is still in the house. It turns out these associates are actually 
there to reclaim stolen drugs from Del. After Del is killed, and Betty 
witnesses the event, she becomes so traumatized that her mind convinces her 
she is actually living in the world of her soap opera, and she is engaged to 
the lead character, Dr. David Ravell (Greg Kinnear). So she leaves a message 
for Del, telling him she had to leave (her brain refuses to admit he's 
dead), and heads for Los Angeles, where Dr. Ravell works at Loma Vista 
hospital. Of course, Dr. David Ravell is actually an actor named George 
McCord, and Loma Vista hospital is only a set, but Betty's traumatized mind 
has no idea. Meanwhile, Charlie and Wesley find out that Betty saw 
everything, and they head after her. Wesley just wants the job over with, 
but Charlie's mind soon becomes as warped as Betty's, and he becomes 
convinced she is really the perfect woman for him.
After a summer filled with useless movies, "Nurse Betty" is like a breath of 
fresh air. Just as I was getting ready to write 2000 off as the worst year 
for comic movies (actually, for movies in general) ever, along comes this 
little gem. Big surprise, it came from USA Films; the same company that 
brought us "Being John Malkovich". While the film certainly isn't your 
traditional comedy, it has a nice blend of laugh out loud bits and a great 
many chuckles. Now, you have to like your humor a little on the unusual side 
to enjoy this movie. In fact, throughout the film, all I could think about 
was how much it felt like a Coen brothers movie. Just like the Coens' 
excellent "The Big Lebowski", this is a movie made great and entertaining by 
its sheer variety of eccentric characters. Is it as funny as the Coens' 
film? No, but the dude is a tough act to follow. Yet in its own way, "Nurse 
Betty" succeeds admirably. By the way, if you love gross-out humor you're 
going to the wrong movie. This is one that's made for the rest of us 
(finally). In other words, it's fairly intelligent fluff that probably won't 
win many major awards, but it'll sure entertain.
One of the greatest strengths to "Nurse Betty" is the excellent cast. Renee 
Zellweger ("Me, Myself, and Irene"), who I really wasn't too sure about, 
proves herself here. As the slightly ditzy, very confused Betty, she is 
simply too endearing for words. She manages to keep a smile plastered on her 
face without making it look phony, and it only slips when a situation arises 
to really confuse her (this happens a lot less often than you'd think, she's 
so caught up in her fantasy world). Greg Kinnear ("Mystery Men") is perfect 
as Betty's obsession, going from decent guy to sleaze ball and back again 
without missing a beat. I have to hand it to Kinnear, the man does baffled 
almost as well as Zellweger. I normally don't care for Chris Rock's 
("Dogma") particular brand of acting, which seems to involve him yelling a 
lot. While he uses this same acting style throughout "Nurse Betty", it works 
since he is counter balanced by the eternally calm Morgan Freeman. Speaking 
of that great actor, if he doesn't get an Oscar nomination for this 
performance heads are going to role. His turn as Charlie, the hit-man one 
job away from retirement, is simply brilliant. It's a shame Freeman doesn't 
get more of these kinds of roles, because his comic timing is impeccable.
There are several scenes in this movie that are, quite frankly, comic gold. 
The first meeting between Betty and George is absolutely priceless. The two 
play off each other so well, the entire scene almost feels improvised. 
Another great scene is one where Charlie and Wesley take a slight detour to 
visit the grand canyon (Wesley calls it the bland canyon), and Charlie 
starts dancing with a hallucination of Betty. Yet the movie is, above all 
else, a black comedy. If you can't laugh at detestable people getting 
exactly what they deserve, you're better off seeing something else. For 
example, the scene where Charlie and Wesley kill the hapless Del is 
horrifying, but the aftermath is quite funny if you can bring yourself to 
laugh after watching someone get scalped. Neil LaBute (who also directed the 
very disturbing "In the Company of Men") keeps the film running along quite 
nicely, and this is a big boon. This was one of those rare movies (at least 
this year) where I wasn't just waiting for it to end. In fact, I wouldn't 
have minded in the slightest if it had run a touch longer; maybe have 
explored a few subplots (more on that next paragraph) that never develop. Oh 
well, that's just me for you, impossible to satisfy.
My complaints with the movie are few, but rather significant. Foremost among 
them being that there are a few little sub-plots which sadly never get 
developed. For example, one involves Betty getting hired on at the hospital 
after saving a man's life. After the head nurse hires her to work in the 
pharmacy, and warns her against messing with the patients, you expect this 
to go somewhere and it never does. The film also starts off a little slowly 
(I was starting to think, "oh no, not another dud."), but once it gets going 
it really goes. There were a few points during the movie where I couldn't 
breath I was laughing so hard. The real priceless scene is near the end, 
when Charlie and Betty finally meet up. The dialogue in this scene is 
absolutely perfect, and Freeman and Zellweger have some great on-screen 
chemistry. The soundtrack features a great new score from composer Rolfe 
Kent ("Election"), and the cinematography by Jean-Yves Escoffier 
("Rounders") is really quite beautiful (his shots of the western countryside 
belong in a travel magazine somewhere). The movie runs 112 minutes, but it 
won't feel half that long. I'd recommend it to those who like their humor a 
little on the dark side, and to fans of Morgan Freeman and Renee Zellweger 
since both really shine here. I give the movie four out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad? or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Highlander: Endgame (2000)
Directed by: Douglas Aarniokoski
Written by: Gillian Horvath, William Panzer, Joel Soisson
Let me warn you, this plot summary is only going to make sense to those of 
you who have seen the television show. An immortal has broken the rules of 
the game. Jacob Kell (Bruce Payne), considered by the watchers council to be 
the most dangerous immortal alive, has killed on holy ground. Now Kell is 
out to destroy the life of Connor MacLeod (Christopher Lambert), the man who 
killed his father centuries before. Kell's next target is Duncan Macleod 
(Adrian Paul), Connor's best friend and kinsman. Kell leads a group of 
immortals into battle (another rule which he broke), and one of them is 
Duncan's ex-wife from two centuries prior. His wife, Faith (Lisa Barbuscia), 
hates Duncan for having turned her into an immortal. She helps Kell because, 
as she says, he's the only person she's met who is capable of the level of 
hate she feels. Now Connor and Duncan have to find a way to stop the most 
powerful immortal alive, before he wins the game and the prize. Yet Connor 
knows that neither one of them is good enough to beat Kell on his own.
"Highlander: End Game" is one of those movies directed entirely at those who 
faithfully followed the television series. If you've never seen the series, 
you're in for a bumpy ride. In fact, if you've never seen the series, I'd 
recommend avoiding this movie. You're not going to know who the watchers 
are, or that there are now hundreds of immortals, or even who Duncan MacLeod 
is. Okay, that warning out of the way, the rest of this review is directed 
at those of you who have at least seen the television show once. I'm sorry 
to say that "Highlander: End Game" plays as nothing more than a slightly 
longer episode of the series. The effects are no more impressive, there have 
been no great changes in the characters of the series, and the production 
values are only slightly above those used in the show. Am I saying it has no 
features to elevate it up the show? That's exactly what I'm saying. If 
you've seen the show, you've seen the movie. If you enjoyed the show, you'll 
most likely enjoy the movie.
Christopher Lambert may have found some success in the first "Highlander" 
film, but that was back in 1986. Does anyone wonder why he hasn't found much 
work since then? If you've seen any of his performances, you wouldn't 
wonder. Lambert continues to display this lack of talent in "Highlander: End 
Game", shamelessly overacting at every turn. Adrian Paul is another story. 
While people may not know him from much besides the "Highlander" television 
series, the man is not an untalented actor. It's unfortunate that the 
dialogue in "Highlander: End Game" doesn't give him the chance to display 
his full acting ability. There are only two other important performances in 
the movie, and neither is much worth noting, but I'm going to note them 
anyway (I'm irritating like that). Bruce Payne ("Warlock III") plays the 
chief villain in such a gratingly over the top way, it will make your teeth 
hurt just listening to him. Lisa Barbuscia ("Almost Heroes") isn't quite 
that annoying as MacLeod's ex-wife, but she can't play the role requested of 
her. Faith is supposed to hate MacLeod with every fiber of her being, but we 
get the impression she just finds him vaguely annoying. Fans of the 
television series will be happy to see Jim Byrnes and Peter Wingfield make 
appearances as Joe Dawson and Methos, respectively. They'll be unhappy to 
see that the two fan favorites have about ten minutes of screen time between 
them.
The sad fact of the matter is, "Highlander: End Game" never should have made 
it to the big screen. As a direct-to-video release or a made for tv movie, 
the film would have worked quite well. Say what you will about "Highlander 
2" (and don't get me wrong, it deserves all your slander and then some), but 
at least it had the production values of a big studio release. As a major 
motion picture, there are simply too many points against "Highlander: End 
Game". The pacing is so poor you'd think a twelve year old had directed it; 
the dialogue is bad, bordering on painful; the special effects could have 
been done on a home computer; and like the previous sequels, this one just 
doesn't fit in with the "Highlander" timeline. I've actually got a theory 
about that - I think each "Highlander" movie is supposed to be an alternate 
timeline. If you think about it, that's the only thing that makes sense 
since each film destroys the entire mythos of the film or films preceding 
it. I suppose there never should have been a sequel to begin with, since if 
ever there was a film that didn't leave room for a sequel it was the first 
"Highlander".
Now that I've stomped yet another film into the ground, I should probably 
point out some of the movie's good aspects. The fight choreography (at least 
in one scene) is really quite impressive. The character involved in that 
scene, played by Donnie Yen ("Iron Monkey"), could have been a very 
interesting character, but he is never developed . The soundtrack is quite 
nice, being a lovely mixture of classical and Scottish music. However, I was 
surprised to find that the traditional "Highlander" theme song by Queen is 
missing. I have one quick, last question to all you "Highlander" fans out 
there. How strong is the rule which says immortals cannot fight on holy 
ground? I always took this more as a law than a rule, and if an immortal 
broke it something horrible would happen to them. Yet the rule is thrown 
right out the window in this latest film. "Highlander: End Game" runs a 
quick 88 minutes. I'd recommend it to die-hard fans of the television 
series, though even they might find the poor production values a bit 
irritating. I give the movie three out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
It seems to me that critics and audiences have become so tired of the same old
kind of movies, that they now turn to anything remotely different and acclaim
it as though it were the greatest film ever made. This would seem to be the
case with "The Blair Witch Project". While certainly innovative, and contains a
few genuinely creepy scenes, most of the film seems to revolve around watching
three teens bicker out in the woods.
Three students set out for a small town in Maryland which is home to a legend,
the legend of the Blair Witch. First interviewing the townspeople, they
eventually decide to head into the woods to find the site of the Witch's
killings. The three travel through the woods for days, becoming lost and
eventually turning on each other. The whole time, something in the woods stalks
them. Leaving small symbols at first, the stalker becomes more and more bold
and eventually openly attacks, dragging one off in the night.
It seems that the majority of people feel fully one way or another about this
film. Either they think it's one ofthe greatest ever made, or is an utter piece
of garbage they can't believe they were dragged to. I, on the other hand, am
fairly divided about this movie. As I said earlier, it's a truly innovative
film. Shot entirely as though it were lost footage shot with a home camera, it
does seem quite realistic. However, if you suffer easily from motion sickness,
stay far away. There are also a few scenes which are quite eerie. The two that
stick out most in my mind are the conclusion, and a scene where the group
stumbles across hundreds of figures made out of sticks in a section of woods.
Now, on to the items that really couldn't stand. One thing which I simply can't
believe, is that while running terrified through the woods, with some horrible
thing chasing them, the kids would actually keep the camera held at eye level!
The other major problem was that between nights in the tent, when the creature
in the woods harassed the group, they spent the days arguing on and on. I saw
some people in the theatre begin to doze off in these scenes.
Some truly creepy scenes which are plagued by stretches of boring dialogue
earns this movie three stars, and a reccomendation to wait for video (but watch
it with the lights off to get the true effect).
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
Ridley Scott's ("Blade Runner", "Alien") "Gladiator" is the kind of movie
that hasn't been seen in a very long time: A massive, sprawling epic of a
picture which is a shock to the senses. This is the kind of movie that
Hollywood hasn't made in past years due to the enormous budget required to
recreate ancient Rome. Now, thanks to computers and the miracle called CGI,
Hollywood can show us Rome in all its glory. Speaking of glory, what a
glorious movie "Gladiator" is. Not only does Scott's Rome look fantastic,
but so do the costumes, the gorgeous cinematography, and the amazing battle
scenes. "Gladiator" is the sort of movie that will leave you staring
slack-jawed at the majestic proceedings unfolding before you. This is the
sort of film which isn't merely watched, it is experienced.
Maximus (Russell Crowe) is a brilliant and respected Roman general, fighting
the barbarian hordes of Germania. After defeating the barbarians, Maximus
has only one dream to follow: to return to his wife and son back in Rome.
However, Caesar Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris) is dying, and he refuses to
let his amoral son, Commodus (Joquin Phoenix), succeed him as emperor. He
wants Maximus to take the throne until the time is right to hand the kingdom
over to the senate. Commodus, infuriated by his father's decision,
assassinates him and then sends Maximus off to be executed. Maximus escapes
his executioners, only to find that Commodus has slain his family and
destroyed his home. After wandering blindly for awhile, he is picked up by a
slave caravan and sold to Proximo (the late Oliver Reed), a man who buys
slaves and trains them to become gladiators. Now Maximus has returned to
Rome to compete in the arena and find a way to get his revenge.
While the previews might lead you to believe that "Gladiator" is nothing
more than a whole lot of arena fighting and one or two large battles, they
are a tad misleading. There are, in fact, only four major arena fights and
one large battle scene at the film's beginning. The rest of the film is
filled with political intrigue and watching Commodus slime his way through
his emperorship. This doesn't mean the film is boring, far from it in fact.
Two and a half hours have seldom felt so short as they did in this movie.
While the political goings on may be interesting, the vast majority of
audiences are seeing "Gladiator" for the fights, and they are certainly
worthwhile. The battles which take place in the Roman Coliseum are fast
paced and exciting; particularly one involving a one on one fight between
Maximus and an undefeated gladiator. The two go at it, with swords and axes
flying, while tigers circle, waiting for one of them to get too close.
Acting obviously isn't supposed to be a high point in a movie like this, but
when Russell Crowe ("LA Confidential", "The Insider") is involved you can
expect at least one great performance. The real surprise was that nearly the
entire cast turned in great performances. Joquin Phoenix ("8MM") is suitably
slimy and evil as the ambitious emperor, despite my fears that I would be
able to see him as nothing more than River Phoenix's little brother. Connie
Nielsen ("Mission to Mars") gives a nice, almost understated turn as
Commodus' sister and love interest (remember, ancient Rome and incest tend
to go hand in hand). Oliver Reed ("The Big Sleep") gives a great final
performance as the greedy Proximo. I found it interesting how Reed's
character was recreated through CGI after his death. Watch for Djimon
Hounsou ("Amistad") and Duane Johnson (professional wrestling's The Rock) as
fellow gladiators.
There are two more things I must point out as being simply great about
"Gladiator". First is the score, which I can only hope Academy members will
remember at the end of the year. Composer Hans Zimmer ("The Thin Red Line")
has created a truly magnificent and moving body of music here (I went out
and bought the soundtrack the next day). The music played during the battles
is fierce and rousing, causing your heart to pound just as much as the
action does. The other great moment in the movie is the opening battle
scene, which simply must be witnessed on the big screen. During this battle,
we see wide panning shots of massive Roman legions marching towards
barbarian hordes; flaming arrows flying overhead; a burning forest in the
background; and some wonderfully choreographed fight scenes. I'd recommend
everyone see "Gladiator" on the big screen rather than waiting for video.
I'm certain it's going to lose a lot of its power on the small screen. The
film runs 154 minutes, but believe me, it won't feel nearly that long. I
give "Gladiator" a well earned four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for In Crowd, The (2000)
Adrien Williams (Lori Heuring) has just been released from a mental 
institution after her primary doctor, Henry Thompson (Daniel Hugh Kelly), 
recommended her release. She now has a job working at a country club until 
she gets back on her feet. At the club she meets a group of elite young 
snobs led by Brittany Foster (Susan Ward). Brittany soon takes Adrien under 
her wing for reasons we never fully understand. As Adrien becomes more and 
more immersed in Brittany's world she begins to suspect a conspiracy of 
sorts, dating back a few years, and involving Brittany's sister who left the 
country. Brittany's friend, Kelly (Laurie Fortier), keeps hinting about it 
to Adrien, as though it were eating her up inside. Once Brittany finds out 
that Adrien suspects her of something, she turns all her attentions to 
destroying Adrien's life, and she proves quite adept at doing so.
There's a whole lot more to this plot, mostly involving relationships 
amongst the other members of the in crowd. You know, the sort of soap opera 
like plot twists of so-and-so is seeing so-and-so behind her back, but she 
is actually cheating on him with blah blah blah. My head began to hurt after 
about fifteen minutes of trying to follow this, so I finally gave up and 
wrote "everyone is seeing everyone behind everyone's back". I think the 
primary reason it was so difficult to keep track was because all the members 
of the in crowd looked alike. All the guys were tall with brown hair and 
goofy looking expressions, and all the girls were well-endowed, blonde 
(except Brittany and Kelly; I think so we could keep track of them), and 
constantly clothed in bathing suits. That, by the way, about covers the 
film's good points. The only reason anyone should see this is to watch a 
bunch of beautiful people run around on the beach for over an hour and a 
half.
Because the actors are all interchangeable, there really isn't much point in 
covering their acting skills, but I'm going to give it a try anyway. Susan 
Ward (apparently from "All My Children", imagine that) and Lori Heuring 
("The Newton Boys") are the only two given a chance to display any acting 
skills, and both appear to possess none. Lori Heuring looks half dead 
throughout the film, which I suppose was intentional to show how disturbed 
her character was, but she might have overdone it just a smidge. Susan 
Ward's idea of acting evil seems to be: sitting off to the side, murmering 
false platitudes, conspiring against everyone, and keeping a small, fake 
smile on her face. Oh, I suppose that does sound fairly evil doesn't it? Yet 
somehow Susan Ward botches the attempt so badly, she looks comical rather 
than evil. The only other actor worth mentioning is Nathan Bexton (last seen 
talking to a cat in "Go"), who spends most of the film twitching violently 
in a corner or drinking alcohol by the gallon. Everyone else is either given 
no screen time (Daniel Hugh Kelly) or isn't required to act much beyond 
being a jerk (everyone else).
So how does the script itself fare? Well, you name the teen movie cliche and 
it's probably present. We get the classic mark of all modern teen movies: 
popular music playing all the time, even when it's completely inappropriate 
to the mood of the scene. We get every cliched bit of foreshadowing 
imaginable: from the characters being introduced at the exact spot where you 
know the final conflict is going to take place; to the emphasis on creaking 
stairs that you know are going to be important later on. It also follows 
that grand teen movie tradition of being a touch on the predictable side. By 
that, I mean half the time I could guess what characters were going to say 
before their mouths opened. Last, but not least, we have the two staples of 
all brainless teen films: a three minute exposition explaining the plot at 
the start; and an ending that everyone knew was bound to happen in exactly 
the way it occurs.
To be perfectly honest, I'd never heard of Mary Lambert before seeing this 
movie, and now I see why. Apparently, she was the one responsible for 1989's 
reprehensible Stephen King adaption "Pet Semetary". I must have put a mental 
block over her name without knowing it. Her trademark travesties in "The In 
Crowd" appear to be three fold: first, she sticks in lesbian undertones 
amongst several of the girls for no apparent reason (there is one brief 
explanation of some of this, but doesn't account for it all); two, the 
camera work is horrendous - jumping around from scene to scene with no 
consistency (think Oliver Stone's "technique" doubled and used all the 
time); last, the pacing is nonexistent, speeding way up during scenes that 
could have been vaguely interesting if they had tried, and slowing down at 
points in the movie no one could care less about. I'd recommend "The In 
Crowd" to two groups of people: those who love teen movies (assuming such 
people exist); and those who just want to stare at people in bathing suits 
for over an hour (I know those people exist). The movie runs 100 minutes, 
which is about an hour and a half too long. I give it a sadly generous two 
out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Bless the Child (2000)
Directed by: Chuck Russell
Written by: Cathy Cash Spellman (novel), Thomas Rickman
Maggie O'Connor (Kim Basinger) is a child psychologist whose sister, Jenna 
(Angela Bettis), just dropped by after a several year hiatus. Jenna is a 
drug addict and dumps her baby girl, Cole (later played by Holliston 
Coleman), in Maggie's lap and then takes off. Maggie raises the child as her 
own, but Cole is different than most children. Cole has strange gifts like 
being able to move objects and bring the dead back to life, but Maggie 
doesn't seem to think anything of it. After six years of raising Cole, Jenna 
shows up again, still drugged up, but now married to a wealthy self-help 
guru named Eric Stark (Rufus Sewell). Eric and Jenna want Cole back, and 
when Maggie refuses they take her anyway. Maggie goes to the authorities and 
speaks to FBI agent John Travis (Jimmy Smits), who becomes convinced that 
Stark is behind a series of child murders that have been taking place in the 
city. As it turns out, Stark is the head of a Satanic cult and believes that 
Cole is the world's savior, who he must convert to his evil ways. Maggie and 
John have only one week to track Stark down and reclaim Cole before Stark 
either kills her or converts her, whichever proves easier.
I don't know about you, but I'm getting a little tired of these weird, 
quasi-religious movies Hollywood has been throwing at us lately ("Stigmata", 
"End of Days", even "Dogma"). These films are usually thrillers, and somehow 
involve a conflict with the church and the end of the world, and some 
hapless fool thrown in the middle of it all. That about sums up Chuck 
Russell's ("Eraser") "Bless the Child". The only difference is, Russell's 
film is deeply religious and pro-church, while most of these films are 
generally anti-religion. Does that make it less irritating? Not by a long 
shot. I can't honestly say there is one specific thing that's wrong with 
"Bless the Child", it's more that there's nothing really good about it. This 
is the kind of movie you'll sit through, not really caring what's going on, 
just waiting for it to end. The kind of movie where you'll be thinking about 
things like doing laundry when you get home, or how much fixing your car is 
going to cost instead of paying attention to what's happening on screen. 
It's not all Russell's fault, no one could have done much with this 
frightfully dull script, but a lot of the blame can rest firmly on his 
shoulders; mainly for the languid pacing and dreary cinematography.
"Bless the Child" does go out of its way to prove one thing: Kim Basinger's 
Oscar for "LA Confidential" was a fluke. I've never thought of Basinger as a 
great actress (quite the opposite actually), and while I thought she gave a 
very nice performance in "LA Confidential", I didn't think it was Oscar 
worthy (though every one of her co-stars gave a performance worthy of an 
award). In "Bless the Child" she doesn't seem quite sure how to act. Half 
the time she's timid and unsure of herself, then she'll suddenly switch to 
fighting people and screaming. Rufus Sewell, who gave great performances in 
both "Dark City" and "Dangerous Beauty", delivers a mediocre one here. He 
simply seemed incapable of acting turly evil, which is (I think) how this 
character was supposed to be. Jimmy Smits is, well, Jimmy Smitts; likeable 
enough, but little more to him. Holliston Coleman isn't required to act 
much. All she's really asked to do is refer to herself in the third person, 
hug people, and smash her head against walls (don't ask me about that one, 
it never gets explained). Despite what both the previews and the opening 
credits would have you believe, Christina Ricci ("Sleepy Hollow") and Ian 
Holm ("The Fifth Element") show up in what amount to little more than 
cameos.
"Bless the Child" is a movie filled with lots of little details that simply 
don't work. Right from the start, when Maggie and Jenna meet up I knew I was 
in for a bumpy ride. The two have an argument which somehow manages to 
dredge up every traditional reason why movie sisters fight. Why do I say 
movie sisters rather than just sisters? Because movie sisters fight about 
things like drug use, miscarriages, ex-husbands, and anything else remotely 
melodramatic the writers can think of. The dialogue is fairly hammy and 
cheesy (I actually started thinking of a ham and cheese sandwich my mind was 
wandering so much), and once again writers stole that classic line from "The 
Usual Suspects" - "The greatest trick the devil ever pulled was convincing 
the world he didn't exist." If that line gets stolen for use in one more 
cheesy movie I'm going to, well, complain some more I suppose. The fact that 
Chuck Russell doesn't direct too often becomes painfully obvious about 
fifteen minutes into the film, when he makes every mistake in the book. 
Russell's biggest mistake is throwing strange images at you, the picture 
fades to the next scene, and what happened in the last scene is never 
explained.
How many loose ends do you usually like your movies to have? None? Well then 
I'd recommend staying away for that reason alone because guess what, nothing 
gets explained. We never learn just who Cody is supposed to be (Savior 
reborn? An angel come to earth?), and we never learn what Eric Stark is 
hoping to accomplish by turning her to his side. His way of converting her 
doesn't make a whole lot of sense anyway. There's a brief hint of the last 
temptation of Christ in there, but Eric's idea of temptation seems to be "do 
this or I'll kill you". You're no doubt wondering about the special effects, 
because any good religious thriller (assuming one exists other than "The 
Exorcist") is bound to have them, right? Well, the special effects in "Bless 
the Child" probably would have been fairly creepy were it not for the fact 
that they appear to have been produced on a home computer. The score, by 
Christopher Young ("The Hurricane"), isn't exactly bad, it's just not used 
enough to make much of an impression. Russell throws the score in during the 
really dramatic moments, but other than that we don't hear it too often. 
It's obviously loud and dramatic during the film's finale, but the problem 
is that the finale is anything but dramatic. It's so anti-climactic I just 
about dozed off during it. "Bless the Child" runs a painful 110 minutes, but 
you'll have to decide if you want to pay eight dollars for a two hour nap. 
I'd recommend the film to fans of "Stigmata" (assuming they exist) and give 
it two and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Skulls, The (2000)
"A skull above all others," a red robed member of the secret society
proclaims in Rob Cohen's new film, "The Skulls". John Pogue, previously
responsible for writing such "masterpieces" as "US Marshalls" and "Eraser",
sprinkles this kind of inane, meaningless dialogue throughout the movie. I
suppose I shouldn't have expected anything more out of a movie like this
one, but somehow I thought the presence of Joshua Jackson ("Dawson's Creek",
"Urban Legend"), one of the more talented young actors in Hollywood, might
spark some life into this outing. After an interesting, if predictable,
opening sequence involving a rowing race (I didn't even know rowing was a
college sport), my hopes were going up. Instead, the movie snowballs
downhill, getting worse and worse until it reaches one of the most
ridiculous endings I've ever seen.
Luke McNamara (Joshua Jackson) is a champion rower for his college's rowing
team, having led the school to three consecutive victories. His abilities
have attracted the attention of The Skulls, a secret society composed of
students and graduates from the university. To join their ranks, he has to
complete a series of tasks with the other hopefuls, including the local rich
kid, Caleb Mandrake (Paul Walker), son of the society's chairman, Litten
Mandrake (Craig T. Nelson). While membership in the society alienates Luke's
friends, Will (Steve Harris) and Chloe (Leslie Bibb), it's making his
college dreams come true. However, this particular society may be a little
darker than Luke first suspects, and he learns they're not above covering up
things like murder.
I'm not sure just where to start with this ridiculous movie. Alright, I'm
going to go over the film's good points first, which shouldn't take long.
The music is, at times, rather nice. Starting with a somewhat creepy
sounding score and changing into a more uplifting one during the rowing
scene, the score is nicely used to highlight key scenes. Unfortunately, the
soundtrack changes rather suddenly into a series of modern rock and rap
songs. The only other high point I can think of in this moronic film is that
there are one or two mildly suspensful scenes, though I can't seem to
remember what exactly they involved. Except for these two points this is
just another unbelievable, boring, shallow teen flick which will somehow
draw in the high school crowd.
The actors here are, for the most part, unconvincing at best and laughably
bad at worst. Jackson himself appears to know what a lousy movie he is in
and sleepwalks his way through his scenes. Leslie Bibb ("Private Parts") is
more than a little unconvincing as his love interest, and Hill Harper ("In
Too Deep") is given very little to do as Jackson's best friend. Craig T.
Nelson (Coach, "The Devil's Advocate") plays a character who is nothing more
than a cardboard cutout villain. The worst performance of the movie comes
from Paul Walker ("Brokedown Palace"), who seems to take his part very
seriously, despite scenes where he is asked to do things like look up to the
heavens and cry NO! The only decent performance comes from William L.
Petersen ("Gun Shy"), playing a southern senator and doing a fairly good
impersonation of Bill Clinton.
I think the thing in this movie that most grated on my nerves was the
unbelievably cheesy dialogue. The fact that some of these actors were able
to say their lines while keeping a straight face is remarkable. I do hope
Joshua Jackson is able to obtain a better script for his next film, however
since his next movie is going to be called "Gossip" I'm not holding my
breath. Despite all the horrible ideas you see brought to life throughout
"The Skulls", nothing can prepare you for the insanely horrible ending. The
movie runs about 100 minutes, which feels about an hour longer than that. I
can't think of anyone I'd recommend it to unless you're looking for a few
good, unintentional laughs. I give "The Skulls" a generous two out of five
stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Nutty Professor II: The Klumps (2000)
Directed by: Peter Segal
Written by: Steve Oedekerk, Barry W. Blaustein, David Sheffield, Paul Weitz, 
Chris Weitz
That mountainous family from "The Nutty Professor" has returned. This time 
the brilliant (though still larger than life) Sherman Klump (Eddie Murphy) 
has found the secret to a youth formula, which his boss, Dean Richmond 
(Larry Miller) is selling to a pharmaceutical company for 150 million 
dollars. However, before Sherman can become rich and famous he faces three 
problems: one, he is madly in love with his partner on the project, Denice 
Gains (Janet Jackson); yet he can't ask her to marry him because of his 
second problem, Buddy Love (Eddie Murphy), is still lurking inside Sherman, 
making him say and do things he doesn't mean; and three, the youth formula's 
effects are only temporary. So Sherman and his chief assistant, Jason (John 
Ales), think up a way to eliminate Sherman's first two problems by 
extracting Buddy's remaining DNA. This causes two unfortunate side affects: 
Buddy Love is released into the world again after a freak accident in the 
lab; and Sherman's brain is damaged, causing him to grow dumber by the 
minute.
Now you're probably wondering how my plot summary managed to have no mention 
of Sherman Klump's family. After all, the previews made the film out to be 
nothing but a long series of hilarious dinner table scenes ala the first 
"Nutty Professor" film. We do get one scene more than a little similar to 
the original film's now famous dinner table scene, but while it may be 
fairly amusing this time around, we've seen it all before. The fact that 
most of the humor in "Nutty Professor II" has been recycled can be viewed as 
both a strength and a weakness. You're obviously wondering how recycled 
humor can possibly be a strength, and the answer is quite simple. The old 
humor feels familiar and comfortable. It's also amusing because the humor 
from the original film is sharp and clever (take a very amusing little 
homage to "Cape Fear" for example). A lot of the new humor added is nothing 
but typical year 2000 gross-out humor, which I'm personally getting more 
than a little tired of (the giant hamster scene is a great example of this).
>From the opening credits, where Eddie Murphy's name is the only one 
advertised before the film's title appears, you know exactly who this movie 
belongs to. Janet Jackson ("Poetic Justice"), John Ales ("Spy Hard"), and 
particularly Larry Miller ("The Big Tease") are present only to further 
Murphy's jokes. So how does Murphy fare? Well, quite frankly, it depends on 
the character he's playing at the time. As Sherman Klump - that big, kindly 
blimp, Murphy is just as likeable as he was in the first film. As Buddy 
Love, he doesn't quite pull off the act this time around. In the first film 
Buddy Love was often uproariously funny; in the sequal he just seems to get 
in the way. He doesn't have enough screen time to leave any sort of 
impression, and when he is on screen he spends most of his time sniffing the 
air and going to the bathroom on newspaper (more on that later). His acting 
like a canine is amusing the first couple of times, but when he starts doing 
it for the sixth or seventh time, the routine has worn out its welcome.
As the Klump family, Murphy's comic abilities depend entirely on which 
family member he's playing. Sherman is still the quaint, kindly man he was 
in the first film, but he's treated like garbage this time around, and it 
isn't funny watching him be embarrassed since he's so likeable. Watching 
Sherman make an idiot of himself in front of Denice's parents made me feel 
bad rather than making me laugh. Grandma Klump, on the other hand, is 
uproariously funny. Any scene with her is so hilariously vulgar I sometimes 
couldn't breath I was laughing so hard; yet her screen time is so limited 
these laughing spells were few and far between. Sherman's parents, Mama and 
Papa Klump, don't fare quite so well. There's a moronic little subplot 
involving Papa's inability to, um, pleasure his wife in bed, but it's never 
particularly amusing. Last, we have Sherman's brother, Ernie. Ernie was 
barely seen in the first film and continues this trend in the sequel. This 
is a shame because I could always tell a great comic character was just 
aching to break free (his few lines in the dinner scene are some of the 
best).
Contrary to what I had feared, the gross-out humor in "Nutty Professor II" 
is really quite restrained (of course, I could be saying that just because I 
now compare everything to "Scary Movie" in terms of gross-out humor). While 
the film is loaded with flatulence jokes (come on, what did you expect?), it 
also contains a fair amount of intelligent jokes. However, Buddy Love is not 
involved in any of these intelligent jokes. I said I'd try to explain why he 
was acting like a dog, so here goes. When Sherman extracts Buddy's DNA, the 
vile containing it is knocked off onto an electrical outlet. While lying on 
the ground a dog walks into the room and scratches a hair off onto the pile 
of goop, which gives Buddy's DNA a host to latch on to and recreate him. 
Since he was created using a combination of Sherman's DNA and a dog's, he 
behaves like a dog while looking like a human. I didn't say it made sense, I 
just said I'd try to explain it. "Nutty Professor II" runs far too long at 
110 minutes, and it should have been no longer than 90. I'd recommend it to 
people who adore fart jokes and give the film a rather generous three out of 
five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Space Cowboys (2000)
The guidance system on a Russian communications satellite, which has been in 
space for about 14 years, is finally breaking down and sending the satellite 
towards Earth. In about a month and a half it will burn up in the atmosphere 
and the communications break-down may plunge Russia into a civil war. No 
problem, right? We can just send some boys up there to fix it and it'll be 
as good as new. Wrong, you see the guidance system is so old that the only 
person who knows anything about it is the original designer, Frank Corvin 
(Clint Eastwood). Frank was originally supposed to go into space back in the 
fifties, but he and his team were replaced by a monkey. The man responsible 
for destroying Frank's dream of going into space was Bob Gerson (James 
Cromwell), who is still in charge of the space program, and is now in charge 
of trying to find a way to fix the Russian satellite. So Frank makes a deal 
with Gersen, whereby Frank will fix the satellite if, and only if, he and 
his original team members, Hawk, Tank, and Jerry (Tommy Lee Jones, James 
Garner, and Donald Sutherland respectively), are allowed to go into space 
together to do so. They will be accompanied by two young astronauts, Ethan 
(Loren Dean) and Roger (Courtney B. Vance), but all the repairs will be 
performed entirely by Frank and his team. The catch is, in order to qualify 
for this, Frank and his team must undergo all the rigorous training 
astronauts now go through.
Let me catch my breath after that plot summary. I know it sounded long and 
confusing, but the movie's plot is actually remarkably simple; it just can't 
be written down in simple terms (or maybe it's just me, but I must have 
re-written that summary a dozen times). In a summer full of utter 
disappointments, "Space Cowboys" stands out as the one movie that was 
exactly how I expected it to be. In other words, "Space Cowboys" was as 
cliched as it could be, but it was also a lot of fun, very entertaining, and 
it even had a few touching moments. The movie is bound to draw (possibly 
unfair) comparisons to "Armageddon", just as Michael Bay's film drew 
comparisons to "The Right Stuff". Both films feature a group being quickly 
trained for a space mission, having quite a few problems up in space, and 
unfortunately both lose most of their steam once the group actually makes it 
into space. That's right, just like Bay's big loud picture, "Space Cowboys" 
is an absolute blast while it's on the ground, but all the fun gets sapped 
out once the actual mission is underway.
In a movie with a cast like this, the high point is obviously going to be 
the acting. Where else can you see five great old actors get together for 
one last hurrah? As a result, I'm going to devote a lot more of the review 
to each of the actors involved than I normally would. Eastwood does a 
magnificent job playing an aged Dirty Harry like character, getting 
excellent lines like: "Go ahead, I've got medicare, take your best shot." 
For those of you worried about Eastwood taking his shirt off after that 
reportedly horrifying sight in "The Bridges of Madison County", I'm sorry to 
say he does just that. However, it's only for a split second, and he's bent 
over so you really don't see his chest too well. Why am I telling you this? 
Because I'd hate for you to miss an otherwise good movie because you're 
(justifiably) afraid of that sight. The only other actor to play a really 
major part in "Space Cowboys" is Tommy Lee Jones, playing Eastwood's on 
again - off again best friend, Hawk. Jones is clearly one of the best older 
actors working in Hollywood (though he's actually the youngest of the five 
featured in this movie), and he's great here because he's obviously having 
such a good time. Jones has a big goofy smile plastered on his face 
throughout the film, and as a result, we can't help but smile along with 
him.
The other three old-timers aren't given half the screen time Jones and 
Eastwood are, but at least two of them still manage to leave an impression. 
What type of impression does Donald Sutherland ("Outbreak") leave? Why, the 
same kind he always does of course: Eww, creepy (if you've seen Sutherland 
in anything before you should know exactly what I mean). The fact that his 
character is a womanizing old man doesn't help matters any. James Cromwell 
("LA Confidential") is gaining quite a reputation for playing sadistic old 
men, and he continues in that same vein as the hateful Bob Gersen. Does he 
play a hateful old man well? Disturbingly well, actually. The only one of 
the five who leaves no impression is the great James Garner ("Maverick"). 
How can that possibly be, you ask? Well, don't get me wrong, James Garner is 
certainly the man, but even he can't save a role where he's given no more 
than fifteen or twenty minutes of screen time. The only other people given 
enough screen time to leave any sort of mark are Marcia Gay Harden (that's 
right, from the masterpiece "Miller's Crossing") as Tommy Lee Jones's love 
interest, and William Devane (just seen briefly in "Hollow Man") as James 
Cromwell's boss who seems afflicted by a split personality.
Eastwood's skill behind the camera is a little hard to predict. It can be 
outstanding and frankly mesmerizing as it was in "Unforgiven"; or it can be, 
well, "True Crime". His efforts in "Space Cowboys" fall somewhere safely in 
the middle. Most of his scenes work quite well, like a bar- room brawl 
between Eastwood and a young skin head; or the scene where we first meet 
Hawk, who now makes his living teaching young hotshots a thing or two about 
flying in an old, bright red one prop plane. However, a few of the tricks he 
tried just didn't do it for me, like the actors' voices being dubbed over on 
younger actors in the first fifteen minutes. Eastwood's biggest strength in 
"Space Cowboys" is his ability to throw in slap-stick like humor without 
making the film feel campy. His biggest weakness is pacing, which is slow 
and leisurely while the crew is on the ground, but frantic and headache 
inducing while they're in space. I think things would have gone over a bit 
more smoothly if a half hour had been taken out of the script and Eastwood 
had directed the whole film in his trademark, meandering sort of way.
Other than the acting and a lot of really entertaining scenes, there isn't 
much to "Space Cowboys". The special effects are nice, but certainly nothing 
spectacular. The training scenes may run on far too long, but they're sure a 
whole lot of fun. The score from Clint Eastwood's favorite composer, Lennie 
Niehaus, is nice, but after Trevor Rabin's outstanding, rousing score from 
"Armageddon" (I said it was going to draw unfair comparisons), this one just 
doesn't stand up. Despite these factors, "Space Cowboys" is still enjoyable 
enough that it was well on its way to a full four star rating until the last 
half hour hit. In that last half hour every heart string tugging cliche in 
the book was hurled at me till I felt like knocking it down more than just 
one notch. "Space Cowboys" did force me to reconsider a statement I made 
earlier this month. I said that all movies in Hollywood should be restricted 
in length to one hour, because writers seemed to run out of ideas at that 
point. I'm changing that statement to all movies should be written and ready 
to go, and then have the last half hour done away with. Granted, there are 
exceptions, this year's "X-Men" springs to mind, but for the most part I 
think this would benefit Hollywood greatly. "Space Cowboys" runs a long 129 
minutes, and I recommend it to just about any age group, though senior 
citizens will probably get more out of it than kids. I give the move three 
and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Gojira ni-sen mireniamu (1999)
The big green guy is back, and he starts off with a bang. Godzilla is 
terrorizing a small bay community while a group of Godzilla trackers follows 
him. The group consists of Yuji Shinoda (Takehiro Murata), a scientist who 
has been studying Godzilla for years; his daughter, Io (Mayu Suzuki), who 
appears to be an expert with electrical equipment; and a reporter, Yuki 
Ichinose (Naomi Nishida). Meanwhile, a meteor has been discovered by Dr. 
Shiro Miyazaki (Shiro Sano), an old friend of Yuji. It turns out that the 
meteor is actually an alien spacecraft. The local government, led by Yuji's 
long time enemy, Mitsuo Katagiri (Hiroshi Abe), orders it and Godzilla 
destroyed. Yuji has other plans for Godzilla, since he has determined that 
the lizard's healing factor can be harnessed and used to revolutionize 
modern medicine. Nevertheless, Katagiri wants the lizard destroyed, and he 
sets out to do just that. However, before Katagiri can carry out his 
dastardly plan, the alien's plans are learned by Yuji. The plan is to 
destroy the earth, and Godzilla is needed to do that (it's never exactly 
explained why). So what does the alien do? Why it changes into possibly the 
goofiest looking alien creature ever and takes on Godzilla, mano-a-mano.
Ah nostalgia, how it can cause us to do foolish things. Is there any reason 
other than because you're feeling nostalgic that you'd go to see a movie 
like "Godzilla 2000"? It can't be because you're looking for great special 
effects, acting, plot, dialogue, or cinematography, because that's not what 
Godzilla movies are about. Godzilla movies are about, uh, guys in big rubber 
suits destroying Tokyo. Hmm, that sounds mildly ridiculous doesn't it? Maybe 
so, but that's exactly what you expect out of a Godzilla movie. You want to 
see the big green lizard smash up Tokyo for awhile until a big, climactic 
showdown with another monster. If that's not what you want to see, what in 
the world are you doing reading this review? So, now that we've gotten all 
that out of the way, you're probably wondering how "Godzilla 2000" holds up 
as compared to the multitude of past Godzilla flicks. Well, it's rather a 
hit and miss situation I'm afraid. You see, all the requisite props for a 
Godzilla movie are present. We've got tanks and helicopters and strange new 
weapons to hurl at the big guy even though we know they're not going to do a 
bit of good; we've got the strange new threat that only Godzilla can defeat; 
and we've got the good scientist who knows this but no one in the military 
will listen to him. Unfortunately, we've got one more thing that past 
Godzilla flicks haven't had. We've got lots and lots of inane, scientific 
ramblings to fill up time that could be better spent watching the lizard 
blow things up.
Normally I devote this section of the review to a critique of the acting in 
a film, but, well, this is Godzilla. "Godzilla 2000", as you all should 
know, is not a movie which can be criticized in any way for acting for two 
reasons: one, the dubbing is so bad you can't tell if the actors are doing 
well or not; and two, Godzilla movies aren't about real actors, they're 
about extras who run around in panic while things explode all around them. 
So instead I'm going to devote this paragraph to the ways in which this 
newest Godzilla movie is different from the ones in the past. First of all, 
the dubbing seems to have actually gotten worse. At least before the actors' 
mouths would be moving while the inane dialogue spilled forth. Second, the 
filming actually looks a bit more professional this time around, at least at 
the start of the film. Never fear though, I think they used up the entire 
budget in the first twenty minutes or so, and the film's look more closely 
matches that of the original films by the end. Third, there's a lot more 
swearing in this Godzilla film than I remember in past ones, but that could 
just be my memory playing tricks on me (it's been known to do that 99% of 
the time). Last is the fact that in the past the humans have always hurled 
all their weapons at Godzilla, he's gotten really angry, and all the human 
weapons have been destroyed. In this version, the humans' weapons don't even 
slow the big guy down. He doesn't bother destroying any of them because he 
couldn't seem to care less that they're there. Maybe his skin gets tougher 
with age.
In case you didn't notice, the plot to this Godzilla film sounds a little 
bit complicated. That's because this one is so full of scientific baloney 
they forgot to give people what they really wanted. We still get great, 
classic lines like: "That thing's tied down with electromagnetic cables, 
it's not going anywhere." When you know the monster's going to break out 
right after those words are spoken. Yet the rest of the film is filled with 
talk about Godzilla's regeneration abilities, and how old the meteor is, and 
all sorts of other things the audience couldn't care less about. The big 
showdown at the end is enjoyable enough; but the rest of the film is just 
talk, and I could tell everyone was getting more than a little antsy. Having 
suffered through such classics as "Godzilla vs. Megalon", I have a pretty 
good idea what kind of Godzilla movie true fans of the franchise like, and 
"Godzilla 2000" doesn't quite meet the standard. Despite improved special 
effects (his atomic breath looks much cooler now), both the quality and 
length of the Godzilla fights have gone down. We get no more than five 
minutes of Godzilla smashing buildings and power lines; and his fight with 
the alien, while entertaining, doesn't come close to his battle with, say, 
Mothra.
Sadly enough, a movie as cheesy as this one has a better soundtrack than 
most mainstream Hollywood productions. It's really nothing more than a mix 
of different classical pieces thrown together, but it's used wisely and it's 
usually appropriate to the scene being played (I hope Hollywood producers 
are taking notes). One last thing I had to note, something which simply 
cracked me up, was the vanishing scenery. For example, in one scene we have 
a four-wheeler driving over a large pile of dirt to get into a tunnel. When 
Godzilla forces the group to drive out of the tunnel in reverse, the pile of 
dirt has vanished. This happens in numerous scenes, if you look hard enough, 
but that was the most blatant example. I'd recommend this latest entry into 
the franchise to those who were disappointed by the American version from 
1998 (What do you mean that's everyone?) and want to see the big guy back in 
a rubber suit, like god intended. Just make sure your expectations are nice 
and low before going in. "Godzilla 2000" runs a decent 90 minutes, and I 
give it three out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
Imagine if someone came into your house demanding money, and when you didn't
come up with it right away, they urinated all over your rug. Not just any rug
either, it was the rug that really tied the room together. What would you do?
While this may not sound like anything which even resembles a setup for a film,
it's exactly how "The Big Lebowski" starts. Like the television show,
"Seinfeld", "The Big Lebowski" is basically a movie about nothing. It doesn't
have much of a plot, it's about characters who wander aimlessly through
pointless lives, and this big, shambling movie borders on being a comic
masterpiece.
Jeff Lebowski (Jeff Bridges), better known as "The Dude", has just had his rug
defiled by a couple of thugs. You see, these thugs mistook The Dude for another
Lebowski (David Huddleston), who just happens to be a millionaire. It would
seem that The Big Lebowski's trophy wife, Bunny (Tara Reid), owes money all
over town. So, after consulting his best friend, a shell shocked Vietnam vet
named Walter (the hysterical John Goodman), The Dude decides to get a
replacement rug from The Big Lebowski. This soon leads to the discovery that
Bunny has been kidnapped, and The Dude is hired by Lebowski to deliver the
money for her safe return. What follows is a hilarious series of mistakes and
misunderstandings, as the dude finds his peaceful, laidback, alcohol filled
life completely rearranged. If this so called plot sounds a tad confused,
that's because it is. Even the film's narrator (Sam Elliot) confesses to having
lost his train of thought at one point.
Let me say that this isn't an easy film to review. There isn't much of a plot
for me to discuss, and there's nothing even remotely serious about what plot
there is. Perhaps the best way to proceed would be to discuss each of the
multitude of colorful characters at work here. To start with, we have The Dude
himself, played by the perfectly cast Jeff Bridges ("Arlington Road",
"Starman"). The dude is a comical looking hippie, stuck in the '90s when he
belongs in the '60s. This shaggy looking pacifist has only two important things
in his life: drinking and bowling. Next up, we have Walter Sobchak, as depicted
by the brilliant, hilarious, and always underrated John Goodman ("Bringing out
the Dead", "Fallen"). Walter is a Vietnam veteran who is utterly convinced that
everything in life relates in some way to the Vietnam war; whether it be
bowling, kidnapping, or peeing on someone's rug.
While The Dude and Walter are the focal points of the film, they are surrounded
by hilarious characters. Maude Lebowski (Julianne Moore) is the daughter of The
Big Lebowski, and she paints in the nude while hanging from the ceiling on a
cable. Donny (Steve Buscemi) is a brain dead surfer who hangs out with Walter
and The Dude. Of course, we can only assume he's brain dead since Walter never
allows him to complete a sentence. Jesus, the bowler (John Turturro), is a
paedopheliac who dances to salsa music whenever he makes a strike, and who we
see going from door to door telling people that he's a paedopheliac in
accordance with the law; but it's still something you can't picture someone
really doing. Brandt (Philip Seymour Hoffman) is The Big Lebowski's butler, who
laughes inanely at anything anyone says and is the only person The Dude meets
up with who actually calls him The Dude (he hates being called Lebowski). There
are dozens more, but I don't have room to list them all in this review.
The film's main strength is in its bizzare characters and equally unusual
situations. For example, there is a scene in which The Dude drinks a drugged
White Russian (his favorite drink) and goes through a hysterical dream sequence
called "Gutter Balls". The movie's only weakness is that it's difficult to keep
a film going for more than two hours when there is no plot to speak of. As a
result of this, the film does falter at times, particularaly towards the end
where things get a bit too sentimental. All that aside, "The Big Lebowski" is a
brilliant, crazy comedy which could only have come from the Cohen brothers. The
film does run a bit too long at  minutes, but it manages to keep the laughs
coming for nearly the entire length. While the rather unusual humor might not
be for everyone, I strongly recommend it to those of you who like off the wall
stories about off the wall characters, and I give it a well earned four and a
half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
Directed by: Bobby and Peter Farrelly
Written by: Bobby and Peter Farrelly, Mike Cerrone
Charlie Baileygates (Jim Carrey back in comic form) is a member of the 
greatest police force in the US, the Rhode Island state police. He's got 
three children (Anthony Anderson, Mongo Brownlee, Jerod Mixon) who he loves 
with all his heart, even though they clearly aren't his (as one character 
says, they seem to have a year round tan); a wife who loved him till she ran 
off with a midget limo driver; and another personality named Hank. Charlie's 
life now consists of backing down from everything resembling a 
confrontation, or allowing Hank to take over and confront everything. His 
captain (a sadly underused Robert Forster) is giving him one last assignment 
before he may have to let Charlie go. Charlie's last assignment is to drive 
young Irene (Renee Zellweger) upstate to another precinct so she can settle 
a ticket her boss, Dickie (Danny Green), got while driving her car. After a 
short trip, the two arrive at the precinct and meet Lt. Gerke (Chris Cooper) 
and EPA Agent Boshane (Richard Jenkins). The two have questions for Irene 
about Dickie, and things get more than a little complicated from here.
I've always been a fan of Jim Carrey, even back when he was known as the 
white guy on "In Living Color". The man's an absolute master of physical 
comedy and over-the-top facial expressions, and he displays even more of 
this ability in "Me, Myself, and Irene". In fact, during those all too brief 
moments when Carrey is allowed to do his thing with complete abandon, the 
movie is absolutely hilarious. The problems are with the rest of its running 
time, filled with the Farrellys' trademark gross out jokes, which I have 
never cared for. For example, one scene showed a dog doing its business on 
Charlie's lawn while his neighbor watched. Half the audience exploded into 
laughter, while the other half (this was the half I was in) stared at the 
screen in silence - obviously missing the joke. Perhaps watching something 
like this is just too high-brow for me, and I'll always lack the 
intelligence to understand. The scenes I did find funny were ones where 
Carrey beat himself up far worse than what was done to him in "Liar, Liar" 
and one where Charlie and Hank argue about jumping over a bridge. These were 
the kinds of scenes that have made Carrey famous, and I wish the Farrellys 
had thought to include more of them.
"Me, Myself, and Irene" does boast a great supporting cast, but everyone in 
it is sadly underused. Robert Forster, who was terrific in "Jackie Brown", 
is given a total of about five minutes screen time. Chris Cooper, who turned 
in a stellar performance in "American Beauty" as the ex-marine father, is 
given one of the most useless characters in the film (and there are quite a 
few of them). Then we have Anthony Anderson, who is making quite a name for 
himself with hilarious performances in both "Romeo Must Die" and "Big 
Momma's House". Anderson is given one of the funniest parts, along with 
newcomers Brownlee and Mixon as the three beyond intelligent but also 
incredibly vulgar children of Charlie. I've heard the three might get there 
own movie, and I personally look forward to it. Last we have Renee Zellweger 
("Empire Records") as the only relatively normal person in a film full of 
crazies. Zellweger does an excellent job moving back and forth from being 
infuriated with Hank to crazy over Charlie and treating it like it makes 
perfect sense.
So, now that I've gotten through saying what wonderful performances were 
given by some of the cast members and how hilarious Carrey was, you're 
probably wondering why I rated the movie like I did. Well, there are two 
reasons besides the abundant use of gross-out gags. First, the plot is 
useless, cliched, boring, predictable, and a lot more complicated than it 
needed to be (that probably sounded like five reasons, didn't it?); Second, 
I hate movies that run past the point where they're welcome and "Me, Myself, 
and Irene" wears out its welcome with nearly a half hour to go. The movie 
runs a ridiculous 116 minutes, and it should have been only 90. There are 
actually three or four scenes that could be taken as climaxes when I promise 
one would have sufficed. There is one other redeeming quality thankfully, 
which is the nice, quiet soundtrack. It's full of older songs, which play 
softly in the background rather than covering up what the characters are 
saying (as seems to be the current trend). If you enjoyed "There's Something 
About Mary", there's a good chance you'll get a kick out of "Me, Myself, and 
Irene" since it does contain some of the same sexual humor. I'd recommend 
the movie to fans of the Farrellys and give it a slightly generous three out 
of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at: http://www.dependentfilms.net,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Embrace of the Vampire (1994)
Directed by: Anne Goursaud
Written by: Rick Bitzelberger, Nicole Coady, Halle Eaton
Charlotte (Alyssa Milano) is a first year college student. She has a 
boyfriend, Chris (Harrison Pruett), who she's been seeing for some 
considerable amount of time yet won't have sex with. This is apparently 
because her mother placed her in a catholic school and she was raised with 
the belief that sex is bad (she sure talks about it a lot though). Lately, 
she's been having strange dreams about a man she believes is a vampire 
(Martin Kemp). Apparently this vampire was in love with her in a past life 
and has no tracked her down. He must seduce her away from Chris in three 
days or he'll die. So, he begins working his charms on her by giving her an 
ankh which makes her become more and more sexually promiscuous. Soon 
Charlotte is descending into a world of carnal pleasures and begins to 
forget about Chris entirely.
As a movie critic, I don't have the luxury of giving a movie a good rating 
based entirely on the amount of nudity (which, let's face it, is the one 
reason people are seeing this film) it contains. So let's get this out in 
the open right now. Yes, Alyssa Milano loses all her clothes, and yes she 
looks fantastic. That out of the way, "Embrace of the Vampire" is a terrible 
movie. I'd like to be able to classify it as a guilty pleasure, but it's not 
even good enough to earn that title. This is the sort of movie so poorly 
written, directed, and acted, you'd normally be left wondering how in the 
world it got made. I say normally because it should be perfectly obvious how 
it got made, and how it managed to sell so many copies on video. Sadly 
enough, as a skin flick it's sub-par at best. There aren't many nude scenes, 
and the ones that are there are so poorly filmed and written (it took THREE 
writers to create this piece of garbage?) they're fairly painful to watch. 
As a horror movie, "Embrace of the Vampire" is, well, words cannot describe 
it.
Believe it or not, there was acting in this movie. Granted, it was of fairly 
poor quality, but while the actors may have been talentless, they sure gave 
it their best shot. First off we have Alyssa Milano, looking like she'd 
rather be just about anywhere else in the world. I mean this poor girl looks 
so embarrassed I half expected her to break down and start crying right in 
front of the camera. Harrison Pruett, meanwhile, takes his part very 
seriously. I guess this makes sense considering the fact that it's his one 
and only appearance in a "major" motion picture. Why didn't his career go 
anywhere? Well, because despite the fact that he tries very hard, the man 
doesn't have anything even remotely resembling acting talent. The less said 
about Martin Kemp's ("Waxwork II") turn as the vampire the better. I'll make 
this brief. There's overacting in that fun, zany, John Lithgow sort of way; 
and then there's overacting in that painful, horrendous, Martin Kemp sort of 
way. Last up we have Jennifer Tilly ("Bound") in what thankfully amounts to 
little more than a cameo. The less time I have to watch Tilly pretend she 
can act the better.
Not all the film's faults can be blamed on the actors, a good chunk of them 
can land in the laps of the director and writers (three writers; sorry, I 
just can't get over that). Anne Goursaud seems to fancy herself something of 
a skin flick master. Yet let's take a look at her directorial credits, shall 
we? To start with, she directs this with about as much skill as your average 
first year film student. The pacing is horrendous, with an already boring 
story moving along about as quickly as your average PBS special on tree 
slugs. You want to know just how slowly this film moves? Warning, this is a 
minor spoiler (not that you should care). The movie ends with a chase scene 
that involves the hero walking up stairs after the villain. They walk, and 
walk, and look around, and walk some more. It's far more dull than I can 
adequately describe here. So, after making this stupid movie, she goes on to 
make "Poison Ivy 2" (starring a very embarrassed looking Alyssa Milano. Are 
we noticing a trend here?), and the less said about that movie the better. 
Finally she (hopefully) ends her career as a director by helping to create 
"Love in Paris". If you've seen that "movie", I'll that sink in for a 
second. If you haven't seen it, be thankful. It's one of the most ineptly 
acted, directed, and written movies ever made.
As for the writing, if it can really be called that, it's so gloriously 
stupid you'd think the writers were drunk (I guess that's a possibility 
actually). Nothing in this movie is every explained. We never find out why 
the vampire is going to die if he doesn't have Charlotte, or why he can't 
just take her by force and be done with it, or even what happens to half the 
characters who simply vanish midway through the film. The dialogue is 
remarkably bad, often painfully so; the characters have no personalities 
other than he likes sex, she doesn't like sex; and some of the characters 
are so obviously present for one specific purpose or another (mainly 
involving sex, imagine that) you'll probably catch yourself laughing out 
loud when they appear on screen. As for the score, it isn't exactly good, 
but it's not half as terrible as the film's other elements. "Embrace of the 
Vampire" runs 93 minutes, but it feels considerably longer (like several 
days longer). I'd recommend the film only to those who are simply dying to 
see Alyssa Milano in the buff, but to no one else under any circumstances. I 
give it a slightly generous two out of five stars, and a curse upon you Anne 
Goursaud, may you never direct again.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
In "Scream", director Wes Craven and writer Kevin Williamson created a film 
which was a brilliant blend of horror and self mocking comedy. In "Scream 2", 
the same writer, director team made a film which, while not quite as 
enjoyable as the first, blended the two genres as it joyfully poked fun at 
sequels. With "Scream 3", Wes Craven was given the chance to have fun with 
trilogies. The problem is, Williamson wasn't on board this time and was 
replaced by Ehren Kruger ("Arlington Road"). Williamson is sorely missed. 
While all the old characters are back, Sidney (Neve Campbell), Dopey Dewey 
(David Arquette), and Gale Weathers (Courtney Cox) don't seem to be having 
too much fun anymore. The truth of the matter is, I can't blame them. The 
Scream films have turned into the exact thing they were trying to satirize.
The ghost masked killer is back, and he/she is desperately seeking Sidney 
(sorry, couldn't help myself). However, Sidney has gone into hiding out in 
the woods, fearful of yet another killer coming after her. Meanwhile, Stab 3, 
the movie in a movie of the Woodsburough murders, is being filmed. The film's 
cast is becoming worried that the killer may start after them rather than of 
their real life counterparts. Dewey and Gale team up with homicide detective, 
Kincaid (Patrick Dempsey), and attempt to find the killer before he strikes 
again (and again, and again). Tossed into the mix are Stab 3's director, 
Roman Bridger (Scott Foley), the film's producer, John Milton (Lance 
Henriksen), Stab's entire cast, and, somehow, Sidney's dead mother, Maureen 
(I believe played by Priscilla Pointer).
One of the trademarks of the Scream films has been to kill two characters off 
at the very beginning of the film. I personally believe this is a bad idea. 
This makes for an incredibly predictable first ten minutes or so. In "Scream 
2" we may have received this predictable intro, but at least the remainder of 
the film was somewhat surprising. In "Scream 3", an easily forseen film 
follows this intro. One of the other major failings in "Scream 3", as opposed 
to the previous two films, is the lack of any real humor. We all might 
chuckle at Dewey's stupidity at times, but it's not the same. The reason is 
obvious, and for those of you that haven't seen "Scream 2", I advise you not 
to read this next sentence. With the departure of Randy (Jamie Kennedy), all 
the humor has been sapped out of the film. We are no longer granted hilarious 
little monologues about the faults of horror movies or, at times, of movies 
in general.
Despite all this, "Scream 3" does have its moments. Randy does make a brief 
appearance of sorts, which is quite amusing, but promises things the movie 
fails to deliver. Also, watch for a cameo by two characters from another film 
series which comes completely out of left field. It's also nice to see Dewey 
and Gale again, as the two will occasionally indulge in some very funny 
dialogue. However, Sidney has rather worn out her welcome. She's no longer 
the strong character that she was in the previous two films. She now hides 
away from her troubles half the time, and simply appears tired of the entire 
situation the other half (who can blame her?).
I suppose I could go on listing faults all day, but what exactly is the 
point? Nearly every teenager on the planet is going to see this film, despite 
what I say. Perhaps they'll see something in it that I didn't. One more thing 
I simply must note: indie film favorite, Parker Posey ("Coneheads", "The 
House of Yes") is absolutely wasted in the role of the actress playing Gale 
Weathers in Stab 3. Parker is a delightful actress, but she is allowed to do 
nothing here other than follow Gale about, making idiotic and annoying 
comments about how she would have done things differently. "Scream 3" runs 
far too long at 116 minutes. I don't think you'll be able to sleep because 
someone is constantly screaming (imagine that) throughout the film. I'd 
recommend it to fans of really cheesy "b" horror films, but to no one else. I 
give it a generous two and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit: 
www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
At the tail end of the rock and roll era, 1973, William Miller (Patrick 
Fugit) has just discovered music. His mother, Elaine (Frances McDormand), 
wouldn't allow her children to listen to rock and roll for years because she 
claimed it encouraged drugs and promiscuity (She uses Simon and Garfunkle of 
all bands for an example). Despite his mother, William has made a name for 
himself writing music reviews for the school paper and underground 
magazines. His talents are discovered by Lester Bangs (the excellent Philip 
Seymour Hoffman), the editor of Creeme magazine, who hires William to write 
a review of Black Sabbath. While waiting for the band, William meets the 
members of another band, Stillwater. While first rejected, William soon 
endears himself by befriending the group's lead guitarist, Russell Hammond 
(Billy Crudup), and Russell's girlfriend (of sorts), Penny Lane (Kate 
Hudson). Actually, Penny and a small group of other girls are Stillwater's 
band aids. Band aids are similar to groupies, but they travel with the band 
so as to give the members encouragement. So, now a friend of the band, 
William is hired by Rolling Stone magazine to travel with Stillwater, get 
interviews with the band members, and write an article about them. What was 
supposed to be a four day trip soon turns into a month long journey.
Let me get one thing out in the open right now. I don't like the 70's. I 
don't like what they stood for, I don't like the fashions, I don't like the 
politics. That said, I love 70's music. Not necessarily what was sung, but 
the way it was sung. Now, please make note of this: if you don't like 70's 
music, stay far away from "Almost Famous". Classic 70's songs from Led 
Zepplin, Elton John, and dozens more I'm not even going to try to list are 
played constantly in this movie. I'm sure you're wondering about the film's 
humor more than its soundtrack, so let me set your mind at ease. "Almost 
Famous" is hilarious. I don't mean it's funny to those who are able to 
capture sly little in-jokes about the seventies, I mean nearly everyone 
should find this movie to be more than just funny. The dialogue is funny, 
the banter is funny, there are a few classic slap-stick moments, but none of 
it feels out of place. It's a tribute to writer/director Cameron Crowe 
("Jerry Maguire") that he was able to use so many types of humor yet keep 
the film feeling real (it is, after all, based on a part of his life).
Amazingly enough, there isn't one standout performance in "Almost Famous". 
You're probably thinking I've lost my marbles, but it's the truth. Every 
performance in the movie is so good that no one actor outshines another. 
Frances McDormand ("Fargo"), being the talented actress she is, manages to 
make a character who could have been detestable not only sympathetic, but 
even likeable at times. Philip Seymour Hoffman ("Magnolia") turns in his 
usual stellar performance, and it's unfortunate his screen time is so 
limited because he could easily have snagged an Oscar nomination otherwise. 
Billy Crudup ("The Hi-Lo Country"), who I'm usually not overly fond of, 
makes Russell into such a likeable character you'll actually feel 
embarrassed for him when he does stupid things (this happens fairly often) 
like stand on a roof-top, drugged up, screaming "I am a golden god!" Kate 
Hudson is simply magnificent as the object of William's affections. She has 
an excellent scene, which could easily have been made melodramatic, where 
William tells her Russell traded her off for a case of beer. Tears just 
barely come to her eyes, and she turns away for a split second. She looks 
back, her eyes red, but a smile on her face, and asks "What kind of beer?" 
It's enough to break your heart. Finally we have newcomer Patrick Fugit. If 
this boy doesn't get a nomination come Oscar time someone's going to hang. 
William Miller is easily the most endearing movie character not only this 
year, but in the past three or four years too. Part of this is due to the 
way he is written, but all the credit should still go to Fugit.
One of the things that really amazed me about this movie was that Crowe 
managed to keep it paced so well. Every time a dramatic moment would arise, 
I expected it to drag on far longer than was necessary. Imagine my surprise 
when Crowe would keep these moments just long enough to get his message 
across, before throwing us another really funny scene. Some of my favorites 
were the conversations people would have with Elaine. These scenes wouldn't 
seem half as funny if it weren't for one thing, the characters are so real. 
Take a scene where Elaine is talking to Russell on the phone. He starts off 
full of rock star bravado, telling her not to worry about her son. Ten 
seconds later, he's been reduced to saying "Yes Ma'am" to everything in an 
almost child-like voice. This wouldn't have been half as funny if we hadn't 
come to know Russell. Crowe's real gift is his ability to infuse even the 
most minor of characters with a distinct and endearing personality. In a 
lesser movie, a character like Lester Bangs would have been nothing more 
than a distant mentor to William. Here, even with his limited screen time, 
he comes to life.
Are there flaws in "Almost Famous"? Yes, but they're negligible. I suppose 
the primary one would be that a few characters don't get the amount of 
screen time they deserved. Jason Lee's lead singer, for example, may get a 
decent amount of screen time, but other than a few rants against Russell he 
doesn't say much. I guess this was supposed to parallel the situation his 
character is in, always playing second fiddle to Russell, but that doesn't 
explain poor Anna Paquin. Paquin is one of the most gifted young actresses 
in Hollywood, and here, just like in "Hurlyburly", her screen time as one of 
the band aids is almost non-existent. Okay, I don't want to complain about 
this great movie anymore. These minor complaints pale in comparison to what 
a great film Cameron Crowe has given us. In a year of mediocre films, this 
one deserves to be seen by everyone. While the film does run a full 122 
minutes, it doesn't feel nearly that long. I'd recommend "Almost Famous" to 
nearly everyone, unless you truly detest seventies music, and give it a well 
earned four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Meet the Parents (2000)
Directed by: Jay Roach
Written by: Greg Glienna, Mary Ruth Clarke, Jim Herzfeld, John Hamburg
Greg (Ben Stiller) is simply nuts about his girlfriend, Pam (Teri Polo). In 
fact, he was planning on proposing to her until he learned he should ask her 
father, Jack's (Robert DeNiro) permission first. So, the two run off to meet 
the parents. Pam's mom, Dina (Blythe Danner), is a kind, pleasant natured 
woman. Jack, meanwhile, seems to be testing Greg all the time. He even goes 
so far as to hook Greg up to an antique polygraph machine. Nevertheless, 
Greg tries to make the best of things and make a good impression. He meets 
Pam's sister, Debbie (Nicole DeHuff), who is getting married in one day; 
Debbie's mother and father (James Rebhorn, Phyllis George), who take an 
immediate disliking to him; Pam's pothead brother, Denny (Jon Abrahams); and 
finally, in a moment of sheer cruelty, he's introduced to Pam's rich former 
fiancee, Kevin (Owen Wilson). Greg keeps trying to make a good impression, 
but things go from bad, to worse, to absolutely miserable in less than 24 
hours.
There's something strangely amusing about watching people completely 
humiliate themselves, isn't there? Something about watching a person do 
everything we know they shouldn't be doing to get out of already 
embarrassing situations. This is basically the only kind of humor you're 
going to find in "Meet the Parents", so if you're one of those rare people 
who doesn't find that sort of thing amusing, steer clear. Whenever I think 
of this sort of humor, one thing always leaps to mind. A British comedy 
series called "Fawlty Towers", in which John Cleese plays a stuck-up, 
priggish owner of a hotel who is always making himself look like a complete 
jerk. The difference between "Fawlty Towers" and "Meet the Parents" is that 
while Cleese's character deserves everything that happens to him, Stiller's 
character doesn't. Greg is such a likeable guy that it almost ruins the 
humor at times because you feel so sorry for him. If the roles had been 
reversed, and embarrassing things had been happening to Jack Byrnes, it 
might very well have been even funnier. Still, I can't rate a movie based on 
how I would have done things, and that's fine because taken on its own 
merits, "Meet the Parents" is a lot of fun.
"Meet the Parents" is carried entirely by the not inconsiderable comic 
talents of Stiller and DeNiro, but that's to be expected in a comedy like 
this. Having a large cast in a film of this sub-genre would ruin it, because 
you wouldn't get to know the characters' personalities as well. Stiller and 
DeNiro (particularly DeNiro) are obviously having a great time, and this 
carries over well to the audience. Stiller, who can go a bit overboard 
sometimes ("Mystery Men", anyone?), plays Greg as very likeable, but at the 
same time a little too eager to please (that's not an insult, the character 
should be played like that). DeNiro, on the other hand, has a great time 
hamming it up in a gleefully self-effacing performance. He's clearly making 
fun of himself, but he's having a grand time doing it. Blythe Danner ("Mad 
City") gives a pleasant performance as the good-natured mom, Dina. She's so 
nice in fact you can't help but wonder how on earth she hooked up with Jack. 
Teri Polo ("The Arrival") is a fairly talented actress, but she's horribly 
underused. Finally we have Owen Wilson ("Shanghai Noon"), turning up in an 
absolutely useless part as Pam's ex-fiancee. Wilson is a very entertaining 
comic actor, but he's given nothing to do in this pointless role.
If you're walking into "Meet the Parents" expecting another "There's 
Something About Mary", you're in for a disappointment. This isn't the kind 
of movie where you'll be laughing non-stop, it's a bit too sentimental for 
that. There are a lot of chuckles, and one or two massive laughs, but this 
one won't have you ready to pass out from laughing. Two of the absolute 
funniest scenes I can think of are the family's first dinner, and Greg's 
trip to the airport. The dinner scene is so funny because you have to 
sympathize with poor Greg, trying to make a good impression on his future 
mother and father in-law.Yet of course, as you knew was going to happen, 
everything goes horribly and hysterically wrong. The airport scene is great 
because anyone who has travelled has been there before. Greg deals with a 
stream of curt flight attendants who speak in uncaring, monotone voices, 
while they type a mile a minute on their computer consoles and inform him 
that he can't board the plane yet, because they're only seating aisles nine 
and up (he's in aisle eight, and there aren't any other passengers waiting 
to board the plane).
Unfortunately, there are a few things in the film that I didn't care for. 
First, the joke about Greg's name. It's Focker, and as Greg says, it's 
pronounced just how it looks. Now, when they first made fun of this, yes I 
laughed. I laughed the second time, and the third time, and I at least 
chuckled a bit by the fourth time. After about two dozen times making fun of 
his name, I was more than a little tired of it. Of course, that could just 
be me, because the rest of the audience laughed continuously at it. Second, 
a few of the characters are never developed in any way. While this wouldn't 
normally bother me, it does when the cast consists of only about eight 
actors. What bothers me even more is that one of the characters who is never 
developed is Pam. We know next to nothing about her by the end of the movie. 
Those few complaints aside, "Meet the Parents" is an entertaining, fairly 
light hearted movie (I say fairly because it does get a bit mean-spirited 
once or twice). It's a good way to spend a couple of hours, but don't expect 
much from it. The film runs a touch too long at 108 minutes. I'd recommend 
it to fans of Ben Stiller and Robert DeNiro since both turn in highly 
entertaining performances, and I give the movie three and a half out of five 
stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
Ehren Kruger has certainly been busy these days. After last summer's
surprisingly good "Arlington Road" and the surprisingly bad "Scream 3", from
earlier this month, Kruger seems to have become the most sought writer in
Hollywood. The problem is, if "Reindeer Games" is any indication of Kruger's
writing abilities, he may be in some very serious trouble. "Reindeer Games"
is loaded with corny, cliched dialogue and horrendous action sequences. The
film throws "surprises" at you left and right, but anyone can see them
coming a mile away. In fact, the only thing that saved the film from an even
lower rating from me was the presence of Charlize Theron and Gary Sinise,
who manage to spark some life into their dreary parts.
It's one week till Christmas, and Rudy (Ben Affleck) and his best friend,
Nick (James Frain), are just about to be released from prison. Nick's
primary reason for wanting desperately to be released is so that he can be
with Ashley (Charlize Theron), a girl he has fallen in love with while
corresponding with her from prison. However, a brawl in the mess hall
results in his being stabbed and killed. Rudy leaves prison the next day and
hooks up with Ashley, while posing as Nick. While everything goes well at
first, Rudy is soon "introduced" to Ashley's brother, Gabriel (Gary Sinise),
who wants Nick's help robbing a casino. Rudy is unable to convince Gabriel
and his cohorts that he isn't Nick, and he soon finds himself planning a
heist which he has no idea how to accomplish.
While the film started off poorly, I thought maybe it would pick up once the
real bad guys showed up. I knew I was in some very serious trouble when the
line behind the film's title came out. It goes like this: Gabriel has been
told repeatedly by Rudy that he is not Nick, and is now pointing a gun at
Rudy's head. Rudy starts yelling that he is Nick afterall, and Gabriel
responds by lowering the gun and saying "don't you be playing any reindeer
games". I actually spent the next few minutes trying to figure out just what
in the world that meant. My advice, don't bother trying to figure that, or
anything else in this movie out. You'll just get a headache. Rudy also
appears to have the greatest luck in history in this film. I'm not talking
about John McClane kind of luck, where you're shot at by a machine gun for a
few seconds, and it does nothing but hit walls. I mean, Rudy gets shot at
from point blank range constantly and yet always escapes unscathed.
Along with the cheesy dialogue and insanely unbelievable luck, there are the
"surprises". I saw this film in a fairly crowded theater, and, as a result,
I was able to listen in on a few conversations. These mainly consisted of
people saying, "And next, he's gonna" or "I'll bet you that he's really,"
followed by something which would occur in the next couple minutes. As for
the casting, Ben Affleck is horribly miscast as a car thief who's been in
prison for the past five years or so. Throughout the film, he looked like he
just got out of college and took a wrong turn in a really bad neighborhood.
He found everything that transpired to be shocking, and he wanted nothing to
do with any illegal activities. Sorry folks, it's not that I don't believe
in reform, but I don't believe prison turns you into a boyscout either.
Like I said, the two supporting actors, Gary Sinise ("Forrest Gump", "The
Green Mile") and Charlize Theron ("The Devil's Advocate", "The Astronaut's
Wife") are all that make this film worth seeing. However, both these actors
have appeared in far better films, and I suggest you go rent one of them
rather than seeing this one. "Reindeer Games" runs about fifteen minutes too
long at 105 minutes. I recommend it only to those who adore Ben Affleck
(he's in almost every scene),or to those of you who are starved for an
action movie (though this hardly qualifies). If you want my advice, go see
"American Beauty" this weekend instead. I give "Reindeer Games" a sadly
generous two out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Broken Arrow (1996)
Vic Deakins (John Travolta) and Riley Hale (Christian Slater) are two top 
notch air force pilots on a training mission involving a stealth bomber and 
two nuclear warheads. While things are going fine at first, Deakins suddenly 
tries to kill Hale and take over the plane. Gunfire ensues and the plane 
crashes, but not before both pilots manage to eject. Hale lands safely and 
meets up with park ranger Terry Carmichael (Samantha Mathis), whom he 
convinces to help him. Meanwhile, Deakins is in league with a group of 
terrorists who want to steal the two nuclear warheads and get millions from 
the government. The president, realizing there's a broken arrow situation 
(that's when we lose nuclear warheads. Apparently it happens quite often), 
sends in a recovery team. What he doesn't realize is how carefully Deakins 
has planned for everything the government is going to throw at them. Now the 
only people who have any chance at stopping Deakins are Hale and Carmichael, 
and they're running out of time.
Here's a little tip to all future writers out there: when your script is a 
blatant attempt to cash in on recent genre success (in this case the success 
of films like Speed), don't include words like "broken" in your title. So, 
does Broken Arrow live up to its title? Is the film truly broken? Not 
exactly, but it's certainly in need of some repairs. All the requisite 
elements for a classic '90s action flick are here (I didn't think it was 
possible for the words classic and '90s to appear in the same sentence). 
We've got betrayal by a friend, a love interest that begins with mistrust, a 
few shoot-outs, at least one really big explosion, and a villain who acts 
obscenely calm no matter what might be happening around him. So, with all 
the necessary elements present, what could go wrong? Well, in some ways, 
having all the necessary elements is exactly what goes wrong. There are 
simply zero surprises in this movie (aside from the appearance of Howie 
Long, but that doesn't exactly count), and it's in desperate need of a few. 
Is the film still enjoyable? Yes, but in the same way sitting down in your 
favorite beat up, knocked around, but broken in easy chair is enjoyable. You 
know it's bad, you know it should be replaced, but you just can't help 
yourself.
Obviously the acting in a movie like Broken Arrow isn't of supreme 
importance, but I feel it's worth mentioning anyway. John Travolta leads the 
way with his usual over-the-top performance, though thankfully this time 
around it suits the character. I'm sure this man can act in another way, he 
showed he could in Pulp Fiction, but he seems to feel obligated to act 
maniacal in everything else. It works here, but it won't always, and it's 
going to get on peoples' nerves in time. I've always found Christian Slater 
to be a rather underrated actor. People seem to label him as a Jack 
Nicholson imitator and not give him a second thought. I'm not saying the man 
is a great actor, but he's certainly a good one, and he occasionally borders 
on greatness (True Romance for example). This isn't one of those times, but 
Slater does what he can with some wooden dialogue and a cliched character, 
and manages to keep us entertained. Samantha Mathis (Pump up the Volume) 
does a spectacular Sandra Bullock impersonation in the movie, but that's not 
exactly a good thing. As I said, Howie Long shows up, but don't worry, he 
has about five lines so he's tolerable. Delroy Lindo (Gone in Sixty Seconds) 
and Frank Whaley (Swimming With Sharks) both make brief appearances, but 
Whaley is given one of the film's really good lines after being told what a 
"Broken Arrow" is. He gets a shocked look on his face before muttering "I'm 
not sure what's scarier, that we have one right now, or that it happens so 
often you actually have a term for it."
Perhaps what I find most disappointing about Broken Arrow is Graham Yost's 
(who also wrote Speed... what a surprise, eh?) script. It's not that it's a 
bad script, it's simply that it takes no chances. Yost is obviously content 
to write something very similar to Speed and let John Woo work his magic 
(which he does, but more on that later). Not only are there no surprises, 
there's very little excitement this time around. The script places the 
actors in predictable situations, and they respond to these situations 
exactly as we expect them to. The actors all seem to realize they're in a 
film that's little more than a rehash, and they act accordingly. Is it 
possible I'm expecting too much out of the script that it throw some 
surprises at us? I suppose it could be, but I don't think so. Alright, 
script aside, are there any other flaws to the film? Well, the suspension of 
disbelief factor runs just a little bit high. We're expected to believe 
things like a nuclear blast underground would have zero effect on the 
surface, that a nuke is so light it can be dragged up the stairs by one 
person, and of course that the military doesn't monitor those who deal with 
nuclear weapons all that closely. Now, I can look past those things, but I 
can suspend my disbelief pretty well. Your average movie goer might have a 
harder time with it.
What makes the film work despite these things working against it is John 
Woo's ability to direct an action scene like few men can. I'm not saying his 
direction is flawless, mind you. The film's pacing is a little off, jumping 
frantically from scene to scene at times before suddenly slowing down for no 
apparent reason. Still, that's easy to forgive when you see what Woo can do 
with a scene as simple as a shoot-out in a mine. It's really quite 
mesmerizing, watching men jump from cover to cover, blasting everything in 
sight and switching from slow motion to real-time movement every now and 
then. There's something poetic about these scenes, and I fear they can't be 
described adequately. Also working in the film's favor is an enjoyable score 
by Hans Zimmer (Gladiator), and particularly a quaint little bit he wrote 
which plays every time Travolta appears on screen. Broken Arrow does run a 
bit too long at 108 minutes, which could easily have been chopped down to 
90. I'd recommend the film to those of you who love Woo's style of 
direction, Travolta's style of overacting, and Graham Yost's style of 
re-using the same script over and over again. I give the movie three and a 
half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
By now, the vast majority of people will have heard all about "The Sixth
Sense". They will probably have heard about the brilliant ending, the wonderful
performances, and the chilling storyline. This is quite a shame. I'm glad to
have seen it almost immediately after release, so as to avoid much of this
talk. After seeing it, I will say this much, this film is outstanding.
Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Willis) is a gifted child psychologist. The film opens with
he and his wife (Olivia Williams ) celebrating a recent award he received from
the mayor. However, a patient of his from years before named Vincent Gray
(Donnie Wahlberg in a remarkable, if short performance) breaks in, shoots
Crowe, and then himself. Next autumn, we see Crowe physically recovered from
his wounds, but a shadow of the man he once was. His marriage is falling apart
as he and his wife hardly speak and she is slowly drifting into an affair.
Crowe's newest patient is a young boy named Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osmet). Sear
is showing very similar problems to those experienced by Gray back when Crowe
was treating him. Crowe slowly earns the boy's trust, and Sear tells Crowe his
secret. I know almost everyone knows what his secret is, but I'm still not
going to state it here, just in case the reader is one of the few who hasn't
heard.
I often hear Bruce Willis's acting talents criticized, and I will admit that he
tends to play the exact same character over and over in different situations.
He is capable of breaking into other roles however (see In County, 12 Monkeys).
Here, he plays a quiet, caring psychologist who wants nothing more than to help
this boy and get his life back on track. His talents really show through in the
way he is able to take a back seat to the real star of the movie, Haley Joel
Osmet. If Osmet doesn't recieve a nomination from the academy, it will be the
greatest tragedy since "Titanic" beat "LA Confidential" for best picture. 
This is a wonderful movie. Touching, chilling, engrossing, this film is
everything one could want out of a movie. This is not to say it's flawless, but
the few flaws are so tiny they don't detract from the experience at all. As for
the much talked about ending, it's the greatest I've seen since "The Usual
Suspects". It's also not there just for shock value. If one looks back on the
film afterwards, the ending explains many things which didn't entirely make
sense before. 
As I said, the flaws are hardly noticeable, but I feel compelled to point them
out. The music is, at times, rather irritating. Whenever anything surprising
happens, the old, cliche horror movie sound of "dah dah!" is played. At the
start of the film, Anna Crowe wraps her arms around her husband and says
something to the extent of "You're a brilliant child psychologist who has
helped hundreds of people and made great advances in your field". I expected
the frame to freeze on him and have his name appear with a caption explaining
what he did. 
Despite these minute problems, this is an exceptional movie. I reccomend
everyone see it, and give it a well earned five stars.
 * * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
 * * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
 * * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
 * * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
 * - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
Directed by: Norman Jewison
Written by: Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, Sam Chaiton
In the past I have stated that strong performances are incapable of saving an
otherwise weak film (1998's Hurlyburly being a perfect example of this). Denzel
Washington proves me wrong in "The Hurricane", the story of Rubin "Hurricane"
Carter. While the film itself is languid, overlong, and melodramatic,
Washington's performance is outstanding. Washington has, in fact, already
received a Golden Globe nomination for his role, and if he doesn't receive an
Oscar nomination to go along with this, someone in the academy is going to
hang.
Shot in two different time periods, the film tells the story of Rubin
"Hurricane" Carter (Denzel Washington). Portions of the film show Rubin's rise
to fame and troubles with the authorities. The time frame then shifts to
Rubin's days in prison and the efforts of a young man named Lesra (Vicellous
Reon Shannon) and his three Canadian teachers/foster parents (John Hannah, Liev
Schreiber, Deborah Unger) to free him. While the group searches for clues which
will help exonerate Carter, they are threatened and harassed by the racist cop
(Dan Hedaya) who pinned the murder on Rubin thirty years prior.
The majority of the film moves along at such a leisurely pace that I noticed
half of the audience drifting off. During these scenes, all one can do is wait
for Washington to show up and ignite the screen. However, not all of the film
is quite so sluggish. The scenes in which the Canadians hunt for clues move
along at a nice, brisk pace. The biggest fault perhaps lies in the amount of
time spent on Carter's younger days. For nearly half of the very long picture,
we watch Carter get cheated out of everything he's earned again and again.
During these scenes, we're shown Hedaya's vengeful Lieutenant Della Pesce
trying everything he can to have Carter locked up. The problem here is that
despite a great job by Hedaya (as always), the character has no personality.
He's evil, pure and simple. We're given nothing beyond this. In a movie like
"Star Wars" this works fine, but here we really need something more to make us
hate this character.
As for the performances here, I've already made clear how incredible Washington
is, but the majority of the supporting cast is really quite good as well. I
truly believe that Dan Hedaya can't help but act well. Liev Schrieber (Scream
2), Deborah Unger (The Game), and John Hannah (The Mummy) are all adequate at
their worst and entertaining at their best. Clancy Brown (Highlander) and Rod
Steiger (End of Days) both make fairly brief appearances, but both are talented
enough actors that it's a pleasure seeing them at all. The only weak link here
is Vicellous Reon Shannon. I'm not entirely sure if this is due to Shannon
himself, or the rather weak dialogue written for him. I lean towards the latter
because every now and then Shannon seems to break free and display some real
talent. 
"The Hurricane" is by no means a great movie. It can, however, be an
interesting one at times. The film runs 125 minutes, which would normally be a
good running time, but fifteen minutes or so of this movie could easily have
been chopped. "The Hurricane" is at its best when we see how Carter deals with
life in prison, which involves him cutting himself off from anything and anyone
he cared about. However, countless melodramatic scenes and a whole lot of
preaching keep the film from being anything more than fairly good. I'd
recommend waiting for video on this one, but do try and see it. 
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
"It's not important how many people I've killed. What's important is how I
get along with the people that are still alive," Jimmy "The Tulip" Tudeski
(Bruce Willis) solemnly informs a very nervous Nick "Oz" Oseransky (Matthew
Perry) once Oz discovers Jimmy's profession. This line, and the way in which
it is delivered, are great examples of how funny "The Whole Nine Yards" can
be. The problem is, that while it can be hilarious, the film also has a
tendancy to drag at times. The ending goes on for far too long, and the
humor occasionally falls flat. However, when the film pulls its humor off,
it's hysterical.
Oz is a dentist who is so tired of life with his commanding wife, Sophie
(Rosanna Arquette), that he spends his mornings smashing his head against
his steering wheel while driving to work. His secretary, Jill (A hilarious
Amanda Peet), is constantly trying to convince him to divorce his wife but
Oz knows that Sophie will get everything in the divorce settlement. To add
to his miseries, Oz discovers that his new neighbor is hitman, Jimmy "The
Tulip" Tudeski. It turns out that there is a price on Jimmy's head, courtesy
of his associate back in Chicago, Yanni Gogolack (Kevin Pollak). Sophie
wants Oz to go back to Chicago, deliver the whereabouts of Jimmy, and
collect a finder's fee. Oz is of course averse to doing this, since it will
most likely involve Jimmy's killing Oz upon his return. Once he arrives in
Chicago, Oz meets up with another hitman named Frankie Figgs (Michael Clark
Duncan), who is apparently working for Yanni. The situation grows steadily
worse for poor Oz from there.
"The Whole Nine Yards" is one of those fun movies like "Mars Attacks" and
"Galaxy Quest", where you can tell that the entire cast is having a great
time making the film. When a cast acts in this manner it usually carries
over to the audience, as is the case here. Bruce Willis's comic talents lie
mainly in his deadpan delivery of lines, and he is given ample oppurtunity
to display this talent throughout the film. I believe that Matthew Perry's
primary talent is his wide range of facial expressions, and again, he is
given the chance to utilize this ability throughout the movie. Despite the
considerable comic abilities of both these actors, they are overshadowed by
Amanda Peet's ("Isn't She Great", "Simply Irresistable") hysterical
performance as the secretary who wants desperately to become a contract
killer.
"The Whole Nine Yards" has an amazingly complex plot, considering what a
goofy little movie it appears to be at first glance. The film is filled with
double crosses, backstabbing, and false identities. Every character involved
wants some other character dead, and there are various little subplots
relating to these. Unlike "Gun Shy" from earlier this year, the romantic
elements to "The Whole Nine Yards" don't feel tacked on and useless. Though
difficult to take seriously, they blend with the rest of the film quite
well. The cast members work very well together, particularly Bruce Willis
and Amanda Peet. The two of them have a grand old time playing teacher and
student in a very unlikely profession. Peet is so overcome with hero worship
for the elder hitman, she is willing to do anything (and I mean anything) to
win his approval.
The only cast member I found to be rather out of place here was Rosanna
Arquette as the hideous wife of Oz. The problem is, I can't imagine anyone
playing a grotesque character like this. The other major flaw with the film
is the amount of time spent on the ending. The movie could have ended
fifteen minutes earlier than it does with no problem. One more thing I must
note is that "The Whole Nine Yards" is definitely a guy movie. Nearly every
guy in the theatre I attended was laughing uproariously at the movie, while
most of the women present seemed rather baffled by the humor. "The Whole
Nine Yards" runs a little too long at 100 minutes, but it doesn't start to
drag too badly till the end. I'd recommend it to fans of Matthew Perry and
Bruce Willis. If you dislike these actors, I'd suggest you stay far away
from this one. I give the movie three and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Dude, Where's My Car? (2000)
Jesse (Ashton Kutcher) and Chester (Seann William Scott) are two pot heads 
who have just woken up after the wildest night of their lives. They trashed 
their girlfriends' house, and are wanted by the police, and somehow bought a 
lifetime supply of pudding. Unfortunately, there's just one problem: they 
don't remember any of it. They're certain the answers to all their questions 
lie in Jesse's car, but it seems to have vanished off the face of the earth. 
As the two attempt to track it down, events around them change from fuzzy, 
to strange, to downright bizarre. Somehow they seem to have become embroiled 
in an intergalactic war involving a mysterious object of unspeakable power, 
and its power is exceeded only by its mystery (as Jesse points out, that's 
not a lot of help in identifying it). Now, their girlfriends have been 
kidnapped by a group of fanatical nerds, they're being hunted by a 
transsexual thief, two unusual Nordic guys are following them everywhere 
they go, an army of ostriches is on their heels, and if you're feeling 
confused by all of this, just imagine how Jesse and Chester feel!
I feel somehow dumber for having watched this film. It's like being in the 
presence of an hour and a half of utter mindlessness has killed a multitude 
of brain cells. Even worse, and this is something I'm truly ashamed to 
admit, I enjoyed this mindless mess. Dude, Where's My Car? (I still get a 
kick out of that stupid title) is such an inherently good natured movie that 
I simply couldn't help but have a good time. Now, bear one thing in mind, 
this is a teen flick through and through. Everyone over the age of twenty 
three will no doubt sit there, staring at the screen in utter bafflement, 
wondering what all these kids are laughing at. After the movie they'll 
probably whine and complain that it wasn't funny and these kids today just 
don't know what good humor is. Normally, I'd agree, but this movie is not 
directed at adults. It's directed at high school age kids, those who laugh 
at just about anything resembling stupid humor (and this is some very, VERY 
stupid humor), and it will succeed in entertaining them.
Seann William Scott (Road Trip) and Ashton Kutcher (television's "That 
Seventies Show") are asked to carry this film entirely on their shoulders, 
and I'm happy to announce that they do a pretty good job. They're young 
actors, so obviously their comic timing is a little off, but what they lack 
in experience they make up for in effort. These guys are really trying to 
pull some laughs out of the audience, and they manage to do it on several 
occasions. Seann William Scott's primary strength is in his outlandish 
facial expressions. Two scenes that got a chuckle out of me were the look on 
his face while watching "Animal Planet", and the one he made when confronted 
by a very angry ostrich. Ashton Kutcher, on the other hand, is at his best 
when delivering really moronic lines with complete seriousness. My favorite 
was when he asks Christie Boner (Kristy Swanson) if she'd seen his car. She 
gets a little smile on her face, runs a hand down his chest and says, "I saw 
the back seat." Chester's jaw drops, but Jesse gets a confused look and then 
says, "Oh no, I was talking about the WHOLE thing." The rest of the cast is 
required to do very little, and they're all equal to the task. Fans of "Star 
Trek: The Next Generation" should watch for Brent Spiner in a brief 
appearance as a French ostrich farmer (don't ask, I still don't quite get 
that one).
The question you have to answer before even considering walking into Dude, 
Where's My Car? is this: Do I find people acting like complete idiots to be 
funny? Obviously if you are going into this movie expecting a strikingly 
witty and intelligent film, featuring excellent direction and a fascinating 
story, you haven't seen the previews. In fact, you probably haven't seen the 
previews for anything since you've no doubt been living in a cave for the 
past ten years. The humor in this film is more of this variety: Jesse says, 
"Dude, where's my car?" Chester says, "Where's your car dude?" Jesse 
repeats, "Dude, WHERE'S my car?" Chester repeats, then Jesse, then Chester, 
until you want to smack them both upside the head. If that sounds like the 
most moronic thing you've heard in your entire life, avoid this movie like 
you'd avoid your average outbreak of ebola. Yes, about half the jokes in the 
film fall completely flat, even for your average teen-ager. Yes, Danny 
Leiner's direction can only be described as inept at best as he allows 
countless scenes to go on for far too long. Finally, yes, the only people 
who should find this amusing are those who think the idea of a movie jumping 
into a music video up and out of nowhere is hilarious. Sad as it might 
sound, I actually laughed when that happened.
Despite the fact that only half the jokes work, and even they don't work too 
well, the movie does have two other factors working in its favor. First, as 
I mentioned earlier, it's extremely good natured. The closest the film ever 
comes to a mean spirited moment is when an old woman drives over Chester and 
makes a really nasty comment explaining why. Otherwise, these two guys try 
their best to help their girlfriends, make amends for whatever they might 
have done wrong the night before, and track down that infernal car. The 
other thing I really enjoyed about the film is that in a really dumbed down 
way, it rather works as a mystery. Obviously I'm not saying it's worthy of 
Dame Christie or anything, but it's interesting watching the events of the 
previous night slowly fall into place as our intrepid heroes track down one 
bizarre clue after another. The soundtrack to Dude Where's My Car? features 
nothing more than a compilation of fairly modern pop songs. What did you 
expect, a new score from Hans Zimmer? The movie runs a quick 86 minutes, and 
it stops just before wearing out it welcome. I'd recommend it to fans of 
teen movies, but not to adults under any circumstances. I give the flick 
three and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Thirteen Days (2000)
Directed by: Roger Donaldson
Written by: Ernest R. May (novel), Philip D. Zelikow (novel), David Self
Umm, it's the Cuban missile crisis folks. I'm going to keep the plot summary 
really short, and if you want to know more before seeing the film I'd 
recommend breaking out the old history books. When the Russians begin moving 
nuclear warheads into Cuba, the US catches them with aerial photographs. 
When confronted with accusations of their activities, the Russians deny 
everything and claim to the world that the US is trying to make them look 
bad in an effort to start a war. President John F. Kennedy (Bruce 
Greenwood), Robert Kennedy (Stephen Culp), and Kennedy's chief adviser, 
Kenny O'Donnell (Kevin Costner) have to decide what to do about the 
situation. The joint chiefs want to go in, guns blazing and destroy 
everything in Cuba before occupying the country. Other advisers want to set 
up a blockade, keeping any Russian ships from entering Cuba with more 
supplies. The last alternative, which almost no one is willing to consider, 
is to make a deal with Russia and remove the nuclear weapons we have in 
Turkey in exchange for Russia's agreement to remove all weapons from Cuba 
and never put any in the country again. They have to choose quickly, because 
in only thirteen days the nuclear weapons in Cuba will be active.
Let me admit something to you before we begin. There's only one reason I 
went to see Thirteen Days, and I'm ashamed to admit it was just to 
see the preview for the upcoming Lord of the Rings movie. Yes, the 
trailer was very nice, but I was even more surprised to discover that I 
truly enjoyed the movie which followed. I remember seeing the previews for 
Thirteen Days some four or five months ago, and thinking two things 
to myself: "That's going to be completely inaccurate" and "How can a story 
on the Cuban missile crisis be all that suspenseful?" I'm happy to report 
that I was pleasantly surprised on both counts. Being something of a history 
buff, I expected the film to maul the real events. I pictured behind the 
scenes espionage, unreported armed conflicts, hidden murders and more (I 
half expected something as ridiculous as Kennedy himself flying a 
thunderbird into Cuba to drop a necessary bomb). Surprisingly (and 
thankfully), the film stays fairly true to the real events. Yes, some of the 
technology used didn't yet exist, and a few behind the scenes dealings were 
obviously made up/theorized, but otherwise this is quite historically 
accurate (unlike, say, U-571 from earlier in the year). As for the 
suspense, well, lets just say I had no idea a whole lot of talking and 
pensive expressions could keep me on the edge of my seat.
I must say, when I first read the cast list for Thirteen Days, my 
expectations plummeted into the basement. I've never been a fan of Kevin 
"Bad Sci-fi" Costner, and I've never understood peoples' fascination with 
his brand of "I'm playing the exact same guy with different names" acting. 
True to form, his acting in Thirteen Days simply bugged me. In 
particular, his impersonation of a Boston accent was gratingly bad. 
Thankfully, Costner is given tremendous support from the unlikeliest of 
places. Bruce Greenwood, who has shocked and appalled with one rancid 
performance after another (Double Jeopardy and Rules of 
Engagement being prime examples) is outstanding as JFK. This is made 
even more surprising by the fact that Greenwood doesn't particularly look 
like Kennedy and yet you don't question his playing the man for more than a 
minute. Equally impressive is Steven Culp as Robert Kennedy. Culp's career 
thus far has been composed almost entirely of brief parts in films and one 
recurring character in the television series "JAG", but I expect things to 
take off for him after his turn in Thirteen Days. The remaining cast 
members all give decent performances, the only exception in my opinion being 
Madison Mason (Crazy in Alabama), who seems to be having far too much 
fun making his Admiral Anderson look like a complete jerk.
It's a testament to the film's script and Roger Donaldson's (Species) 
direction that a story we all know the end to manages to keep us guessing, 
wondering, and hoping for a good outcome. Thanks mainly to Donaldson, the 
story moves at an unrelenting pace, seldom giving you more than a few 
minutes to sit back and take a breather. These breather scenes tend to 
involve things like Kenny visiting his son's football game, or he and the 
Kennedys sitting in the oval office, reminiscing. Otherwise the scenes are 
packed with taunt verbal action between Kennedy and his advisers. It's true, 
the joint chiefs are shown as a little more villainous than is likely to 
have been true, and the Kennedys are shown as indomitable heros, but you 
know what? That's that's the way Americans seem to like it. Something else 
I've got to commend Donaldson for is the amount of restraint he shows when 
it comes to military conflict being portrayed. As well all know, there 
wasn't any actual combat in the Cuban missile crisis, and I was pleasantly 
surprised to find that there are really only two or three scenes in the 
movie which even resemble armed conflict. They're brief scenes, involving 
planes flying over Cuba taking pictures while ground troops and SAM silos 
take pot shots at them, but there's something patriotic about seeing our 
boys fly in there, and I'll be damned if it didn't bring a tear of pride to 
my eye. Alright, I'm better now.
The faults with Thirteen Days are few, but significant. First, and 
most importantly, the film simply runs out of steam. I realize it's 
difficult for any movie to keep its audience engrossed for well over two 
hours (though Traffic managed that very thing with apparent ease), 
but after a tense, involving two hours, the sudden plummet into the depths 
of boredom in the film's final half hour comes as something of a shock. 
Also, the film ends on a schmaltzy, feel-good note which feels quite out of 
place compared with the rest of the movie. A minor quibble would be with a 
few of Donaldson's filming ideas. For example, at times the film suddenly 
goes into black and white for a few moments before switching back into 
color. There appears to be no rhyme or reason to when this will happen, and 
it succeeds in doing little more than confusing the audience (I heard a 
fellow behind me telling his wife he'd go talk to the manager about their 
projector being broken). Fortunately, working heavily in the film's favor is 
the score by Trevor Jones (Dark City). The score is not only 
brilliantly written, but perfectly utilized; underscoring and highlighting 
every scene it's played during rather than overpowering the action on 
screen. 13 Days runs a long 145 minutes, so get some rest before you 
catch it. I'd recommend the film to fans of political thrillers and history 
buffs (who, if nothing else, will get a kick out of some of the technology 
being used) and give it four out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Contrary to what the previews might have you believe, "Deep Blue Sea" is not a
film about smart sharks. I don't personally believe the sharks involved were
particularly intelligent. The movie is actually about stupid people. For
example, in one scene, our supposedly brilliant scientists are trapped in their
cozy little underwater lab while a shark smashes the large window they're all
staring through. The window cracks all over the place, water starts leaking
through, and still the group continues to stare. Finally, it shatters
completely, and only Samuel L. Jackson's character has the brains to tell
everyone to run. I truly believe that if he hadn't said anything, they all
would have been washed out into the sea, still staring blankly ahead. This is
simply one of the more idiotic scenes in an incredibly stupid movie.
Dr. Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows) is a driven scientist who is obsessed
with finding the cure for Alzheimer's. The problem is, she's not showing any
results, and her funding is about to be cut. So she drags her benefactor,
Russell Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson), out to her little floating laboratory to
show him all that she has accomplished. Her crew consists of a shark expert
(Thomas Jane), a cook (L. L. Cool J), two scientists (Jacqueline McKenzie,
Stellan Skarsgard), and the brainy, though irritating, computer expert (Michael
Rapaport). I think there were a few others, but it's obvious from the start
that they're going to be shark food. The sharks at this lab are apparently
smarter than the average bear, and as a result they are able to break free of
their cages and wreak havoc. True to disaster movie formula, there is a massive
hurricane at this time (darn the luck). The valiant (though still incredibly
stupid) crew tries to make it to the surface before the sharks make meals of
them.
Before I go any further, I must confess to being afflicted by a massive fear of
sharks. I remember reading about carpet sharks when I was a little kid, and how
they hid in the sand, just waiting for some unsuspecting sap to swim nearby so
they could have a snack. Anyway, that fear has haunted me to this day, and
"Deep Blue Sea" still didn't scare me in the slightest. In this modern age,
with its huge advances in computer technology, you'd think they could have made
these sharks look mildly realistic. I'm afraid not folks. These look like
something out of an old '50s movie, like "The Lost World" (the original, not
the equally horrible '97 version). So I sat there, watching these stupid people
being chased by incredibly fake looking sharks, and all that I could think was,
please let either the sharks or the people die, so this torture will end.
How this pitiful excuse for a script managed to attract an actor of Samuel
Jackson's caliber will forever be a mystery to me. All I can figure, is he was
either simply bored out of his mind, or the producers drove up to his house
with a truck full of money (which would explain why they couldn't afford decent
special effects). With the exception of LL Cool J, the remaining actors are
unimpressive, even in roles which require them to do nothing more than run
around screaming. As for poor LL Cool J, he somehow manages to spark some life
into his role as the  hassled and underappreciated cook. The truth is, I really
feel sorry for LL Cool J. The man is not an untalented actor, yet he is handed
nothing but rotten scripts ("Toys", "Any Given Sunday"). I believe he could do
something with a good, comic script.
I don't know if I can even recommend this film to fans of cheesy "b" horror
movies, because it's not at all scary. However, I would recommend it to those
of you who want to see how not to use digital technology. I suppose there are a
few humorous scenes (though I can't seem to remember what they were), and
several unintentionally hilarious ones (the massive sharks fitting through tiny
little doors is a good example). "Deep Blue Sea" runs an excruciatingly long
104 minutes, during which you'll either fall asleep, or be too awe struck at
the stupidity of this film to do so. Stay far, far away from this one or
studios might think there is money to be made in creating more films like it. I
grant it a sadly generous one and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Unforgiven (1992)
In the town of Big Whisky, Wyoming, a prostitute has just been sliced up by 
two of her clients. After the local sheriff, Little Bill (Gene Hackman), 
makes the attackers pay only by giving the prostitute's employer some of 
their horses, her friends take matters into their own hands. They pool their 
money and place a bounty of one thousand dollars on the two cowboys, and 
send word out far and wide. William Munny (Clint Eastwood) used to be a 
known thief and murderer. Now he tries to take care of his two children by 
running a pig farm out on the plains. He's approached by The Schofield Kid 
(Jaimz Woolvet), a young gunfighter trying to make a name for himself. The 
kid proposes that he and Munny go to Big Whisky and collect on the bounty. 
Munny has no desire to return to his old ways, but he's failing as a farmer, 
and he needs the money. So Munny agrees on one condition, his old friend Ned 
Logan (Morgan Freeman) be allowed to join them. The three head for Big 
Whisky, The kid eager to make a name for himself, Munny and Logan haunted by 
ghosts from their murderous pasts.
There are some who will no doubt claim Clint Eastwood is biting the hand 
that fed him. They will say he is now slandering the genre that made him a 
star, and for that he should be crucified, stoned, hanged, or worse. I 
completely disagree. I don't believe "Unforgiven" is anti-western, I think 
Eastwood is simply showing a different face to the old west. Be forewarned, 
the face he's showing is a dark, depressing, and sadly realistic one. In 
fact, the entire movie is saturated by a sense of sadness. Watching the film 
on mute, you would still be able to feel the sense of emptiness Eastwood 
brilliantly conveys with his direction. Make no mistake, this isn't an 
action movie. It's a character study, and while the outstanding performances 
add a lot to the film's characters what really makes these people real is 
the way they are written. In David Peoples' ("Blade Runner") script, 
everyone is human. There are no superheroes nor villains, no one's perfect 
and no one's inhuman. Every character makes mistakes, everyone has a 
breaking point, and the sad fact of the matter is, there are no good guys. 
Oh sure, there are protagonists and antagonists, but you can understand 
everyone's motives and actions. In a strange sort of way, you won't want 
anyone to die, not even Little Bill. Yet you'll know, deep in your heart, 
that Bill Munny's words are true: "We all got it comin kid."
One of the best things about "Unforgiven" is the cast. While I'm obviously 
referring primarily to the three main cast members, Eastwood, Freeman, and 
Hackman, the entire supporting cast does a great job as well. To start with, 
we've got Eastwood, the king of westerns himself. Eastwood does an amazing 
job as a man trying to convince himself that he has changed his ways. The 
way he plays William Munny we think this character is really all his past 
characters (Josey Wales, the man with no name, even Dirty Harry) rolled up 
into one, trying to both atone for and forget the things he's done in the 
past. Then we have Morgan Freeman, playing a man too loyal and honest for 
his own good. Freeman brings remarkable depth and intelligence to every 
character he plays, and that has seldom been more true than it is here. 
Finally we have Gene Hackman, giving a performance the likes of which I've 
seldom seen. Hackman makes Little Bill into something much more than just 
another archetypal western villain. Little Bill is already written as having 
a sort of twisted sense of justice, and a dream to do nothing more than work 
on his house (this provides some of the film's few comic moments), but 
Hackman imbues the character with something more. It's hard to describe, and 
I know I can't do it justice here. This performance actually has to be 
witnessed to be appreciated.
You're no doubt wondering if there's any action in the movie. Yes there is, 
but not in the traditional sense. One of the things that most impressed me 
about "Unforgiven" was the way in which Eastwood could film excellent action 
scenes without glamorizing them. In fact, quite the opposite approach was 
taken. For example, there's a scene in which Munny shoots a man from some 
distance off with a shotgun. The hapless fellow crawls behind a rock, 
trailing blood behind him while his friends take cover. There's no pulse 
pounding music here, no war cries from the combatants, only the victim 
crying for water. Finally Eastwood shakes his head sadly and yells out at 
the man's friends, "Will you give him a drink of water for Christ's sake?! 
We ain't gonna shoot!" Even the giant, climactic shoot out at film's end is 
like this (oh come on, you knew there was going to be one). There's nothing 
glorious about the killing, each character simply does what they feel they 
have to do. It's a remarkable achievement by Eastwood, being able to film 
the movie in such a way, and a lot of it has to do with his use of the 
score, by composer and longtime Eastwood collaborator Lennie Niehaus. The 
score is haunting and powerful, but never lively or upbeat. I know that 
sounds bad, but it's remarkably effective. If a loud, uplifting score had 
been written for the gun fights it would have taken something away from 
them. By keeping the music low, or even completely unused during the fights, 
Eastwood makes them much more realistic and saddening.
When I first saw "Unforgiven" back in '92, I dismissed it as a good, if 
overrated, western about growing old. I saw it again about two years later 
and dismissed it again, but decided it wasn't about growing old, it was 
about vengeance and not being able to escape ones past. I watched it for the 
third time about a month ago, and I'm still haunted by it. There's something 
powerful and moving about this film that, try as I might, I can't put my 
finger on. It manages to interweave not only the two story arcs I described 
above, but dozens more into a film that has a rightful place on my personal 
100 best of all time list. Those who shove the film away as just another 
western, or try to place a similar restrictive title on it do so at their 
own risk. Don't take this movie lightly, and don't ignore it or you're doing 
yourself a great disservice. I know it seems like a long film, running 131 
minutes, but I was so involved I didn't even notice the time going by. I'd 
recommend "Unforgiven" to everyone, whether you like westerns or not, and 
give it a full five out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
Directed by: Roger Christian
Written by: L. Ron Hubbard (novel), Corey Mandell
Once in a great while there comes a movie which is regarded as an instant
classic. Movies like "Ben Hur" and "The Godfather" were known to be great
films the moment they hit theaters. Roger Christian's "Battlefield Earth",
based on L. Ron Hubbard's thousand page epic, is not one of these movies.
"Battlefield Earth" is more akin to "Plan 9 From Outer Space"; a movie so
incredibly bad that it will one day develop a cult following. "Battlefield
Earth" is a movie words cannot adequately describe. I hate to say this, but
I truly believe it must be witnessed to be fully appreciated. Most bad films
have at least one redeeming quality to them; whether it be unintentional
laughs, one truly good scene, or some interesting special effects. This
movie somehow manages to possess no redeeming qualities. I must admit, it's
not an easy task creating such a movie, which is why they only come along
once in a great while. Appreciate this movie for the few weeks it will be in
theaters folks. You'll not see another one like it for a great while.
It's the 31st century, and man is an endangered species (so the opening
credits tell us in a cheap, green home computer font). The Psychlos, a race
of nine foot tall whiners, have taken over the planet in a battle which took
only nine minutes. Now, 1000 years later, there are only a handful of humans
remaining, and they are used as cheap labor by the Psychlos, led by the
maniacal Terl (John Travolta). A lone woodsman, Jonnie Goodboy Tyler (Barry
Pepper), is on a quest to find what happend to his people when he is
captured by the alien invaders. Found to be somewhat intelligent by the
Psychlos, he is trained in how to speak their language and handle their
machinery. Tyler soon decides that he must lead his people in a revolt or
the human race will become extinct. With nothing but his wits, a few fellow
captives, some explosives, and a handy fleet of Harrier jets, he leads his
people in a final strike against their oppressors.
Let me start by listing the things I liked about this film. Okay, now on to
the rest of the movie. You can tell from the opening titles that you're in
for a very bumpy ride. The picture leaps right into its narrative without
explaining anything. Instead, we meet Barry Pepper's ("Saving Private Ryan")
character, and before we know anything about him, he is off on his quest. In
fact, there is no emotional involvment with any character in this movie. At
one point, Terl has captured Tyler's girlfriend and threatens to kill her if
Tyler doesn't obey him. I think this was supposed to be an emotional scene,
watching Tyler grapple with how to save his girlfriend's life. The problem,
however, is that we know next to nothing about Tyler, and his girlfriend has
just been introduced so we couldn't care less about her. Things are even
worse with Tyler's comrades. they die all the time without anyone really
knowing just who died. Everytime anyone dies, the music blasts through the
theater, the characters scream silently, and the audience stares at the
screen in complete confusion about who just bit the dust.
Allow me to now list everything that is wrong with this movie. The scenery
is obviously fake and created mostly from models or really bad mat jobs
(watch for the mat job on a scene where a character falls off a cliff; it's
laughably bad). The special effects look like they were done on the same
home computer used for the opening credits. The costumes consist of cheap
looking furs for the humans and shoddy silver things for the aliens
(Travolta manages to appear even more overweight in his costume). The battle
scenes are shot entirely in slow motion and with no sound. These fights
consist of watching humans and aliens getting hit by little white bursts of
light which bounce off them but cause the victims to fall dead to the ground
(except Jonnie Tyler, who gets shot numerous times but always springs back).
The dialogue is amazingly cheesy, and is made even worse by the over-the-top
performances from all the cast members. The score is quite obnoxious,
booming dramatically through the speakers all the time regardless of what
the characters are doing. Barry Pepper raises his hand, the music booms
dramatically; Barry Pepper eats a raw rat, the score plays so loudly you'll
be vibrating in your chair. There is much more to hate in this film, but I
don't have room to mention it all in one review.
In case you're wondering just who Roger Christian is, allow me to give you a
quick biography. Christian is the fellow who directed 1997's "Masterminds",
and little else. He also worked as a crew member on the first "Star Wars"
movie, which would explain his affinity for using wipes. The problem is,
while George Lucas may have used all sorts of different wipes throughout the
"Star Wars" movies, Christian uses the same wipe over and over again in
"Battlefield Earth". The wipe starts in the middle and goes outward, again
and again, between nearly every scene. Not only is it amateurish to use the
same wipe repeatedly, but it's a cheap looking, unimaginative wipe. The
actors are given very little to do, and they chew the scenery like you've
never seen. Barry Pepper, who was interesting and a little creepy as the
Christian sniper in "Saving Private Ryan", is given nothing to do as the
always grunting Jonnie Tyler. John Travolta overacts like you've never seen
before, and rather than appearing menacing as I believe was intended, he
looks like an eight foot tall clown. Only Forest Whitaker ("Ghost Dog: The
Way of the Samurai"), playing Terl's henchman, appears to realize what a
horrendous movie he is in.
For nearly any science fiction film, a certain amount of suspension of
disbelief is necessary. "Battlefield Earth" requires more than any other
movie I have seen in recent years. Nearly every scene contains some
ludicrous idea that an eight year old wouldn't buy. Try this out: the
Psychlos are interested in mining gold from a mountain, and they use the
humans to do so. Jonnie Tyler, being the genius he now is, takes bricked
gold from Fort Knox and gives it to Terl in place of the gold they didn't
mine. There are two serious oversights here. First, Terl actually believes
that Tyler smelted the gold into bricks for him; second, Terl's scanners
could find gold ore in a mountain, but he couldn't find any sitting in a
demolished Fort Knox? Not ludicrous enough for you? Try this one on for
size: Tyler and his troops just happen to find a fleet of Harriers sitting
armed, fueled, and in perfect working order after one thousand years.
Tyler's men, who could barely speak intelligibly not too long ago, then
proceed to learn how to fly them like experts in less than a week. There are
dozens of examples like these two, but I've wasted enough time writing about
this stupid movie. I'd recommend "Battlefield Earth" to aspiring directors
so they can see how NOT to make a sci-fi movie, but to no one else under any
circumstances. The movie runs a torturous 117 minutes, and I give it one out
of five stars.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to:
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Pitch Black (2000)
I've got to hand it to actors recently, they've really been saving writers'
butts. From last year's "The Hurricane" being saved by Denzel Washington's
amazing performance, to last week's "Reindeer Games" being held afloat by
Charlize Theron and Gary Sinise, actors have been the only reason to see
several films recently. I'm afraid that "Pitch Black" is no exception. It's
a bleak, dreary, boring movie, made bearable only by the presence of Vin
Diesel ("Saving Private Ryan", "Boiler Room"), as the film's very reluctant
hero. Radha Mitchell is fairly good as the film's female lead, but no one
could have hoped to match Diesel for sheer intensity. There aren't many
actors who make you anxious to hear what they're going to say next.
A starship filled with colonists has just crash landed (for reasons never
fully explained) on a planet with three suns. Of the forty passengers, only
ten have survived. Seven are colonists, led by Iman (Keith David); one is
the ship's pilot, Carolyn Fry (Radha Mitchell); one is a police officer
named Johns (Cole Hauser); and the last is his captive, a murderer named
Riddick (Vin Diesel). The group soon finds an abandoned mining camp, where
the former residents don't appear to have left voluntarily. While there,
they discover that the day never ends on this planet, and its natural
habitants can only come out when it is completely dark, because the light
harms them. It would seem that the colonists have chosen a bad time to crash
land because an eclipse is about to take place,
and the entire planet will be plunged into darkness.
One of the things I first noticed about this movie was the way it was
filmed. Everything has a rather bleached, dried-out look to it. I think this
was intentional, and the film makers were attempting to show the effects of
three suns beating down on the planet at once; but all they succeeded in
doing was making the movie look so low budget that they had no money to
spend on good film. As if this weren't enough, the camera constantly jostles
about or quick cuts from person to person in a confusing manner. While this
might make sense during scenes when the creatures attack, it is used all the
time - even when people are only talking.
I think the biggest problem with "Pitch Black" is that it commits the
ultimate sin for a horror film. That is, of course, that a horror film
should never be dull, and "Pitch Black" is frequently. I believe that a good
horror movie should never let you relax for too long. I'm sure fans of "The
Blair Witch Project" will argue this with me, since that film managed to be
dull the whole way through but still scared some people. During "Pitch
 Black", I actually saw people in the theatre falling asleep during the
movie's frequent, very long conversations about things no one could care
less about. For example, there is a scene where we apparently learn some
grave secret about Johns; though they talk endlessly about it, I still
couldn't tell you just what exactly the secret was supposed to be.
Two more things I must make note of. First, despite Diesel's great
performance, his character's transformation is more than a little hard to
swallow. Second, could someone please explain to me how a desert planet,
with no plant life and therefore no herbivores, could support hordes of
massive, meat eating creatures? We never see anything else they could snack
on, so how do they stay alive? Oh well, just another stupid oversight in a
stupid movie I suppose. "Pitch Black" runs 108 minutes, which will feel much
longer than it actually is. I'd recommend it only to see Vin Diesel's
performance, and if you really want to see that, do yourself a favor and
wait for video. I give it two out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now:
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
Directed by: James Mangold
Written by: Susanna Kaysen (novel), James Mangold
Before I begin, allow me to point out that this is hardly the type of movie I
would normally review, thus my opinion may be a tad biased. That said, "Girl,
Interrupted" is a rather unoriginal film (think of an all female version of
"One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest") with some wonderful performances, but
without a great story to pull them together. In fact, I'm having difficulty
determining just what the point of this film was. If there were there a
stronger plot at work here, I believe this could have been a good little flick.
Susanna (Winona Ryder) has the distinction of being the only member of her
graduating class not going on to college. Due to this and several other minor
mental problems (such as taking a bottle of Asprin with a Vodka chaser), her
parents have decided the best place for her is Claymoore mental institute.
While there, she meets the sociopathic Lisa (Angelina Jolie), whom she forms a
friendship with. The two are soon driving the head nurse, Valerie (Whoopi
Goldberg), up a wall, and they decide the time has come for them to leave the
institute.
In addition to the uninvolving plot, we're given a story that is more than a
little implausible. The girls in this hospital seem able to leave the premises
whenever they feel like it simply by sneaking out through hidden tunnels and
picking locks. I know this is based on the book by Susanna Kaysen, and the book
is based on her real life experiences, but this still seems more than a little
implausible. Another rather irritating idea which is used here involves the
girls never taking their medication, but simply hiding and trading pills. This
isn't used to advance the plot in any way, it simply goes further to show how
ridiculously unbelievable the story is.
The reason to see this movie, and the reason I gave it three stars rather than
two and a half, is the acting. Angelina Jolie is in top form here as the
manipulative, unpredictable Lisa. I haven't been a large fan of Jolie in the
past; but I believe part of this is due to her choosing the wrong roles, such
as those in "The Bone Collector" and "Tin Cup". Wynona Ryder may not be quite
as effective as the ever confused Susanna, but she's still more than simply
adequate. She's given some interesting dialogue near the beginning of the film,
where she attempts to describe her illness to a doctor. The supporting cast is
uniformly good, with especially interesting performances from Clea DuVall,
Brittany Murphy, and Elizabeth Moss as fellow patients; and look for a
particularly good cameo by Vanessa Redgrave as a psychiatrist
At times, "Girl, Interrupted" is more a comedy than a drama, and I personally
wish it had tried to be comedy a bit more often. For example, a scene in which
the girls are taken to an ice cream parlor is hysterical; but it grows serious
again far too quickly, and you begin missing these moments of humor. The film
runs a tad too long at 127 minutes, and it never seems to know when to end. We
keep expecting each scene to be the last, but another soon follows. I can't
quite recommend "Girl, Interrupted" in theatres, but I would suggest trying to
catch it on video, if for no other purpose, to see Angelina Jolie's remarkable
performance. I give it three stars.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Valentine (2001)
Directed by: Jamie Blanks
Written by: Tom Savage (novel), Donna Powers, Wayne Powers, Gretchen J. 
Berg, Aaron Harberts
Remember the boy who everyone teased back in elementary school? Well 
thirteen years later he sure remembers all those girls who gave him the cold 
shoulder. Kate Davies (Marley Shelton), Paige Prescott (Denise Richards), 
Dorothy Wheeler (Jessica Capshaw), and Lily Voight (Jessica Cauffiel) have 
just learned that one of their old chums from school has been brutally 
murdered. Said chum had received a threatening valentine signed J.M. only 
moments before the attack. The girls get to thinking, and decide it could 
just be that kid, Jeremy, whom they all (except the kindly Kate of course) 
used to tease. Now suspicions are running rampant as the girls try to decide 
who Jeremy could really be. Is it Kate's drunken boyfriend Adam (David 
Boreanaz)? Or how about Dorothy's latest beau, Campbell (Daniel Cosgrove)? 
Or possibly one of the hundreds of fellows Paige has seduced over the years? 
Whoever it may be, the girls are getting knocked off one by one, and they'd 
better find out soon.
My theory remains sound. There is a direct correlation between the number of 
writers on a movie, and how bad the movie is. One writer, you're in good 
shape; two, you should still be alright; three, things are looking bleak; 
four, don't hold your breath waiting for that Oscar; five, you might as well 
entitle the movie "Bomb." Jamie Blanks' (previously responsible for 
unleashing Urban Legend on unsuspecting audiences) Valentine 
nestles itself nicely between those last two options. It's not a complete 
bomb, but it's about as close as you can get before crossing the line. 
Nearly all the requisite brainless teen slasher movie elements are present: 
talentless actors, talentless director, cardboard characters, predictable 
deaths, painful dialogue. The only things this movie is missing which most 
slasher flicks contain are cheesy gore and cheesier laughs. The latter is 
most confusing, since some modern slasher flicks have a certain amusing, 
self-referential wit; and the others have a certain irritating self 
referential wit. Valentine, on the other hand, is strangely somber 
and laughess. The characters appear dreary and depressed even before the 
murders start, and that tone doesn't let up.
Critiquing the acting "talents" in your average slasher movie is an utterly 
pointless endeavor at best, yet I feel compelled to subject myself to it 
once more. What better place to start than with a quick description of 
Denise Richards' (Wild Things) unique interpretation of acting? 
Actually, in all seriousness, Denise doesn't do too poorly this time around. 
Of course, that could be because the majority of her co-stars are somehow 
even worse than she, but I'll leave that decision up to you. Next up we've 
got Jessica Cauffiel (Urban Legends: Final Cut) in a slight part, and 
I'm happy to report that she gives a slight performance. I won't subject you 
to a description of Jessica Capshaw's (The Love Letter) vain attempts 
at pretending to act, suffice to say she's in desperate need of coaching, 
practice, or a new career. Marley Shelton (Sugar & Spice) is 
adequate.. I suppose.. in her own limited sort of way. I do realize it's 
asking too much for really good performances in a teen slasher flick, but 
what can I say, I'm greedy. I won't bother talking about most of the male 
actors since none of them are given any development beyond "I wanna have 
sex!" The only exception is David Boreanaz (TV's "Angel"), woefully miscast 
but still able to give a pretty fair performance.
You'd think four writers and a novelist would be able to think of something 
resembling an original death scene. Instead we get situations like this 
(warning, minor spoiler): guy goes down to cellar to light pilot light. He 
can't get it lit, and we know the killer is down there. What follows is 
about three minutes of this fool trying to light one match without blowing 
it out while the soundtrack implies a creeping terror is right behind him. 
Then... just when he gets it lit.. the killer hits him in the back with an 
axe and leaves. That's it. Gee guys, how much time did you spend thinking 
that one up? I wish I could say there was one death scene which stands out, 
but they all meld together in one mesh of stupidity. We're treated with four 
or five of these frankly lame murder scenes before the whole thing comes 
together in an ending which is likely to leave you scratching your head for 
about five or ten minutes before you decide you just don't care. Don't 
bother trying to figure out who the killer is, the writers are gracious 
enough to make this more than a little obvious for the mystery impaired.
Being the nice guy I am, I feel compelled to point out the film's 
highpoints, few and far between though they may be. There's a vaguely 
amusing scene between Dorothy and her new step-mother (who it turns out is 
about Dorothy's age); there's a funny little line where Kate, referring to 
Adam, says "Sure, he's no Angel."; and granted, some people will no doubt 
enjoy the death scenes for no other reason than that someone dies in them. 
Otherwise, the film is bland, boring, pointless, and the definition of 
everything I've come to expect from modern Hollywood horror writers. If you 
loved the intellectual challenge of such films as Urban Legend and 
I Know What You Did Last Summer you'll no doubt get a kick out of 
this one, no matter what I might say to try and discourage you. Always 
worthy of mention in a slasher flick is the score, which in this case 
consists of little more than that foolish "Ka-drum!" sound whenever the 
audience is supposed to be startled by something like a person walking 
suddenly in front of the camera. Valentine runs an irritating 96 
minutes. I'd recommend the film to those who, for reasons I will never fully 
comprehend, enjoyed last fall's god awful Urban Legends: Final Cut, 
and give the film a slightly generous two and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
Directed by: Bryan Singer
Written by: Bryan Singer, David Hayter, Tom DeSanto
In the world of the X-men, the human race is divided into three factions. 
First we have the normal humans, led by Senator Kelly (Bruce Davison). 
Second, there are the students of the kindly Professor Charles Xavier 
(Patrick Stewart), who are working to live side by side with regular humans. 
Professor X and is students are mutants, meaning genetic mutation has 
granted them strange and powerful abilities. The professor is able to read 
peoples minds and control their actions through telepathy. His X-men (older 
students who have learned to control their abilities) include Cyclops (James 
Marsden), who can fire powerful beams from his eyes; Storm (Halle Berry), 
who can control the weather; and Jean Grey (Famke Janssen), who can move 
objects with her mind. Professor Xavier's old friend, Eric Magnus, aka 
Magneto (Ian McKellen), controls the second faction. This group believes 
that humans and mutants are heading for a war, and he intends to make the 
first strike. Magneto and his flunkies: Sabretooth (Tyler Mane), Mystique 
(Rebecca Romijn-Stamos), and Toad (Ray Park) intend to turn the leaders of 
the world into mutants so they will be on Magneto's side when the war comes. 
To do this he requires one of Xavier's two new students. The students are 
Wolverine (Hugh Jackman), who can heal from nearly any wound and is able to 
eject razor sharp claws from his hands; and Rogue (Anna Paquin), a young 
girl who can drain the life out of people and mutants just by touching them. 
Xavier has to determine which student Magneto is after and why before he can 
carry out his plans.
Guess what folks, that plot summary could have been even longer. Bryan 
Singer has managed to condense 38 years of X-men comics into one movie. I'd 
better warn you right now, if you didn't have a clue what I was talking 
about when you were reading that summary, avoid this movie because you are 
going to be completely lost. If the plot sounded interesting to you try to 
see the film with an X-men reader so they can explain things to you in 
advance. Okay, the rest of this review is directed entirely at those of you 
who would qualify as X-men fanatics (you know who you are, don't try to deny 
it). When I first saw the previews for this film several months back I was 
more than a little skeptical. In fact, the only thought that was running 
through my mind while I watched the preview was "Oh dear lord, what have 
they done?" To say I was pleasantly surprised by the final product would be 
an understatement. Bryan Singer has done a bang up job, creating a truly fun 
and exciting summer movie in a year full of dull, formulaic films. In fact, 
I haven't been to a summer movie that was this much fun since 1998's "The 
Mask of Zorro".
I know one of the largest concerns many X-men fans (myself included) had 
with the new movie was the casting of Australian actor Hugh Jackman as fan 
favorite Wolverine. The Wolverine seen in the comics stands a little over 
five feet tall, is built like a brick wall, and looks to be about forty five 
years old. Hugh Jackman is over six feet tall, is slender but muscular, and 
looks like he's in his early thirties. As it turns out this was one of the 
best casting choices in the movie. Not only is Jackman a great actor, but 
his appearance looks more threatening in real life than I think someone with 
the comic character's appearance would have. There are three other really 
great actors in "X-men", but I'll get to them in a minute. First I want to 
cover the minor characters. James Marsden ("Gossip") and Halle Berry 
("Bulworth") are both woefully miscast, though I'm not sure anyone could 
have played Cyclops in quite the right way. Tyler Mane (of professional 
wrestling fame) and Rebecca Romjin-Stamos ("Dirty Work") aren't required to 
act much, but they fit their parts quite nicely. Ray Park ("Star Wars: 
Episode One") hams it up something fierce as Toad, but he's obviously having 
such a good time that it's easy to forgive. Finally we have Bruce Davison 
("Apt Pupil") playing Senator Kelly in a nice, believable fashion. This 
character could have been over-played to the point of being ridiculous, 
yelling anti-mutant sentiments at the senate and behaving much like Hitler. 
Davison keeps his performance restrained and soft spoken, which makes us 
believe a person like this could still have power this day and age.
The three great performances come from Patrick Stewart (Star Trek: The Next 
Generation), Ian McKellen ("Gods and Monsters"), and Anna Paquin ("The 
Piano"). I can't see anyone but Patrick Stewart playing the part of 
Professor Charles Xavier. Stewart has all the perfect attributes: the 
accent, the mannerisms, the soft-spoken nature, the kindly face, and (of 
course) the bald head. The only complaint I had with Xavier in the film is 
that he was sadly underused. While he shows up in the beginning to explain 
things to all the non-fans out there, he vanishes at about the midway point. 
Ian McKellen seemed like a poor choice for Magneto when I first heard about 
his casting. The comic version of Magneto is a big, hulking man in his early 
sixties who can control all metallic objects. Ian McKellen is obviously a 
little older than that and has a slender build. Fortunately McKellen is such 
a great actor that he easily makes up for his different physical attributes. 
Anna Paquin is another choice where fans thought Singer was out of his mind. 
The comic character of Rogue is a tall southern belle in her thirties. Anna 
Paquin is, well, Anna Paquin. Thankfully she delivers such a marvelous 
performance you'd swear she was born to play this role (I'm almost tempted 
to forgive her for "The Piano"). The Rogue character is one of the more 
complicated roles to play, being a girl who has no possible future with 
people since she can never be touched. Paquin plays the role beautifully, 
avoiding overacting when it would have been so easy to do.
So how does "X-men" fare in other areas besides acting and plot? Obviously 
one of the biggest draws is going to be the special effects, which are very 
well done. However, well done special effects are becoming more and more 
common place in Hollywood. The question then became whether Bryan Singer 
would use them wisely, and I'm pleased to say he did so. Singer keeps the 
effects so restrained that when he actually uses them they amaze the 
audience (as special effects are intended to do). The first time Storm 
really lets loose her powers in the movie I heard more gasps and cheers from 
people than I've heard about a movie in a long time (excluding "The 
Matrix"). The soundtrack to "X-men" is one of the low points, being seldom 
used and sadly inappropriate when present. Thankfully this is made up for by 
the great dialogue, which is a good thing because despite what the previews 
would have you believe, this is a dialogue driven movie. Wolverine gets some 
of the best lines, such as one in a scene where Xavier has just explained 
the mutant conflict and his school (and the whole plot actually), and 
Wolverine responds with: "That's the stupidest thing I've ever heard." 
There's also a nice little jab at all the "X-men" fans who had criticized 
the film's costumes (I'm guilty of being one of them I'm afraid, but I've 
changed my mind since then). Wolverine taps his costume with disgust and 
asks "You guys always wear these?" Cyclops responds with "Well what would 
you prefer, yellow Spandex?" The movie runs a nice brisk 90 minutes, but as 
much as I love short movies, this one could have used a bit more time. 
Sometimes Singer's direction feels far too rushed, particularly when he's 
introducing the characters. I'd recommend "X-men" to fans of the comic and 
of comics in general, since no one else is going to follow the story too 
well. I give it a well earned four out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Black and White (1999)
I'm going to keep this one fairly short, folks. In fact, I'm not even going
to attempt a plot summary because there isn't any plot in "Black and White".
James Toback, previously responsible for releasing the atrocious "Two Girls
and a Guy" on unsuspecting audiences back in 1997, has created a true piece
of garbage here. This is the kind of movie that screams for an NC-17 rating,
being filled with fairly explicit sex scenes, constant violence, and more
foul language than you hear in any Quentin Tarantino film. The MPAA rating
system is supposed to keep kids from seeing a movie like this, but the
theater I saw it in was filled with young high school students. I know it's
naive to think that kids won't see a movie like this no matter what kind of
rating it has, yet I can't help but think an NC-17 rating would have
prevented at least a few kids from attending.
First I'll try to cover what I liked about this movie, which shouldn't take
too long. There are one or two slightly comical moments, though I can't seem
to remember what they involved. That about sums up what I liked about this
movie. I don't often award one or five star ratings, but I was very tempted
to give only one to this piece of filth. I knew I was in trouble as soon as
the film started with a semi-pornographic scene involving two of the main
characters (Bijou Phillips, Power) and one minor character in a threesome in
the middle of the woods. I suppose the purpose of this scene was to convey
how messed up these kids are, but it struck me as being present only for
shock value. In fact, there are several sex scenes sprinkled throughout
"Black and White" which enhance the so-called story in no way.
I will hand one thing to Toback, he pulled in quite a cast. Ben Stiller,
Robert Downey Jr., Brooke Shields, Claudia Schiffer, and the great Joe
Pantoliano all make appearances in this god forsaken movie. Stiller
("There's Something About Mary") plays a gambler (a somewhat
autobiographical decision by Toback I think) who appears very few times and
never quite fits in with the rest of the movie. Robert Downey Jr. (the
horrendous "Two Girls and a Guy") plays a gay man, who I believe was
intended to be humorous but was simply vulgar instead. Brooke Shields ("The
Blue Lagoon") and Claudia Schiffer both show up in very minor roles, which
distract the audience rather than add anything to the movie. Last, but
certainly not least, is Joe Pantoliano ("The Matrix", "Bound"), who is
completely wasted as a father of two of the young, stupid characters.
Showing up in a hilariously pointless cameo is Mike Tyson himself.
Allow me to now point out the half dozen or so items which make this a
horrendous movie. One, half the dialogue is completely unintelligble. The
characters banter back and forth, swearing every other word and saying
things which no one over the age of fifteen could possibly understand. Two,
there is no plot to speak of. There are a few subplots involving things like
sports gambling and coping with ones identity, but none of these side
stories are ever developed. Three, I think this was supposed to be a
profound look at racism and life in an inner city, but it succeeds only at
insulting members of both races. Fourth, there is no direction whatsoever.
The movie jumps aimlessly from person to person and situation to situation
without any idea where it is going. Lastly, the film's ending left me with a
sick feeling in my stomach. I normally don't give away plot points, but the
movie's ending seems to imply that family can triumph over anything by doing
things like pulling together to lie and cover up murders. "Black and White"
runs the longest 98 minutes you'll ever experience. I recommend it to
absolutely no one and give it one and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)
Directed by: Andrezj Bartkowiak
Written by: Mitchell Kapner (story), Eric Bernt
How exactly does one review a Jet Li movie? I suppose it must be held to a
different template than the new film from Tom Hanks or Meryl Streep. Let's
face facts, if you're going to "Romeo Must Die" expecting to see Academy
Award material, then you obviously haven't seen the previews. You're going
to see this movie for bloody, bare fisted, no holds barred style brawling.
You are not going for a strong plot, great acting, or important social
messages. I went into "Romeo Must Die" expecting to see Jet Li at his
gravity defying best, and I'm happy to report that the fight sequences are
indeed something to behold. The problem is, these excellent fight scenes are
few and far between, and the remainder of the film is filled with useless
melodrama that no one could care less about.
A gang war has consumed the bay area of Oakland. The two factions are
Issak's (Delroy Lindo) African Americans, and C'hu Sing's (Henry O)
Orientals. Both leaders are attempting to sell their bay area property to a
greedy business man (Edoardo Ballerini) so that he can develop yet another
football franchise. The most recent casualty has been C'hu's son, Po (Jon
Kit Lee). This sets off a chain of retaliations from both sides which
threatens to destroy everyone. Po's death brings about the return of his
brother, Han (Jet Li), from Hong Kong. Han begins investigating the events
which caused his brother to be murdered. While investigating, he meets up
with Issak's daughter, Trish (Aaliyah), and the two soon form a close
friendship. Han must discover who the killers are before they decide to
eliminate both he and Trish as well.
If this plot summary sounds a bit confusing that's because this is a rather
confusing and convoluted movie. In case you're wondering, it also has very
little to do with the bard's tale, aside from the name Romeo being in the
title and the story revolving around two warring families. There is no
romance between Trish and Han, the families aren't exactly true families
(they're just warring gangs), and this story is missing the excellent,
comical character of Mercutio. In fact, the lack of humor is one of the
problems with this movie. It may have a comical moment or two, mainly
because of a supporting character named Maurice (Anthony Anderson) and one
or two amusing scenes involving Li, but the majority of the film is
incredibly and unnecessarily melodramatic.
As for the actors, it seems that rap singers have been cast in place of
actors in most cases. Rapper DMX has been cast as a club manager, and
Aaliyah is obviously the female lead. With these two being cast in
significant roles, you can guess what kind of soundtrack is going to
accompany this film. If you don't like rap music, be forewarned that it
doesn't stop playing throughout the entire movie. The other actors are
mediocre at best; the only two exceptions being Li himself, who exudes
charm, charisma, and strength, and Delroy Lindo ("Broken Arrow"), who is
simply a good actor doing what he can with a miserable part. Worth noting is
Isaiah Washington ("True Crime"), playing Lindo's right hand man. Washington
is an early candidate for a Razzie award this year, turning in an absolutely
horrendous performance.
Andrezj Bartkowiak does have one neat little trick up his sleeve. Throughout
the fight scenes, we are given occasional x-ray insights of what happens to
a person when Li hits them. It's nothing more than a gimmick, but still a
rather original one. After watching "Romeo Must Die", I can only hope that
Li will be given a better script next time. The man is incredibly talented,
and it's no wonder that he is one of the largest film stars in China. I do
hope that his next film contains a few more fights and a lot less melodrama.
One last thing I must note; several fights in "Romeo Must Die" are blatantly
enhanced by CGI. This was completely uncalled for, as it ruins the effect of
watching Li do his thing. The movie runs far too long at 118 minutes. I'd
recommend it to serious martial arts fans and give it three out of five
stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Evil Dead II (1987)
Ash (Bruce Campbell) and his girlfriend, Linda (Denise Bixler), travel out 
to a remote cabin in the woods where an archeologist (John Peaks) and his 
wife (Lou Hancock) had been staying. While Ash and Linda settle in, Ash 
discovers a tape recorder on which the professor had been translating his 
latest find, the Necronomicon. When the recorder is played, the professor's 
words wake an evil force in the woods which kills Linda and tries to kill 
Ash. Ash barricades himself in the cabin, blasting anything that comes close 
to the front door with a shotgun. Little does he know that the professor's 
daughter, Annie (Sarah Berry); his colleague, Ed (Richard Domeier); and two 
hill-billies (Dan Hicks, Kassie DePaiva) are on their way. The group first 
thinks Ash killed Annie's parents, but they soon discover the evil force is 
after them as well. Now Ash and the quickly dwindling group have to gear up 
and face the evil forces. Their weapons? A shotgun, a chain-saw, a strange 
bone knife, the Necronomicon, and Ash's wits. They're in deep trouble.
Five years after the release of the first "Evil Dead" movie, Sam Raimi 
brought audiences "Evil Dead II", and motion picture history was made (in my 
opinion anyway). The eternal question facing those who watch this 
magnificent movie is this: what exactly is it? Is it a horror movie? Well, 
it certainly contains horror movie elements. Afterall, blood, gore, ghouls 
and headless girlfriends with chainsaws abound. Yet it can't quite qualify 
as an out and out horror movie because there is also brilliant comedy at 
work here. While the first film had comic elements, it was still a horror 
movie. "Evil Dead II" contains a few comic sequences that have become 
certifiable classics. What really makes "Evil Dead II" strange is that it's 
not exactly a sequel. What do I mean by that? Well, the events of the first 
movie are crammed into the first five minutes of this one, but they're 
changed. In the first movie Ash went to the cabin with his girlfriend, his 
sister, and two friends. In the beginning of this movie he goes with only 
his girlfriend (who promptly dies, leading to one of the funniest scenes in 
the movie). I assume the reason for this is because so few people saw the 
first film, Raimi believed a refresher of sorts would be needed. However, 
rumors that "Evil Dead II" was actually meant to be a parody of the first 
movie have spread.
Five years, three movies, and multiple stage appearances after the first 
"Evil Dead", Bruce Campbell has honed his comic talents to perfection. His 
lines are delivered with sheer comic genius, and his facial expressions are 
second to none. Watch the look on his face when a wave of blood pours out of 
a wall, slams into him, then retreats back into the wall. In the first film, 
Campbell was forced to carry the entire acting load on his shoulders because 
his supporting cast was, well, dreadful. In this installment, the cast 
obviously isn't quite on par with Bruce, but they're all at least tolerable 
(that's probably why some of these people actually went on to careers, uh, 
of sorts). Sarah Berry never went on to anything else, and it's not 
surprising since of the supporting cast members she is far and away the 
worst. She constantly has a look on her face like she's watching the other 
actors closely, waiting for the exact moment when she gets to deliver her 
next line. I hate that. She does have one brief, shining moment though, when 
she goes after Bruce with an axe. Dan Hicks ("Wishmaster") gives quite an 
amusing performance as the hill-billy of the group. My favorite part with 
him is when he screams for Bobbie Joe, who has vanished into the woods. The 
look on his face and his tone of voice are wonderfully pathetic. Ted Raimi 
("Xena: Warrior Princess") shows up, completely unrecognizable as a 
possessed grandmother.
Remember when I said there were a few classic comic scenes in the movie? I'm 
afraid I was understating it a bit. This movie is actually packed with comic 
moments. We get a room full of furniture laughing hysterically (and Ash 
laughing right along with it); a headless girlfriend with a chain-saw 
chasing Ash around; Ash battling his own hand in a three stooges style fight 
(this scene has been mimicked dozens of times); Ash placing a pail on top of 
his severed hand and holding it down with the book, "A Farewell to Arms"; 
Ash getting knocked flying through the forest, spinning head over heels and 
crashing through tree limbs; and dozens more. There's a big laugh every five 
minutes here, plus we also get an obscene amount of gore (that's a good 
thing for me anyway) and a few really good startle effects. Will "Evil Dead 
II" scare you? Maybe if you're eight or nine years old and you still believe 
in monsters under your bed. Otherwise, it's doubtful. "Evil Dead II" isn't a 
scary movie, but it's not meant to be. It's supposed to be campy, fun, and 
highly entertaining; and it delivers on all three counts in spades.
Raimi's direction becomes a bit more restrained in this film, but that's not 
a bad thing, it just shows that his directorial abilities have matured. 
Don't worry, we still get the neat low camera angles, and we still have the 
monster in the woods that tears through them at break neck speed (he's 
involved in another one of the brilliant comic moments, when he chases Ash 
through the house). Yet the camera is a bit more controlled, the action not 
so frantic. Raimi's pacing has also improved, keeping the laughs and action 
consistent throughout most of the movie. In the first movie, Raimi spent 
just a little too long on the build up, and then everything hit us all at 
once. Obviously the fact that the script throws us right into the middle of 
Ash's situation contributes to the lack of down-time in this movie. Joseph 
LoDuca's ("Xena: Warrior Princess") music isn't used too often, but it's 
always appropriately campy when present. "Evil Dead II" runs a frighteningly 
quick 85 minutes. I'd recommend it to fans of the original, fans of cheesy 
"B" horror movies, and fans of Bruce Campbell. For being one of the most 
entertaining horror movies ever made, I give "Evil Dead II" a full five out 
five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Miller's Crossing (1990)
"I can't die! Not here, among the trees, like an animal!" These words are
screamed by Bernie, played perfectly by John Turturro (Rounders, The Big
Lebowski). One can't help but admire lines like this, which are sprinkled
throughout "Miller's Crossing". In this particular scene, Bernie grovels on his
knees before the man who has been told to kill him. While he begs for his life,
screaming for his killer to look into his heart, beautiful irish music plays in
the background, and the camera moves slowly over the gorgeous forest where the
execution is to take place. "Miller's Crossing" is a movie filled with
wonderful dialogue, scenery, music and performances. Yet, there's something
detatched about all this. It feels like we're watching it from afar, and as a
result, we're never becoming involved with the characters. Oh well, I'm
basically nitpicking I suppose.
Tom Reagan (Gabriel Byrne) is a black hearted, Irish mobster in the 1920s. Tom
works for Leo O'Bannion (Albert Finney), the big crime boss of the town. The
problem is, Leo's slowly losing everything due to his sweetheart, Verna (Marcia
Gay Harden). You see, Verna's brother is Bernie, and Bernie has been troubling
another local crime boss, Johnny Casper (Jon Polito). So Johnny wants Leo to
kill Bernie, but if he does, Leo thinks that  Verna won't marry him. Another
problem, is that Tom is seeing Verna behind Leo's back. Give me one moment now
to catch my breath. If this sounds a little convoluted, that's because it is.
We're not even given an introduction here. The film simply starts right in the
middle of all this.
It took me awhile to realize what was troubling me throughout this beautiful
movie. I think the problem is, as we listen to this gorgeous, poetic banter
between the characters, it dawns on us that no one speaks like this. As a
result of this, we never believe any of these characters could possibly be
real. Okay, my nitpicking is done. Allow me to now express how brilliant the
rest of this film is. The casting all around is perfect, but the real standout
performances come from Gabriel Byrne ("The Usual Suspects", "End of Days"), and
J. E. Freeman ("Go", "Alien: Resurrection") as Casper's number one flunky, The
Dane. Freeman simply oozes with menace as he hovers around Casper, glaring at
his adversaries with hate filled eyes.
The set design is magnificent; from Leo's antique furniture in his mammoth
office, to the interiors of the clubs run by the two gangs. Everything has an
otherworldly feel about it; like a dim, shadowy reflection of a real
prohibition era town. For example, Miller's Crossing itself is a heavily
forested area in which gangsters take people to be executed. The grove features
a deep blanket of dead leaves, a constantly overcast sky, and tall, thin, dead
trees leering over the condemned man. It's an eerie, unnatural place, worthy of
a Tim Burton movie. To further enhance the beautiful scenery at work here,
we're given a strangely moving irish score. The soft, melodious sounds play, as
men are shot full of holes, or as they stumble, sobbingly through Miller's
Crossing, approaching the scene of their demise.
Watching "Miller's Crossing" is like watching poetry in motion. It may not
always be involving, but we sit in awe struck silence at the amount of effort
put into this film. The film runs a fast 115 minutes, and not a single scene is
wasted. Exquisite scenery, brilliant performances and a standout soundtrack
would already have made this film worthwhile; the fact that the script is
involving only enhances the experience. I recommend the film to anyone who
enjoys gangster movies, and heck, to everyone else for that matter. See this
one right now. I give it a well earned four and a half out of five stars.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
How would William Shatner and company react if forced into a real "Star Trek"
situation? This is the basic premise behind "Galaxy Quest", the new comic film
from Dreamworks. Such a premise could easily be turned into a single joke film
but "Galaxy Quest" manages to keep the laughs coming. With a great supporting
cast and a hilarious performance from Tim Allen, the film only drops the ball
once or twice when it tries to be a little too serious.
Jason Nesmith (Tim Allen) is an aging object of affection for thousands of
"trekkies"; only here, they're most likely known as Questers. Galaxy Quest may
have ended 20 years prior, but this hasn't stopped the original cast from
spending all their time appearing at conventions and supporting local business
openings. However, while Jason may be enjoying his lifestyle his fellow cast
members are more than a little tired of it. Alex (a hysterical Alan Rickman)
wants to be a dramatic actor again, and Gwen (Sigourney Weaver) is tired of all
her interviews consisting of questions about her breasts. So when an alien
race, led by the benevolent but incredibly naive Malthesar (Enrico Colantoni),
asks the cast for help (believing them to be real astronauts), they can hardly
refuse the chance for something different.
One thing a comedy like this needs is an actor who can act in a completely
serious fashion even when ridiculous events are unfolding around them. Rickman
and Weaver are both present for this precise reason. The two of them are
wonderful at looking dour and disapproving while their cohorts go through comic
antics. The more comical roles belong to Allen and the perfectly cast Tony
Shalhoub (Men in Black, The Siege) as the supposed chief engineer. Shalhoub's
character, Fred Kwan, is hilarious because he seems to have no problem
whatsoever with the situation he is in. While the other cast members appear
shocked by all they see, Kwan just gives a grin and says something like "That
was a hell of a ride".
A lesser film might have mocked trekkies and the show itself, and this isn't a
hard thing to forgive as both are so easy to mock. However, "Galaxy Quest" is
so completely good natured about the entire thing that one gets the impression
that they're laughing along with trekkies rather than at them. This is possibly
due to the fact that the cast is obviously having such a good time making this
film. One can almost imagine them doubled over with laughter between scenes
where they speak with the aliens who have grins constantly plastered on their
faces.
There are certainly a few flaws here, but they don't detract too much from the
experience. For one, Sam Rockwell's (Green Mile) character is rather
irritating. Known as Guy, or crewman number six, he spends the entire film
whining about how he's going to be killed because he was an extra on the show.
Things also get a bit too sentimental at parts in a film which should have
maintained its goofiness the whole way through. "Galaxy Quest" is basically
harmless fluff at it's worst, hilarious at it's best. It's a lot of fun, but it
won't stay with you for too long once it's over. The films runs 102 minutes,
which is just about perfect. I'd recommend catching a matinee if you can, but
do try and see this in theatres as some of the effects are really quite good. I
give "Galaxy Quest" a well earned four stars.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Bring It On (2000)
Torrance Shipman (Kirsten Dunst) is a high school senior, facing a few 
problems. First, she has just become the new captain of her cheerleading 
squad. That's a problem because most of the team doesn't want her there, and 
she has quite a legacy to live up to since the former captain led the team 
to five straight championship victories. She's also having problem with her 
boyfriend, who just went off to college. While he's away, she starts eyeing 
a new student, Cliff (Jesse Bradford), whose sister, Missy (Eliza Dushku), 
is the latest addition to the cheerleading squad. Her last problem is her 
most severe. Torrance just found out that all the team's cheers have been 
stolen from a neighboring, urban school's team. That school, called the 
Clovers, is finally sending its team to the championship, and Torrance needs 
a new cheer so she won't be stealing. With only a few weeks till the 
championship, Torrance has to find a solution to all three of her problems, 
or quite cheerleading for good.
Did that sound just a little cheesy to everyone? I thought so too. I usually 
don't do this, but I thought I'd better warn everyone that this review 
contains at least one statement that might be viewed as a spoiler. "Bring it 
On" bills itself as a comedy; but since there's only one funny scene in the 
film, it's more akin to a... well, it has elements of an... umm. Oh forget 
it, I'm not sure just what "Bring it On" was supposed to be, and I'm not 
entirely sure Peyton Reed knew what he was trying to make either. I suppose 
this is just another movie which can be added to the ever growing list of 
teen films (a genre I detest more and more with each passing week). In other 
words, "Bring it On" is a cliched, predictable movie which appeals only to 
those who understand high school lingo (I didn't even understand high school 
lingo when I was in high school). If you enjoy these sorts of teen movies, 
you should have a blast. The rest of you will either be bored stiff or 
violently ill (I hadn't eaten, so I was only bored stiff). Actually, the 
only reason I was talked into seeing this movie was because I was curious 
how Bendinger would write an ending that would avoid being both cliched and 
politically incorrect. I guess I shouldn't have been surprised at the 
cliched, politically correct finale. I'll give you two guesses who wins, but 
you're only going to need one.
I seem to be one of those strange people who can't understand this Kirsten 
Dunst craze. I'm sorry, but in my opinion, the girls simply cannot act. She 
either overdoes it, like she does in this and in the overrated "Dick"; or 
she under plays it like she did in "The Virgin Suicides". Her supporting 
cast doesn't offer much in the way of help, with nearly everyone turning in 
performances that never rise above mediocre. The only exception is Eliza 
Dushku (television's "Buffy the Vampire Slayer"), playing the team's newest 
member. While I never thought of Dushku as much of a talent when she first 
showed up on "Buff", I'm forced to admit that her acting abilities have 
improved considerably, and she turns in such a good performance in "Bring it 
On" that she nearly makes the film watchable. However, close only counts in 
horseshoes and handgrenades. One good performance can seldom hold a movie 
afloat when surrounded by bad performances. When it's surrounded by such 
performances and used in a poor script, it's lost amidst the rabble.
I suppose I could be mistaken about how funny "Bring it On" actually is. 
There were two teenage boys a few rows behind me who were laughing so hard I 
thought I was going to have to call an ambulance. The thing that confused me 
is what they were laughing at. Tell me, do you find the word "fag" funny? 
I'm sure a few of you said yes. Okay, do you find the word "fag" funny after 
it has been used about two dozen times? If so, "Bring it On" is just the 
movie for you. The film's jokes never rise above that level of humor, except 
in the one, truly funny scene of the film. When Torrance's team calls in a 
special cheerleader trainer named Sparky (newcomer Ian Roberts), it leads to 
a hysterical five minute scene. Sparky decides to bring his own brand of 
cheerleading to the group, and puts the team on a special training program. 
This includes putting all the girls on diets because, as he says, "You girls 
are being thrown in the air, and you can't throw fat people as high." He 
also proceeds to go through each girl in the class and tell them all their 
faults (in great detail, when discussing the size of one girl's rear end). 
The scene only lasts five minutes, but you'll get more laughs in those few 
minutes than you will at the rest of the movie (in fact, I didn't get a 
single laugh from the rest of the movie).
One of the biggest problems I had with "Bring it On" was that the entire 
plot about the two teams competing against each other was pointless. That's 
the entire plot though, right? Hardly, since the Clovers team is only in 
about fifteen minutes of the movie. If the film had been about the new 
captain having to whip an out of practice team into shape, maybe there would 
have been something to it. Instead, by featuring a race related contest, 
Benedinger insures that someone is going to be offended, and to be perfectly 
frank, I was. When lines like "You think a white girl could have thought up 
moves like those?" are prominantly featured in a movie, and are then 
tolerated by audiences, I have to wonder at the state of Hollywood. Okay, my 
rant is over with. The soundtrack to "Bring it On" features, get this, 
cheerleading songs. In other words, you've heard it all before, but it's 
still appropriate to the movie. The movie runs only 98 minutes, but feels 
more than a bit longer. I'd recommend "Bring it On" to those of you who 
simply adore both teen flicks and cheerleader outfits (but not if you only 
like cheerleader outfits), and give the movie two and a half out of five 
stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Eye of the Beholder (1999)
Directed by: Stephan Elliott
Written by: Marc Behm (novel), Stephan Elliott
"Beauty is in the eye of the beholder." It may be a hackneyed old saying, but
it's used several times in "Eye of the Beholder", the new movie from
writer/director Stephan Elliott (The Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the
Desert). It also seems to describe this film fairly well. While the vast
majority of critics couldn't stand the film, calling it muddled, incoherent,
and inprobable, I found it quite interesting. The problem is, that while it is
beautifully filmed and involving, it is significantly marred by a horrible
ending and a lack of any likeable characters.
The film opens by introducing us to a nameless investigator (Ewan McGregor),
who works for a branch of the british government which seems similar to the
CIA. The investigator is known only as The Eye in the credits. His latest
assignment is to find out why the bosses son is ripping off the trust fund. He
finds the son with a lady (Ashley Judd) whom he has apparently been giving the
funds. For reasons unknown to us, she hacks him up with a butcher's knife and
then flees to the United States. The Eye follows her, first as part of his job,
and then slowly out of obsession over this woman.
I could write a whole lot more, but I don't want to give away too much of the
twisty plot. Alright, when I hear someone call a movie unrealistic or
improbable, I must admit to being a bit shocked. I could have sworn that one of
the main reasons people went to the movies was to escape reality and dull,
everday experiences. Okay, I'm done with my rant. "Eye of the Beholder" starts
off with a very amusing little intro, in which we're shown several useful
little gadgets which would make James Bond envious. Part of the fun with this
film is that all the high tech devices The Eye uses are realistic. They're not
overly sci-fi like, and they're not present to be used in only one situation,
like those in the Bond films.
I've always felt that one of the most important things in a movie is the
soundtrack. While a great soundtrack can't always save a movie, it can
certainly help one to forgive some of the film's shortcomings. On the other
hand, an awful soundtrack can completely derail a good film. "Eye of the
Beholder" has a wonderful soundtrack. It is rousing and fierce when needed,
subdued and moving when required. For example, there is a scene in which Ashley
Judd races over an Alaskan highway, images blurring through her mind. The score
which plays during this perfectly highlights the frenzy and frustration she is
feeling at that moment. Another point worth mentioning, is the interesting
transitions that Elliott uses throughout the film. They involve a snowglobe of
whatever town is being travelled to, slowly changing into the actual location.
You'll have to see the film to understand why snowglobes hold significance.
As I said, there are two major flaws at work in this film. One, is that nearly
every character we run into is completely despicable. Even Jason Priestley
shows up briefly as a druggie/rapist. Ashley Judd's character is a murderer, so
no redeeming qualities there. All the men she kills deserve it, and Genevieve
Bujold ("The House of Yes") shows up as a contemptable therapist. The Eye
himself is rather a sympathetic character at first, but then he does something
so horribly, horribly wrong that we can't feel any sympathy for him whatsoever.
The second flaw is the film's so called ending. It simply leaves the audience
completely befuddled. The film literally stops in mid-scene without resolving
anything. "Eye of the Beholder" runs a long 109 minutes, and I would recommend
catching a matinee if you can. I give it three and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For old reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Dr. Strangelove or: How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb (1964)
CAST
Peter Sellers - President Muffley/Captain Lionel Mandrake/Dr. Strangelove
George C. Scott - General `Buck' Turgidson
Sterling Hayden - General Jack D. Ripper
Keenan Wynn - Colonel `Bat' Guano
Slim Pickens - Major T. J. `King' Kong
In honor of the late, great George C. Scott, I've decided to review a film
which is, quite frankly, one of the funniest ever made. The cliched old phrase
`They don't make um like they used to' has never been more appropriate than it
is here.
President Muffley has a problem. One of his generals, Jack D. Ripper, has gone
insane and ordered bombers to nuke the Soviet Union. The biggest problem with
this, is that the Soviets have constructed a weapon which shall destroy the
world if they should be attacked. So, the president and his military staff sit
in the war
room and try to think of a way to alert the bombers to cease their attack.
Meanwhile, General Ripper defends his base from U.S. troops while explaining
his actions to his second in command, Captain Mandrake. Problems continue to
escalate and finally the fate of the world is in the hands of Major Kong, one
of the bomber captains.
Kubrick may have been a rather erratic director, creating a string of hits
(2001: A Space Odyssey), and misses (Lolita) seemingly at random. However, he
was right on the mark with this creation,which is such a magnificent blend of
slapstick comedy, witty dialogue, and an amazingly humour look at paranoia. 
Peter Sellers is brilliant, as always, playing three very different characters.
President Muffley look constantly hassled by the problems and people he has to
face (his phone conversation with the Soviet premier is one of the funniest
moments in movie history). Captain Mandrake is perhaps the only truly normal
character in the entire film, but this simply makes him that much funnier. Dr.
Strangelove, the crippled genius, is an absolute riot as he seems unable to
control his movements at times.
George C. Scott plays General Turgidson in a way similar to his later portrayal
of General Patton, but in a much more maniacal way. The scenes with him are
always hilarious due to his overzealous behavior and strangely psychotic facial
expressions (such as the scene where he's explaining why the Russian ambassador
shouldn't be alowed in the war room). 
The biggest problem I think this movie has nowadays is that the humor seems to
be over the heads of a lot of people (not hard to believe considering how much
today's audiences loved the ghastly Austin Powers). In fact, the only flaw I
can think of is that the film does end quite suddenly (though in a very funny
way),
though I suppose one simply doesn't want it to end at all. I give Dr.
Strangelove a full five stars and recommend everyone go see it right now.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Army of Darkness (1993)
Our one-handed, chainsaw wielding, fairly brainless hero, Ash (Bruce 
Campbell) is back. After being sucked into a vortex at the end of "Evil Dead 
II", Ash finds himself back in the middle ages, in the kingdom of King 
Arthur (Marcus Gilbert). Ash is taken captive by Arthur's men, along with 
Duke Henry the Red (Richard Grove), Arthur's mortal enemy. It seems Arthur 
and Henry are being attacked by the deadites (the demons Ash has already 
battled in the future), but they're still finding time to fight each other. 
Ash is taken back to Arthur's castle as a prisoner, despite the 
protestations of Arthur's advisor (Ian Abercrombie), who believes Ash to be 
the chosen one who will defeat the deadites. Ash soon escapes, entrances a 
young girl named Sheila (Embeth Davidtz), and promises to retrieve the 
Necronomicon for the wise man so the deadites can be stopped. Of course, Ash 
botches this retrieval pretty badly, and unleashes a massive army of the 
dead who will soon attack Arthur's castle. Now Ash, Arthur, and a handful of 
men must stop hundreds of walking skeletons from taking the Necronomicon and 
with it, the world. Maybe, just maybe Ash and his men can win.... yeah, and 
maybe I'm a Chinese jet pilot.
A lot of people call "Army of Darkness" the weakest entry into the "Evil 
Dead" trilogy. As a horror movie, yes, this is certainly the weakest film. 
While "Evil Dead" was a horror movie with occasional comic elements, and 
"Evil Dead II" was an almost 50/50 blend of horror and comedy, "Army of 
Darkness" is a comedy with an occasional horrific moment. For that reason, 
your average horror fanatic isn't going to have a great time. The rest of 
us, who enjoy comedies, will be rolling on the floor, laughing like idiots 
till we're blue in the face. Oh what a deliriously funny movie this is, 
filled with countless belly laughs and more chuckles than viewers have a 
right to experience. It's a movie packed with one-liners (nearly all of 
which were stolen by the video game, "Duke Nukem") that you'll be quoting 
for weeks (or in my case years), until your friends are ready to kill you 
for calling everything groovy whether it's groovy or not. What makes the 
movie so funny, so quotable, and just so memorable? Simple...
... it's Bruce Campbell. Campbell plays Ash a little differently this time 
around, but who can blame him? Battling a horde of demons is bound to change 
any man, and it has turned Ash into a man who thinks he's a lot smarter than 
he actually is. This makes for some great comic moments, such as when he 
must speak the sacred words (a little tribute to "The Day the Earth Stood 
Still") before removing the Necronomicon from the graveyard. Campbell's 
facial expressions during this and dozens of other comical scenes are second 
to none. The man is a master of contorting his face into expressions of 
sheer terror, complete bafflement, and lurking stupidity. One day Campbell's 
going to get his due, I just know it. Supporting characters meant little in 
the first two "Evil Dead" films, and they mean even less in "Army of 
Darkness". This is Campbell's movie, and no one tries to upstage him. Still, 
the supporting cast members do just fine in roles that require them to do 
little more than scream a lot. The only exception is Marcus Gilbert, who is 
really quite entertaining as the hard-as-nails King Arthur (No, I don't 
THINK it's that Arthur). Watch for Sam Raimi's younger brother, Ted, in 
three different cameos (a whining soldier, a cheering villager, and an 
S-Mart employee). Bridget Fonda ("A Simple Plan") appears briefly as Ash's 
girlfriend in a flashback (she's the third actress to play the same 
girlfriend).
While Bruce Campbell carries the film, he's assisted greatly by the always 
unique direction of Sam Raimi. Raimi toned his chaotic direction down a bit 
in "Evil Dead II", but he cranks it into overdrive here in part three. All 
the fat has been trimmed off this movie, which means no character 
development, no exposition of plot, no long scenes of dialogue, nothing by 
constant action and laughs. Obviously the film didn't fare too well with 
critics for those reasons, but it's sure to delight anyone ages 14 to 28 or 
so. It's frantic and wild, and it has more fun moments than you can shake a 
chainsaw at. My two personal favorite comic moments are Ash's scene in the 
graveyard, where he battles a horde of skeleton hands poking out of the 
ground (massive "Three Stooges" homage here), and Ash fighting a legion of 
tiny Ashes in a windmill. The latter scene leads into another great scene 
where Ash dances about singing "Mr. Goody Two-shoes" (don't worry, it'll 
make sense when you get there). But what about action, what about horror?! 
You're no doubt shouting that at your screen right now, and let me tell you, 
there is some great medieval action in "Army of Darkness". The final battle, 
involving an army of skeletons storming the castle, is packed with some of 
the best fantasy action you're likely to find in a movie. Sword fights and 
catapults and flaming arrows and - oh, sorry, I got a little worked up 
there.
But horror, where's the horror?! Well my friends, there's not much to be 
found. I suppose the scene with Ash fighting gouls in the pit could qualify 
as horror, but other than that you're not likely to find much here. Sorry. A 
lingering curiosity about "Army of Darkness" has always been the special 
effects. They're a curiosity because while they are, at times, really quite 
wonderful (particularly during the final battle, where we get hundreds of 
highly detailed skeletons marching in formation), they're also dreadful on 
occasion. I refer specifically to the matte jobs in a few scenes, like those 
with the tiny Ashes. They're so bad, and so dated, I can't help but think 
they're intentional for reasons buried deep within the mind of Sam Raimi (a 
terrifying place, I'm sure). One last thing worth noting is the film's 
score, and particularly one piece called "March of the Dead". It's composed 
by long-time Tim Burton collaborator, Danny Elfman, and a more perfect score 
could not possibly have been inserted in this film. "Army of Darkness" runs 
a lean, mean, 85 minutes. It stops just before it starts to wear out its 
welcome. I'd recommend it to fans of Bruce Campbell, fans of Raimi's unique 
directorial style, and fans of slap-stick comedy. I give it a well earned 
four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
Directed by: Peter Lord, Nick Park
Written by: Peter Lord, Nick Park, Karey Kirkpatrick
The chickens of Tweedy's farm are plotting an escape. They're tired of lives 
filled with nothing but laying as many eggs as possible or being sent to the 
chopping block. One courageous chicken, Ginger (Julia Sawalha), leads the 
group against the evil Mrs. Tweedy (The excellent Miranda Richardson) and 
the clueless Mr. Tweedy (Tony Haygarth). What Ginger lacks in brilliant 
escape plans she makes up for in sheer determination. Unfortunately, Mrs. 
Tweedy has grown tired of the low income from selling eggs and has bought a 
massive pie making machine ("look at the size of that thing!" one character 
says in a nice little "Star Wars" homage). As Mrs. Tweedy says, "Chickens go 
in, pies come out." The chickens grow more and more desperate to escape, but 
all their plans seem to lead to Ginger being tossed in "the hole". Things 
are looking bleak until Rocky, the flying rooster (Mel Gibson), shows up. 
Ginger offers him sanctuary in return for him teaching all the chickens how 
to fly, so they can escape over the fence to freedom. Of course the one 
major problem with this plan is that chickens (and roosters) can't fly. This 
doesn't stop the group from trying, and what follows is a great claymation 
chicken version of "The Great Escape" (how's that for different?).
Okay, I know what everyone's thinking - how good can a goofy looking movie 
about claymation chickens possibly be? That's exactly what I was thinking 
walking into the theater. To say I was shocked by how much I enjoyed 
"Chicken Run" would be an understatement. I was completely bowled over by 
how much I loved this movie - with everything from the eccentric characters 
to the great soundtrack and voice-overs. The one and only complaint I had, 
and the only thing that kept the film from a full five star rating, was that 
Lord and Park (of "Wallace and Gromit" fame) allow the film to get a bit too 
cutesy at times. However, this is a minor complaint about an otherwise great 
movie. "Chicken Run" is the kind of movie Disney used to be able to make: a 
film with a perfect blend of childish humor and subtle jokes for the adults. 
These days Disney grants us movies like "Dinosaur" which look amazing but 
are aimed entirely at little ones. "Chicken Run" may not look amazing, since 
we've all seen claymation a thousand times over, but it's far more endearing 
than "Dinosaur" could ever have hoped to be.
The movie's strongest point is the host of delightfully bizarre characters 
(this was the strong point in "The Big Lebowski" too, and look what a great 
movie that was). Rocky could have been your typical heroic seeming phony, 
but those characters are usually all show on the outside and nothing on the 
inside. Rocky, on the other hand, is very little on the outside (he still 
acts like a chicken) and a lot on the inside. Gibson's voice-over is 
pleasant, but he doesn't add as much to his character as the English actors 
do to theirs. Julia Sawalha turns Ginger into a hilariously manic character, 
who always has a smile plastered to her face (actually, most of the chickens 
are always smiling) and spouts lines like, "We'll die free chickens, or 
we'll die trying!" The real standout performances (so to speak) come from 
two of the supporting cast members: Miranda Richardson ("Sleepy Hollow") as 
the evil Mrs. Tweedy, and Jane Horrocks ("Memphis Belle") as the hysterical 
chicken, Babs. Miranda Richardson, who I've always found to be a wonderful 
actress since I first saw her as Queen Elizabeth in the "Blackadder" British 
comedy series, isn't used as much as I would have liked in "Chicken Run", 
but she's delightful when present. Jane Horrocks' character, the overweight, 
flighty (pardon the pun), slightly neurotic Babs is uproariously funny. She 
has a grin constantly plastered to her face and a sewing kit stuck in her 
hands. She also gets some of the film's best lines like: "Me life flashed 
before me eyes... that was really boring."
I think one of the things I found so endearing about "Chicken Run" was that 
the characters may have acted like typical heroes at times, but they were 
still chickens at heart. Rocky may be all bravado in front of the chickens, 
but whenever a human comes close to him he starts screaming for Ginger to 
hide him. Another great scene like this is where one of the lead chickens 
tries to give her flock courage by saying, "The important thing is not to 
panic." The chickens immediately react by screeching and running around in 
circles. The film's other high points include a great, if slightly underused 
soundtrack; some delightfully over-the-top action sequences (watch for 
Ginger and Rocky's run in with the pie making machine); and more movie 
references than I could count ("Star Wars", "Raiders of the Lost Ark", "The 
Great Escape" just to name a few). To top all this off, the movie runs only 
84 minutes in a time when movies running less than 120 are becoming scarce. 
I'd recommend "Chicken Run" to anyone who likes slightly childish comedies 
and give it a well earned four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
I will assume that the majority of the movie going public have either already
seen this film, or aren't going to see it at all. Therefore, I'm going to keep
the rather confusing plot summary quite brief. 
Trade routes have been further taxed by the Galactic Senate. The Trade
Federation, in an attempt to remove the taxes, has boycotted the small planet
of Naboo, ruled by the benevolent (and elected) Queen Amidala. The Senate hopes
to resolve this by sending two Jedi, Qui-Gon Jinn and Obi-Wan Kenobi to force a
settlement out of the Federation. That about sets up the film, and I don't wish
to give much more away. Let's just say they go to several different planets and
pick up young Anakin Skywalker, who will one day be Darth Vader along the way.
Suffice to say that I loved this movie. I've always been something of a Star
Wars fanatic, so I went in fairly certain that I would enjoy the film. This is
not to say the film is flawless, but then, few films are. However, in my
personal opinion, the movie's strong points outweigh its flaws considerably.
First, I'll go through the things I thought were truly great in the movie. 
1) I must say would have to be the acting. Particularly that of Liam Neeson, as
the righteous, kindly Jedi Master; Ian McDiarmid, as the slimy Naboo senator
and Natalie Portman as the strong willed Queen.The other actors, I should
mention, are quite good. 
2) The Pod race, at about the midway point is really quite spectacular. A
wonderful sci-fi version of the Ben Hur chariot race.
3) The final half hour is remarkable. Four seperate conflicts taking place at
once. The most amazing of which, would have to be the lightsabre duel, which
puts those in the other three movies to shame.
4) The effects. I know this is obvious, and that everyone has said it, but I
felt obliged to repeat this.
5) John Williams's new score "Duel of Fates", which was played during the sabre
duel is truly phenomenal.
Now come the points whish I did not personally find so wonderful.
1) Jar Jar Binks. I know this poor fellow has been much maligned, and I did in
fact find many of his antics quite amusing. However, there also lies the
problem. A Star Wars character is not supposed to have antics. He simply
doesn't fit into the Star Wars universe.
2) I rather wish Lucas had stuck to his original idea of Aliens either speaking
in a subtitled dialect, or in one that we simply weren't meant to understand.
Having them speak in a strangely accented form of English did not seem quite
right.
3) More screen time for Darth Maul would have been quite nice. He was a
wonderful character in the grand tradition of Boba Fett from "The Empire
Strikes Back", and I wish we'd been able to see more of him.
4) Lastly, I do wish Lucas had not given the force a scientific explanation.
So, is The Phantom Menace the best Star Wars movie ever made? no, that title
still belongs to "The Empire Strikes Back". Is it a great film? Without a
doubt. See it in theatres, don't wait for it to come to video because it will
lose much being on the small screen.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
CAST
Mike Myers - Austin Powers / Dr. Evil / Fat Bastard
Heather Graham - Felicity Shagwell
Seth Green - Scott Evil
Robert Wagner - Number Two
Rob Lowe - Young Number Two
Verne Troyer - Mini Me
Michael York - Basil Exposition
Mike Myers is at it again, creating a sequal to the horrible "Austin Powers:
International Man of Mystery". This is another one of those rare cases where
the sequal actually surpasses the original (See: "I Still Know what you did
Last Summer"). Unfortunatly, it's not a whole lot better. It simply has a few
more humorous moments than the last one did (which I'm afraid isn't saying
much).
The year is 1999, and Austin is with his new wife Vanessa. Vanessa turns out to
be a robot working for Dr. Evil however, and tries to kill Austin.  Austin
escapes, and so has Dr. Evil we find out. Evil gets his organization up and
running courtesy of stock he owns in Starbuck's. He then decides to get rid of
Austin by stealing his Mojo (it's never clearly explained what this is). With
Austin out of the way, he will be able to destroy cities with his orbiting
laser platform. Austin, sans mojo, teams up with a C.I.A. agent named Felicity
Shagwell and goes after Evil.
The majority of the film takes place back in the sixties. For some strange
reason, Dr. Evil finds it neccessary to switch back in forth through time. Evil
has also created a clone of himself, one eighth his size which he names "Mini
Me". Mini Me actually provides a considerable amount of the film's humor.
The movie certainly isn't without its funny moments. In fact, almost any scene
which contains Dr. Evil, Mini Me, or Scott Evil (Seth Green) is quite amusing.
One of the funniest, in fact, would have to be when the doctor and Scott get in
a father / son spat on Jerry Springer at the beginning of the film.  Mini Me is
hilarious just about whenever he's on screen. The real problem is when Austin
himself shows up, and the movie's humor slows way down. Most of the jokes
Austin makes fall dead immediatly, While others start to build, and are
suddenly dropped. Another large problem, is that quite a few jokes, many of
them pretty bad to begin with, are reused over and over again. 
As for the characters, obviously most of them from the original have returned,
but two new ones have been added: Mini Me, and Fat Bastard. Mini Me is an
absolute riot, but Fat Bastard (Mike Myers under gobs of makeup) seems to be
there to do nothing more than disgust the audience and give oppurtunities for
poop jokes. Another problem is Heather Gragham. Now, I know this obviously
isn't an actor driven movie, but she is terrible. She looks embarassed to even
be in the film half the time, and the other half she's switching back and forth
between being chipper for no reason, and being serious.
All in all, there are some very amusing moments, but the majority of the movie
falls dead. If you liked the original, you'll probably enjoy this one. If you
didn't, beware. The film is more or less a rehash. Oh, and don't eat before
hand, because I guarantee Fat Bastard will have you feeling a little queezy.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
Impossible mission agent Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise) is back. His IMF
contact, Swanbeck (Anthony Hopkins), tracks him down while Hunt is
rock climbing on vacation and tells him to track down former IMF
agent, Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott). Ambrose has stolen the cure to a
lethal virus from a German scientist; he is now hunting for the virus
itself so he can infect most of the world and sell the cure to the
highest bidder. In order to catch Ambrose, Hunt enlists the aid of a
jewel thief named Nyah Nordoff-Hall (Thandie Newton). Nyah had a
relationship with Ambrose years earlier, and it is believed that he
still has feelings for her. The problem is that Hunt finds himself
falling for Nyah and isn't sure if he can let her go to Ambrose. Hunt
also employs the services of Luther Stickwell (Ving Rhames), the
computer geek who assissted him in his last mission, and a
wisecracking Australian named Billy (John Polson). The three find
their way to the outback, where Ambrose has holed up while searching
for the virus which is lethal if not given the antidote after 24
hours.
Think back to 1996, when the first "Mission: Impossible" film hit
theaters.  That movie, despite good performances from both Cruise and
Rhames and an interesting (if somewhat convoluted) plot, was mired
down by a lack of any action and Brian DePalma's direction. "Mission:
Impossible 2" has solved both these problems with one simple solution
- John Woo. Woo is the kind of director who can make a flock of
pigeons look interesting and exciting.  Whatever your opinion might be
of his two previous endeavors, "Face/Off" and "Broken Arrow", it's
hard to deny that the man has the ability to film a fantastic looking
action sequence. In "M:I-2" (as it has been advertised) he has created
a few scenes which will no doubt be rememberd by audiences for a long
time. One is a motorcycle chase sequence near the film's end; and the
other is a scene, that audiences will probably remember from the
previews, where Cruise scales a mountain without climbing gear. Both
scenes feature some of the most spectacular stuntwork I've seen this
side of a Jackie Chan movie.
If John Woo has one weakness, it's his inability to pull great
performances out of his actors. Tom Cruise is certainly adequate in
"M:I-2", and at times even a little above that; but he has delivered
much better performances in the past, even in movies like the
otherwise awful and pretentious "Magnolia". Ving Rhames ("Bringing Out
the Dead"), who is a very talented actor, is sadly underused once
again as the amusing computer geek. John Polson ("The Boys") is
relatively unknown to American audiences, having appeared mostly in
Australian films; and he will no doubt remain unkown after being in
this movie for a total of ten minutes or so. Thandie Newton
("Besieged") appears, at first glance, to be present entirely to look
good (and she does so admirably). However, the romantic elements in
"M:I-2" are actually used quite often and effectively. The only
problem is they take a back seat to the action scenes about half way
through the film, and poor Newton more or less vanishes. Last we have
Dougray Scott ("Ever After"), using a very poor imitation Scottish
accent. Oh wait, that really is his accent. Scott looks suitably evil
I suppose, but Woo used much better villains in his last two films:
Travolta and, uh, Travolta. Scott also gets the cheesiest lines, like
"You should have killed me when you had the chance."
Let's face it, you're not going to see "M:I-2" for romance or great
acting.  You want to see this movie for great action scenes and nifty
gadgets, and on both counts it delivers in spades. In fact, "M:I-2" is
the kind of movie that the James Bond films are trying to be, but are
failing at miserably.  I've got an idea: The entire Bond franchise
should be dropped, and we should get an "M:I-3" (I can't believe I'm
asking for a sequel). The action scenes are all excellent in one way
or another, and unlike in DePalma's rather sorry film, they come along
quite often. Woo also adds nice touches to the movie, like fire
reflecting in someone's eyes and dramatic music playing while Ethan
Hunt walks past a flaming doorway in slow motion. The movie's score is
another one of its strong points, being very dramatic and loud during
all the dramatic and loud scenes (which would actually ecompass most
of the film). I'd certainly recommend "M:I-2" to any action fans out
there, though I think there is enough gushy romance to satisfy the non
action fans as well (I could be wrong). The movie runs a touch too
long at 122 minutes.  I give it four out of five stars.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to:
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at either: http://www.dependentfilms.net or
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
Directed by: John Carpenter
Written by: John Steakley (novel), Don Jakoby
Jack Crow (James Woods) is a vampire hunter by trade. He and his team are 
funded by the Catholic church to track down vampire nests and wipe the 
beasties out. After their latest assignment, the team is "relaxing" at a 
hotel when a master vampire named Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith) comes calling 
and wipes the team out. The only ones to escape are Jack, his friend, 
Montoya (One of the Baldwins), and a prostitute named Katrina (Sheryl Lee) 
who was bitten by Valek. They find out that Valek is actually the very first 
vampire, accidentally created by the catholic church. He's trying to locate 
an artifact which will give him unlimited power, and his search is almost 
complete. Now Jack, Montoya, and a young priest named Father Adam Guiteau 
(Tim Guinee) have to track him down. They're using Katrina to find him 
because she now has a psychic link with Valek and sees what he sees. Of 
course, time is running out because Katrina will be a vampire in a matter of 
days.
John Carpenter's "Vampires" is the very epitome of the guilty pleasure. As I 
sat watching this marvelously stupid spectacle unfold, I knew I was watching 
a truly bad movie. Yet despite this realization I couldn't help but enjoy 
myself. There's something fun about "Vampires" that one simply cannot 
explain. Now, as a horror movie, the film is rather pitiful. There's nothing 
remotely scary about it, and whenever Thomas Ian Griffith actually tries to 
act scary, it's pretty laughable. Okay fine, so it's no horror movie. How 
does it work as an action movie? Well, uh, Woods and company basically kill 
each vampire in the exact same way, over and over again. It gets a tad 
tedious after awhile. Fine, how about as a thriller? There were a couple of 
good startle effects, somewhere, I think. Okay, so it's not much of a 
horror, there are only one or two thrills, and it doesn't work too well as 
an action movie. So why exactly did I like it? Frankly, I'm still trying to 
figure that out myself. There's plenty of gore, and I'm something of a gore 
lover; there's a great score by Carpenter himself; but I think the best part 
of the film is the highly entertaining performance from James Woods.
Woods ("Contact") isn't exactly the type of guy I think of when I list off 
great actors. I mean sure, he's got a few Oscar nominations under his belt, 
and maybe an Emmy or two, but what does that count for? Despite all this, he 
turns in a truly entertaining performance in "Vampires". He's clearly having 
a great time, and he really gets into it at times (watch for when he's 
riding a vampire out into the sun, stabbing it in the chest crying "Die! 
Die!"). It's too bad his supporting cast doesn't do quite so well. That 
Baldwin I mentioned earlier turns out to be Daniel (they're all 
interchangeable anyway), and he turns in a typical Baldwin performance. 
What's a typical Baldwin performance? Well, it's less than impressive when 
they're acting emotionless (that's most of the time), and laughably bad when 
they're trying to show emotion (which happens more often than I'd like). 
Sheryl Lee's (hey! it's Laura Palmer from "Twin Peaks"!) performance 
involves little more than violently shaking while muttering Valek's 
activities, and Tim Guinee ("Blade") is adequate if uninspiring as the young 
priest. Finally we have Thomas Ian Griffith ("Kull the Conqueror"), 
overacting for all he's worth. Yet while James Woods' overacting is fun and 
entertaining, Griffith's is just plain irritating.
First, I'm going to quickly cover the one thing about "Vampires" that I 
truly didn't like. I don't mean it was cheesy (because that would cover the 
whole movie), I mean I found it offensive. First and foremost is the 
treatment of Sheryl Lee's character by Daniel Baldwin. Now, I realize she's 
turning into a vampire, and I realize that makes her sub-human. Now you must 
realize that I don't care. I find it repulsive to watch a film's "hero" beat 
up a woman for not giving him answers as quickly as he wants. I find it even 
more repulsive that he falls in love with her while smacking her around. 
That's just wrong. Okay, gimme a second while I climb down off my pedestal. 
Alright, as I mentioned but a moment ago, the rest of this film is filled 
with cheese. The dialogue is cheesy ("I killed my own father padre, I got no 
trouble killing you."), the sets are cheesy (the hidden monastery has to be 
seen to be believed), the costumes and props are cheesy (Jack's crossbow 
looks about as threatening as your average super-soaker), but you know what? 
You probably won't care. You'll probably sit there with a big grin on your 
face, shaking your head in disbelief at the fact that you're actually having 
a good time (I know I was). If you go in wanting nothing more than that, you 
should have a blast. If you want a deep, horrifying vampire movie, you're in 
for an experience more disappointing than the second "Scream" film.
Carpenter, being the good horror director he is, does create a few moments 
of real tension in the film. They mainly hit near the end of the film when 
Jack, Montoya, and Father Adam confront Valek and his retinue, and involve 
Father Adam luring vampires into the open. The way in which the scene ends 
is really quite interesting. Carpenter's score is really little more than a 
few notes being played repeatedly. It actually reminded me of a Tom Petty 
song called "Cabin Down Below". Anyway, despite its simplicity, the score 
works well with the dusty locations where the film is shot. The other high 
point to the film is the dialogue. While it's certainly cheesy, it's also 
quite entertaining. In particular I enjoyed a little monologue by Woods 
about what vampires really are. "Vampires" runs a little too long at 107 
minutes, but it seldom lags. I'd recommend the film to fans of cheesy horror 
movies and to fans of James Woods. I wouldn't recommend it to you if you 
love movies like "Interview With the Vampire", because it is the polar 
opposite of "Vampires" I give the film three and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Gossip (2000/I)
What happens when a writer has an interesting idea for a film, but is so
thrilled by his idea that he apparently forgets to write a script to go
along with it? It would seem we get a movie like Gregory Poirier's
("Rosewood") "Gossip". This is a movie which sounds vaguely interesting at
first, only to start off poorly and grow worse and worse from there. While
this is mostly Poirier's fault for writing such a pathetic script (assuming
he bothered to write one at all), part of the blame can also land firmly on
Davis Guggenheim's (NYPD Blue) shoulders for not bothering to direct. The
movie simply flounders about, attempting to be hip, profound, and chilling
all at the same time. Instead, however, it comes off as confusing,
disjointed, and shallow.
Derrick (James Marsden), Cathy (Lena Heady), and Travis (Norman Reedus) are
roomates taking a class on communications. Their current topic is gossip and
the ways in which a rumor can grow and change, till the rumor is more
readily believed than the truth. The trio decide to start a rumor and track
its growth for a class paper. Derrick happens to catch two students, Naomi
(Kate Hudson) and Beau (Joshua Jackson), making out at a party. Naomi passes
out drunk and Beau leaves, but Derrick starts the rumor that the two
actually made love. Soon the rumor grows and grows to the point where Beau
is accused of rape, Naomi is being called the campus slut, and there seems
to be no way of stopping the rumor. The interesting thing is that Derrick
seems to have no desire to stop his lie, no matter what damage it may be
causing.
I am one of those people who has the ability to suspend my disbelief quite a
bit. For example, earlier this week I watched and enjoyed "U-571", despite
the fact that it was more than a little implausible. "Gossip", on the other
hand, is so ridiculously implausible that it pushed my suspension of
disbelief to the limits, and then it finally snapped. While things may start
off somewhat hard to believe, it's easy to forgive. By the film's ending,
however, things were so insanely outlandish that the few people in the
theater were actually laughing at the movie's serious moments. A good
example of one of the more ridiculous scenes would be one in which Derrick
claims Travis is the son of Mick Jagger to a bar tender. The jaded
bartender, who has no doubt heard it all, leaps at the idea and gives
Derrick, Travis, and Cathy drinks on the house.
The very young cast at work in this movie is, unfortunately, rather
talentless. This is made even worse by Guggenheim's apparent lack of ability
as a director. James Marsden's ("Disturbing Behavior") acting style seems to
consist of him grinning a lot, while trying to make his lines sound serious.
Lena Heady ("Rudyard Kipling's The Jungle Book") does nothing but pout a
lot, which I suppose is more Poirier's fault than her own. Joshua Jackson
("The Skulls") is a talented actor in desperate need of a new agent. His
part in "Gossip" is little more than a cameo in most respects. Lastly, we
have Norman Reedus ("8MM"), who somehow manages to breathe some semblance of
life into his part as a slightly disturbed, shy art student who creates a
rather interesting wall mural about the events unfolding around him.
Allow me to name a few more irritating aspects of "Gossip". The camera work
is quite obnoxious, jumping all over the place even while two people are
merely sitting and talking. The soundtrack is nothing more than a mix of
modern, popular songs used at all the wrong moments. Then we have the so
called "twists" sprinkled throughout the movie. The twists are always either
ridiculous and implausible, or so obvious they can hardly be called twists.
I wish I could say there was more to like here than simply the basic plot
ideas, but there really isn't. I can't honestly recommend "Gossip" to
anyone, and if you think the previews look interesting, I would still advise
you to catch a matinee or wait for video (given the poor attendance at the
showing I witnessed, it shouldn't take long for this one to hit video).
"Gossip" runs only 90 minutes, but it feels quite a bit longer. I give it
two out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Jui kuen II (1994)
You know, I'm still trying to figure out what exactly the plot to Drunken 
Master 2 was, but I'm going to attempt a plot summary anyway. Wong 
Fei-Hong (Jackie Chan) is a master of drunken boxing. This apparently means 
that while he's a great martial artist to begin with, when he has a little 
alcohol he becomes just about invincible. Wong was on a trip with his 
father, Wong Kei-ying (Ti Lung), when a parcel he was carrying is stolen by 
an old soldier (Lau Kar Leung). Wong believes he has recovered the parcel 
after a long (and simply amazing) fight, but he has grabbed the wrong 
package on accident. Wong and his father go back to their home, where his 
father teaches martial arts and is a respected physician. Soon the old 
soldier comes calling and Wong finds himself embroiled in a plot involving a 
business man's (Ken Lo Houi-Kang) theft of Chinese art. Wong must try to 
stop the plot, but he has a few other things to worry about as well. He has 
to reconcile with his father after the two have a fierce falling out, and he 
must try to keep his pregnant step-mother (Anita Mui) from fighting.
For those of you who don't know, The Legend of Drunken Master is 
actually a re-release of Drunken Master 2 from 1994. Why would 
Dimension choose to take such an old Chan flick and release it again with a 
new title and a massive publicity campaign? It's simply because Drunken 
Master 2 is Chan's best flick. Forget everything you've seen in Jackie 
Chan movies before, and prepare yourself for fight scenes like you've never 
experienced. The really amazing part about the movie isn't that the fight 
scenes are so spectacular, it's that during the lulls between fights it is 
so funny you shouldn't be bored. In particular, Anita Mui (who plays Chan's 
step-mother but is actually younger than him) is an absolute hoot as a woman 
who just might be the epitome of "strong willed". Her scene where she is 
trying to distract Wong's father's wrath is simply too funny for words. Yet 
the film's best comic moments come from Chan himself when he gets a few 
drinks under his belt and starts babbling about things like monkeys stealing 
the wine. For those of you who saw Shanghai Noon, remember the scene 
in the bordello? When Chan gets drunk and thinks his horse is dead? Well 
imagine a movie packed with scenes like that.
Alright, let's face facts here. The acting in a Jackie Chan movie is about 
as important as the acting in your average Friday the 13th sequel. 
The fact that the film contains some of the most horrendous dubbing in 
history makes the acting even more unimportant, but I'm going to give a 
critique a shot anyway. Chan is hilarious, showing some of his great comic 
timing in two scenes. One is where he fights five men at once while trying 
to get drunk, the other is the aftermath of this fight where he must deal 
with his furious father. Veteran martial-arts actor Lung Ti does an 
admirable job as the father. It's strange, but while Lung fights very little 
in the film we always get the impression that he could beat just about 
anyone black and blue with his eyes close. Anita Mui is an absolute riot as 
Chan's mother, though I wish she'd had just one chance to fight. Finally we 
have Ken Lo Houri-Kang, who may not be much of an actor (I don't speak 
Chinese, but I could tell his line delivery was more than a little off), but 
this man has moves like you've never seen before.
Speaking of moves, whoah boy, you want to talk about some astounding action 
scenes? Drunken Master 2 is overflowing with them. The opening fight 
scene, in which Chan and Lau Kar Leung battle it out under a train is 
excellent, filled with moves so fast I couldn't follow the action half the 
time (that's not an insult, it was amazing). Then, just as I was getting 
over this fight and a few similar duels that followed, we're hit by Chan and 
Lau Kar Leung fighting an army of axe-wielding warriors. This one scene must 
have required more choreography than nearly every other scene in the film 
combined. So, as I was reeling from that battle, this vastly entertaining 
movie hits us with yet ANOTHER battle scene at the end, between Chan and his 
real life bodyguard, the amazing Ken Lo Houi-Kang. Houi-Kang has the most 
amazing balance I've ever seen, being able to attack repeatedly with one 
foot kicking from every different angle. In one truly amazing shot he stands 
on one leg, holds the other leg up in the air till they form one straight 
line, and doesn't falter at all. Yeesh, I'm lucky if I can kick straight out 
without falling over.
I do have one small complaint with Drunken Master 2, and it's the way 
characters are wasted. I'm referring specifically to a young lady seen near 
the film's mid-point, who seems to have a romantic interest in Jackie. We 
don't see her again till close to the film's conclusion, and at that point 
she seems to have no interest at all in Jackie. A friend of Chan's who knows 
a different form of martial arts (the two have a heated argument over which 
is better) is also sadly underused. All that aside, let's it. Anyone who 
complains that this movie doesn't have enough plot or character development 
doesn't know what they're talking about. I'm not trying to be rude, but it's 
the truth. People going to see this movie want great action. They shouldn't 
care about plot and character development, and if they do they've obviously 
never heard of Jackie Chan before (in which case they've been living in a 
cave for the past ten years). Drunken Master 2 runs what could have 
been a long 102 minutes, but it didn't feel half that long to me. I'd 
recommend the to any Jackie Chan fans out there and give it four out of five 
stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)
Directed by: John Singleton
Written by: Ernest Tidyman (novel), John Singleton, Richard Price, Shane 
Salerno
John Shaft (Samuel L. Jackson) is back after a 19 year hiatus. This time his 
enemy is a racist young punk named Walter Williams (Christian Bale), who 
killed a young black man and skipped off to Europe on bail. Now, two years 
later, Walter has turned up again and Shaft hasn't forgotten him. Walter's 
father, a rich real-estate agent, has seen to it that no one can pin 
anything on his son by scaring the only witness out of her mind and causing 
her to run. The witness is a waitress named Diane (Toni Collette), who saw 
the whole thing happen. Now Shaft has to track her down before the case goes 
to trial again. Assisting him are a narcotics officer named Carmen (Vanessa 
Williams), an unusual friend named Rasaan (Busta Rhymes) and his uncle, John 
Shaft (Richard Roundtree). Unfortunately for Shaft, Walter has a little help 
too, which comes from the local drug lord, Peoples Hernandez (Jeffrey 
Wright). Now the two groups are in a race against time to find Diane, 
Shaft's group so she can testify, and Walter's group to try and silence her 
for good.
Okay, before everyone stones me for my low rating of this movie, let me say 
that I really enjoyed 1971's "Shaft". That version had an interesting plot, 
adept direction, and Shaft was a regular guy who we could relate to in some 
way. This version has none of these qualities. Singleton, who showed at 
least a trace of promise back in 1997 when he directed "Rosewood", seems to 
have lost his directing abilities. The plot, in this version, consists of 
nothing more than watching Shaft beat people up while delivering 
entertaining dialogue (my favorite line was: "Don't make me chase you more 
than fifty yards!"). Shaft was a normal guy back in 1997, but now he's been 
turned into some kind of super hero. I don't think I saw him so much as run 
out of breath throughout the film, much less face an opponent who could 
match up to him in a fight. I also found it puzzling and a little annoying 
that there was no womanizing on the part of Shaft in this version. I know, 
that sounds odd, but think about it - Richard Roundtree's Shaft was a cool, 
suave woman magnet. I don't even remember seeing Jackson's Shaft kiss a 
girl. It felt a little odd watching "Shaft" with all the sex sapped out of 
it.
It's not easy for an actor to carry an entire movie on his shoulders. Denzel 
Washington did it with "The Hurricane" and Angelina Jolie almost pulled it 
off in "Girl: Interrupted". Samuel L. Jackson is asked to do just this in 
"Shaft", but the script is too much of a dud for even this great actor to 
manage it. Don't get me wrong, it's a blast watching Samuel L. Jackson as 
the ultimate bad a**, but it's not enough to keep a movie going for long. 
The rest of the cast (with the exception of Christian Bale) does nothing to 
help Jackson carry the load, but I don't think they'd have been much help 
anyway. Richard Roundtree has little more than a cameo appearance, which is 
too bad since the audience went nuts the moment he showed up on screen. 
Vanessa Williams ("Soul Food") may not be the world's greatest actress, but 
she certainly deserved more screen time than she got here. Then there's poor 
Dan Hedaya ("Dick"), who shows up as a fellow officer, and looks woefully 
out of place throughout the film. Last we have Christian Bale, who was 
brilliant in "American Psycho", yet adds nothing to this film. Don't get me 
wrong, he turns in a great performance, but he plays a pathetic excuse for a 
villain. He's whiny and insecure and clearly no match for Shaft. The film's 
real villain is Peoples (or the script writers, depending on how you want to 
look at it), but he's not much more threatening than Walter.
I think one of the most irritating things about this new "Shaft" is that it 
plays more like a video game than a movie. The fight scenes go as follows: 
Shaft opens a door, guy jumps out, Shaft shoots him; Shaft turns a corner, 
guys jump out, Shaft shoots them. This got old and tedious after about ten 
minutes. In fact, that's the biggest problem with this movie; the entire 
thing felt old and tedious. Everything, from all the stereo-typical 
characters to the out of place soundtrack (except for the great Isaac Hayes 
score of course), felt old and dated, despite Singleton's attempts to change 
Shaft for the new millenium. Then there's the film's ending, which I'm 
obviously not going to go into in great detail, but after the movie ended I 
sat and pondered whether it was anti-climactic or realistic. I decided that 
since I had to think about it that made it anti-climactic, but you may 
disagree. So overall, what do I think of the new "Shaft" movie? I think the 
man should have stayed in the '70s. "Shaft" runs only 99 minutes, but it 
feels quite a bit longer. I'd recommend it only to people who worship the 
ground Samuel L. Jackson walks on (not that I can blame them for that) and 
give it two and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at: http://www.dependentfilms.net,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Evil Dead, The (1982)
Five college students - Ash, Scotty, Cheryl, Linda, and Shelly (Bruce 
Campbell, Hal Delrich, Ellen Sandweiss, Betsy Baker, and Sarah York 
respectively), are out for a weekend trip to a cabin in the woods. They've 
rented it cheap, and are looking forward to a great time. However, things 
aren't looking too good when Ash's car nearly crashes, and the bridge to the 
cabin almost collapses under them. Still, they decide to press on. Things 
seem normal at first, but soon Cheryl is hearing voices coming from the 
woods, and while drawing her hand takes on a life of its own and draws what 
appears to be a book with a face. The other four shake the occurrence off, 
and think Cheryl is making it all up. Then one night at dinner, the cellar 
door opens of its own accord. Ash and Scotty venture below and find the very 
book Cheryl drew as well as a tape recorder. They play the tape recorder, 
which contains a recording by a professor who translated the pages of the 
book (called The Necronomicon). The recording awakens a demonic force in the 
woods, and it soon comes calling on our five brave (though eternally stupid) 
friends.
The real question you have to ask yourself before renting Sam Raimi's ("A 
Simple Plan") "The Evil Dead" is this: how cheesy do you like your horror 
movies? If, like me, you like a thick layer of cheese smothered on top of 
your horror flicks, you should have an absolute blast watching "The Evil 
Dead". This is the sort of fun, campy movie you don't see in Hollywood 
anymore. If, on the other hand, you like your horror films deadly serious 
and without campy humor, run from "The Evil Dead" as quickly as possible. 
This movie will be Satan come to earth for you, so run fast and run far. If 
you fall somewhere in the middle, well, here's a way to figure out if you'll 
enjoy the film or not. In one scene, a character is possessed by a demon and 
attacks two other characters. The possessed character is thrown into the 
fire and begins screaming as her face is charred. One of the two she was 
attacking pulls her out of the fire and she courteously thanks him for 
rescuing her before attacking once more. Sounds way too goofy and cheesy for 
your taste? Well avoid the film, because it's chock full of moments like 
that. Sounds hilarious? Go rent "The Evil Dead" right now and call up a 
couple of friends (the film is funniest when watched with a group of 
friends).
Let's face it, only one actor matters in the "Evil Dead" movies, and that's 
Bruce Campbell. Campbell is, and probably always will be, a sadly 
under-appreciated actor in Hollywood. Now bear in mind, his appearance here 
is one of his first, and his lack of experience shows in a lot of his line 
delivery. However, the little hints at a grand comic talent are already 
showing through in several scenes. The man has a range of facial expressions 
that only Jim Carrey can compete with, and his talents behind the camera are 
equally impressive. He was actually the executive producer for "The Evil 
Dead" and co-producer for its two sequels. It's a good thing Campbell is so 
good, because the rest of the cast... well... isn't. The remaining actors 
range from laughably bad to just plain awful in their talents, and it's no 
wonder that none of them rose to anything resembling fame in Hollywood. 
Ellen Sandweiss lands firmly in the laughably bad category, playing Cheryl 
as a little off kilter even before being possessed for reasons that will 
forever remain a mystery. Hal Delrich is just plain awful as the hot-headed 
Scotty; Betsy Baker has her moments, but generally remains laughable as 
Linda; and Sarah York is absolutely terrible in the film's (thankfully) 
smallest part. So why the high rating for a film with acting this bad? 
Because the acting in a movie like "The Evil Dead" doesn't matter one bit.
So if the acting doesn't matter, what does? There are two things that raise 
"The Evil Dead" above nearly every other horror flick out there, and they're 
both reasons the film has maintained a cult following for nearly twenty 
years. The first reason is because the film is packed with all sorts of gore 
effects. I mean once you hit about the twenty minute mark, you're not going 
to spend more than five minutes without seeing something designed to disgust 
the audience. Even today the amount of blood and gore in "The Evil Dead" is 
impressive. Just imagine how audiences reacted back in '82. The other 
reason, and the much more important one in my book, is Sam Raimi's 
remarkable camera work. Raimi has actually made quite a name for himself 
with his kinetic camera movements. As far as I know he was the first to use 
the technique utilized when the main demonic force moves through the forest. 
He keeps the camera low and moving relentlessly forward, knocking over 
everything in its path. The only sound that accompanies it is a low roar 
that increases in intensity till the force reaches its target. Raimi's use 
of low camera angles is quite effective when used to highlight what were 
once scary scenes. Take a scene where the cellar door blasts open and all 
the characters hover around, looking down into the blackness. Raimi aims the 
camera up at each character's face in turn from below, like something 
watching them from inside the cellar. There is one other thing that has made 
"The Evil Dead" famous (or possibly infamous), and that is the scene in 
which one character is raped by the forest. I give the scene points for 
originality, but did we really need to see that?
I'm sure when this film was released back in 1982 it scared audiences half 
to death. There are a few scenes that remain somewhat eerie even now, like 
Cheryl's hand becoming possessed and drawing a picture of the Necronomicon. 
When viewed these days, "The Evil Dead" is best viewed as a comedy/horror. 
In other words, you'll have a more fun if you don't take it too seriously; 
and you'll have a lot more fun if you don't take it at all seriously. Yes 
the dialogue is horrible (Scotty: "An animal! That's the stupidest thing I 
ever heard."), the characters have no personality (Ash doesn't even develop 
one till the sequel), and if placed alongside modern horror films, this one 
appears to have no budget (It actually was made on a shoestring). Yet none 
of that really matters, and if you're looking for great acting and character 
development you've obviously gotten the wrong movie. As an example of 
classic '80s horror films, "The Evil Dead" stands head and shoulders above 
the rest. I'd recommend the movie to anyone who enjoys cheesy "B" horror 
movies. If you don't like it, you'll not have wasted much time since the 
film only runs 85 minutes. I give it four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Jbei ninpch (1995)
On a storm filled night in feudal Japan, the eight devils of Kimon ride into 
a small village, apparently bringing a plague with them. The devils are 
elite mercenaries, each with a special and unique power (one controls bees, 
one electricity, etc.). When all the villagers are killed, the local lord 
sends twenty ninja to investigate the event. They are all wiped out by one 
of the devils, save Kagero, the poison tester. She alone survives and is 
saved by Jubei, a wandering Ninja for hire. Now Jubei and Kagero have called 
the wrath of the devils down upon them, and the only way to survive will be 
to team up with a government spy named Dakuan. The three must travel to the 
plague filled village, find out who is behind the deaths, and stop them. 
Along the way they will be challenged by the eight devils and a legion of 
ninja, all led by an enemy from Jubei's past.
I know that's a short plot summary, but I don't want to give anything else 
away. It wouldn't take much to convince me that Yoshiaki Kawajiri's ("Wicked 
City") "Ninja Scroll" is the greatest anime (Japanese animation) ever 
created. Granted, I haven't seen a great many anime; I haven't even seen the 
much discussed "Princess Monoke"; but of the two dozen or so I've seen, 
nothing has even come close to the magnificence of "Ninja Scroll". A lot of 
what makes the film so great is that Kawajiri puts more effort and detail 
into his animated characters than most Hollywood directors put into their 
live ones. This effort, combined with incredible animation, an intriguing 
story, and some of the best action scenes ever (animated or otherwise) make 
"Ninja Scroll" one of, if not the best action movie of the past decade. Yet 
despite all the praise I heap on this wonderful movie, the sad fact of the 
matter is I can't do it justice. You'll have to see it for yourself to fully 
appreciate the film. However, be forewarned, this isn't a movie for 
everyone. "Ninja Scroll" is graphic in both sexual matters and carnage. If 
you don't feel you can handle these elements, steer clear.
Normally I'd devote this paragraph to a critique of the acting, but there 
obviously is none in "Ninja Scroll". Instead, I'm going to briefly discuss a 
few of the characters, and what makes them so interesting. I'll start with 
Jubei, one of the most carefully crafted and interesting action heroes ever 
to grace the screen. Jubei is made so interesting because he isn't exactly 
your classic hero. He's a mercenary ninja, working for the highest bidder. 
Does that mean he has no honor? Quite the opposite actually. Don't get it 
into your mind that Jubei is some invincible, shadowy figure; moving across 
Japan destroying evil with the flick of a wrist. He's good, but he's not 
indestructible. He gets pasted in a few fights, knocked around, bloodied, 
bruised, and occasionally only winning through luck or the intervention of 
someone else. Does this make him less of a hero? No, it makes him more of 
one because it makes him more human. Jubei feels pain and anguish, and he's 
so eloquently crafted that we start to believe he's really feeling these 
emotions and isn't just some animated character. Take, for example, a scene 
in which Jubei is recovering from fighting one of the devils. He is in a 
pond, cleaning his wounds. He pulls a tooth out, washes blood out of his 
mouth, and generally looks a mess. In your typical action film the hero 
takes a beating and is ready to go in five minutes. You never see Hollywood 
action heroes nursing their wounds, because they're invincible.
Kagero, the proud female ninja could easily have been nothing more than a 
caricature, but Kawajiri never allows this to happen. She's brash, 
head-strong, and always seems to have something to prove, but these 
attributes never feel like cliches. They feel more like a shield she puts 
up, and it occasionally breaks down. There's a scene where a massive demon 
of Kimon flings her into a hut, begins to rape her, and is interrupted by 
Jubei. After the rescue, Kagero acts like nothing happened, brushes Jubei 
off, and leaves to continue her mission. Yet once Jubei's back is turned she 
suddenly snaps as the full force of what just happened hits her like a ton 
of bricks. It's a great, moving scene; made even better by the fact that 
even though we've just met her, we already care about Kagero. Finally we 
have Dakuan, the old spy. Dakuan is mainly used for comic relief, but what a 
great comic character he is. I particularly loved a scene where he displays 
his own special ability, and one where Jubei leaves him to search for 
Kagero. He gets a great little speech in the latter about becoming a monster 
to fight one.
Obviously one of the most important elements to a movie like "Ninja Scroll" 
is the animation quality, and I assure you this movie possesses the very 
best. The animation is so crisp, so realistic, that you'll want to re-watch 
it once with the sound off so you can focus entirely on the film's beauty. 
I'm not just talking about how well the characters are drawn either. There 
are scenes where the backgrounds are so well drawn you'd swear this was real 
life. Scenes that stand out in my mind are one where Jubei climbs a cliff to 
get a better look at the area; an early fight on a wooden bridge right 
before a storm; and two characters talking in a marsh, surrounded by 
fireflies. It's too bad animated films can't win awards for cinematography. 
The fights are just as perfectly constructed. There's one at the start of 
the film, between a group of ninja and one of the devil of Kimon where they 
spot him, and fling a horde of throwing stars at him. Kawajiri actually 
shows each individual star slamming into the trees, and each star's strike 
looks different from the others (I know, I sat there and examined them).
So, now that I've raved about it for some time, you're no doubt wondering if 
"Ninja Scroll" is perfect. I'm afraid not, but the only flaw I can think of 
is that it's just a little too short. This causes a few of the scenes to 
feel a bit rushed. For example, a brilliant sword fight in a bamboo forest 
between Jubei and a blind warrior would have been even better if it hadn't 
been only a minute long. Despite that, there are two things which elevate 
"Ninja Scroll" above almost every other animated film I've ever seen. One is 
Kawajiri's attention to detail, the other is his labyrinth of a story. I 
never really took notice of his attention to detail till the last time I saw 
the film and noticed something interesting. In one scene, Jubei's shirt gets 
cut on the sleeve by one of the devils of Kimon. In all future scenes, 
Kawajiri makes certain that cut is always present on the same sleeve, and 
that it's the same size cut. His script is full of surprises, including 
characters dying when you don't expect them to and people turning out not to 
be who you thought they were. The movie runs a quick 94 minutes, and I do 
wish it had been made longer. Oh well, can't have everything. I'd recommend 
"Ninja Scroll" to any fan of anime, but make sure you get an uncut, 
subtitled version (the dubbed version is terrible; Jubei sounds like Captain 
America). I give it a full five out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Road to El Dorado, The (2000)
Directed by: Bibo Bergeron, Will Finn
Written by: Ted Elliott, Terry Rossio
As I walked out of "The Road to El Dorado", something was nagging at me, and
it took me awhile to determine what that was. The movie starts off by being
cute, with all the requisite cutesy little characters present that the kids
should ooh and ahh over; and throughout the middle of the movie it remains
cute, tacking on yet more adorable little characters. Finally, after sitting
through an hour and a half of this, it ends in a very predictable (and cute,
of course) way. In fact, that's all this movie ever was. It was never
interesting, exciting, or awe inspiring in the slightest. This was just one
of those mindless pieces of fluff that studios throw out for the kidlets
every year. I know I should go easy on "The Road to El Dorado" simply
because it's a film aimed at kids, but all the little kids in the theater
looked bored out of their minds as well.
Tulio (Kevin Kline) and Miguel (Kenneth Branagh) are two con artists on the
run from the authorities and a mob of angry people in Spain. In their haste
to escape, the two find themselves on board Cortes's ship as he heads for
the new world. Cortes discovers them, and he sends them off in a long boat
with only a horse and a map for company. After washing up on the shore of
South America, they find their way to the golden city of El Dorodo. The
friendly residents, led by their jovial (though nameless) chief (Edward
James Olmos) and an evil priest named Tzekel-Kan (Armand Assante), assume
that the visitors are gods and treat them as such. Only a young thief, named
Chel (Rosie Perez), sees through their con and wants in on the action. The
problem is, Cortes is hot on their heels, Tzekel-Kan wants to commit human
sacrifice in their names, and they have to keep up the charade for three
whole days.
Does that plot sound a little tired and recycled? It certainly felt that way
as I sat, bored out of my mind, waiting for this unbearably cutesy movie to
end. I honestly believe that it was possible to predict what each character
was going to say, long before they said it. I was rather amused by the fact
that this dull movie is so frantically paced. It's as though Bergeron and
Finn knew how boring their material was, and so they tried to bring the
experience to an end as soon as possible. In order to break up the trite and
dull sequences throughout this movie, we are occasionally granted musical
numbers, which seem to go on forever and ever, but do not contribute to the
story in any way. They are also shot in a bizarre, psychedelic manner,
making them appear to be straight out of something from the '60s.
I believe the two primary reasons people are going to see this movie is for
the animation and for Kenneth Branagh and Kevin Kline. I will say that the
animation used in "The Road to El Dorado" is quite nice, but it's certainly
nothing spectacular. I'd put the animation a notch or two below 1998's "The
Prince of Egypt". The fact that I had just seen a preview for the upcoming
and fantastic looking "Titan A.E." before hand, probably didn't help
matters. As for the star duo involved, I'm sorry to say that they aren't
given much to do in this movie. Anyone could have performed these exact same
roles, and no one would have known the difference. Part of the problem is
that the two sound utterly joyless in their roles, and who can blame them?
Their jokes are few and far between, and the majority of them fall flat.
"The Road to El Dorado" isn't without its high points. The animation is
quite lovely, and there are several truly hilarious scenes. One of the
supporting characters, a little armadillo which follows the heroes by
rolling around and squeaking seemed to delight the kids in the audience, and
even I found him rather amusing. Like I said, this is a clean, wholesome,
safe movie, which I might have expected a bit too much from. It runs only 82
minutes, but it feels much longer. I would recommend it to animation fans
since it is so nice looking, but not really to anyone else. I would
especially warn off history buffs, since the film takes more than a few
liberties with the realities of Cortes's conquests. I give it two and a half
out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Art of War, The (2000)
Agent Neil Shaw (Wesley Snipes) is a covert ops agent for the UN (I didn't 
even know the UN had a covert ops unit). He and his teammate, Bly (Michael 
Biehn), are employed by the Secretary General, Douglas Thomas (Donald 
Sutherland), and his right-hand man (his words, not mine), Eleanor Hooks 
(Anne Archer). His latest assignment involves spying on a Chinese diplomat 
(James Hong), who gets assassinated right in front of Shaw's eyes. Soon Shaw 
is on his own, after his teammates are killed, and he's running from both 
the Chinese and the Americans, since they believe he killed the diplomat. 
Thrown into the mix is a Chinese version of Donald Trump (movie's words, not 
mine), David Chan (Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa), who may know more about the 
assassination than he's letting on. The only person on his side is a Chinese 
reporter, Julia Fang (the very cute Marie Matiko), who knows he wasn't the 
assassin. Against him is FBI agent Frank Capella (Maury Chaykin), who is 
investigating a different crime which seems to link to the slain diplomat. 
Now Shaw and Julia have only 24 hours to clear his name, before...
... where was I? Sorry, I sort of drifted off for a minute there. "The Art 
of War" is something of an anomaly amongst action movies. It's an action 
movie which is intent on featuring as little action as possible. That's why, 
despite the fact that I'd had plenty of sleep, I was drifting off every 
twenty minutes or so. So what does Duguay ("Screamers") insert instead of 
action? Some of the worst dialogue you're likely to hear. "The Art of War" 
is an action movie with no action; a political thriller with no thrills; and 
a mystery you'll have figured out in the first twenty five minutes. Alright, 
alright, I know there's only one real question on your mind, and it's that 
you want to know if it's entertaining. I'm afraid not. In fact, you'll 
probably be indulging in one of three different activities rather than 
watching the movie. You might be snoring (quite a few people in the audience 
at my showing were doing that), you might me checking your watch (I wish I 
could have been doing that, but my pocket-watch has no indiglo), or you 
might be chatting with your neighbor (the rest of the audience was doing 
that). In case you're wondering, I was busy doodling on my notebook. Why am 
I sitting here, rambling about everyone's activities during the movie? 
Because writing a review for a truly dull movie is almost as bad as watching 
one.
Ah the acting, the acting is certainly one of the more dismal points to "The 
Art of War". Wesley Snipes has two acting modes: Slyly humorous and friendly 
(like in "Major League"), and gruffly stoic (like in "Blade"). Snipes is in 
full stoic mode in "The Art of War", which is a shame because he might have 
brought some humor to the script otherwise. Instead, the humor all comes 
from Maury Chaykin ("Cutthroat Island"). However, while Chaykin's brand of 
humor (which generally involves him quietly making strange comments) is 
rather amusing, it's completely out of place in this movie. Donald 
Sutherland does nothing more than chew scenery in a few scenes. Marie Matiko 
("Mystery Men"), who is a relative newcomer, plays Snipes's love interest (I 
think) in one of the most tacked on romances I've ever seen. That's not to 
say she does a poor job; it's just that her role was so useless she couldn't 
do much with it. Finally, we have Michael Biehn ("Aliens") and Anne Archer 
("Rules of Engagement"). I've always found Biehn to be one of the most 
underrated actors in Hollywood, turning in stellar performances in "The 
Abyss", "Terminator", and "Aliens". In "Rules of Engagement", Biehn seems to 
be going out of his way to prove me wrong. He overacts like no one this side 
of John Lithgow, he uses one of the worst Southern accents I've ever heard, 
and he fights like a girl. I could beat this guy up. Anne Archer, who I've 
never thought of as a particularly talented actress, just gives me more 
ammunition for my arguments against her.
Perhaps in the hands of a more skilled director, "The Art of War" could have 
been at least vaguely interesting. Afterall, Duguay's idea of neat 
directorial tricks are as follows: put little trails behind the bullets 
(pretty original, huh?); show us everything we've already seen in flashbacks 
as though we're too stupid to remember (I think the movie was actually an 
hour long, played twice); blast the soundtrack and sound effects at all 
times till the audiences' ears start bleeding; and throw in completely 
gratuitous nude scenes so as to appeal to young males who snuck in (most 
young males in my audience didn't catch the gratuitous nudity, they were too 
busy sleeping). Then again, with a script like this, maybe the director 
didn't make much of a difference. For all those (like me) who thought "The 
Perfect Storm" had horrendous dialogue, wait till you get to sit through 
this one. My personal favorite was Anne Archer saying: "My instinct tells me 
there is something lurking beneath the surface." She utters it with complete 
seriousness, and poor Donald Sutherland is forced to reply without bursting 
into hysterics (if you look at his face, it's obviously killing him).
So after all this complaining, are there any good points to "The Art of 
War"? Well, the first fifteen minutes have their moments. Snipes is sneaking 
into a skyscraper so he can blackmail a general into resuming peace talks 
(or something like that). The soundtrack during those few scenes is really 
quite good, and there are one or two decent action scenes (Snipes falling 
slowly towards earth using a damaged parachute). Also, Snipes may not be the 
world's best actor, but he does have some impressive moves. The film's 
ending goes on far past what was necessary, dragging on for about four 
scenes too many. One last thing - why do some directors (I won't name names) 
think audiences are so stupid that they feel a need to explain the most 
obvious ideas? In one scene, Maury Chaykin gets shot in the chest by an 
assassin after already being in a car accident. The assassin shoots him to 
ensure he's dead, obviously. After the assassin leaves, Chaykin stands up, 
curses a little, and proceeds to show us how he's miraculously still alive; 
a bulletproof vest! What wondrous invention is this? Apparently something 
fairly new since the assassin didn't even think to shoot Chaykin in the 
head. "The Art of War" runs an ungodly 117 minutes. I'd recommend it to no 
one and give it two out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Seldom has a movie come along that had me walk out in such an absolute daze. In
truth, I needed a few days to let the film soak in before I could write this.
What I saw can only be described by a word used sarcasticaly several times in
the movie. Used here however, I'm completely serious. It was spectacular.
Normally I keep my synopsis fairly short, but this is such an involved movie
that it's going to require a longer plot outline.
Lester Burnham is a man with one year to live, so the opening narration tells
us. We aren't privy to the events surrounding his death however. Lester lives
in a generic neighborhood with his wife, Carolyn and daughter, Jane. He and his
wife were in love at some point in time, but that time is long since past. His
daughter thinks he's a tremendous loser, and it appears that he rather agrees
with her. He turns his whole life around when he meets his daughter's friend
Angela, who becomes the center of all his fantasies from then on out.
He quits his job, starts working out and smoking pot, buys his dream car, and
drives his wife even further over the edge. She has, in fact, become so
distanced from Lester that she's now having an affair with her real-estate
rival, Buddy Kane. Next door to the Burnhams live what could be viewed as an
even more disfunctional family. Colonel Fitts runs his household like a drill
seargeant. He requires urine samples from his son Ricky every six months for
drug testing. Ricky is, in fact, a drug dealer and a rather obsessive voyeur.
The newest interest of his video camera is Jane Burnham. This first disturbs
her and then slowly begins to fascinate her. The lives of these seven people
slowly grow together more and more until the film's dark yet strangely
necessary finale.
Despite the 5 star rating I've given this film, it is certainly not for
everybody. It deals with more taboo subjects than I can count. For starters,
the entire idea of a man in his forties lusting after a high school girl is
rather disturbing to most. Also touched upon are ideas about as abuse, drugs,
adultery, voyeurism, the list goes on and on. The rather frightening thing, is
that several of these forbidden subjects aren't portrayed as being evil. Those
who have moral misgivings about these few topics I've mentioned may want to
steer clear of this one.
Now that I've given the warning, I'll cover the things that truly made this a
great movie. For starters, the acting is exceptional all around. In particular,
Kevin Spacey is amazing in a role that is quite a change for him. Audiences are
used to seeing him in roles where his character is intelligent and put
together; such as Jack Vinceness (LA Confidential) and Chris Sabian (The
Negotiator). Here, his character is, for all intents and purposes, a loser.
However, he so completely throws himself into the role that we never for a
second doubt him. The other amazing performance comes from newcomer Wes
Bentley. Ricky seems to be the only person who is fully in charge of his
emotions, if not his life.
While the acting is certainly one of the highpoints, there are far more to this
film than I can cover in this review. The script is wonderful and involving,
changing from being hilarious to complete seriousness flawlessly. The
characters are sharply defined without being sterotypical (with the possible
exception of Colonel Fitts), and the music is perfectly used to enhance several
key scenes. I've heard some complaints about the film's dark ending not fitting
in with the rest of the movie. I completely disagree with this. I thought the
ending was esential considering the character types at play here.
Overall, I have to give this a full rating of five stars, yet advise you to see
it only if you think they can handle the forbidden subjects, so blatantly
depicted. Expect this to get nominations in all the major categories at this
year's academy awards.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
Unusually high expectations are the bane of movie makers everywhere. They
nearly succeeded in killing the new Star Wars film, they caused people to
expect "The Mummy" to belong to a different genre, and they will most likely do
a good job of killing Kevin Smith's latest outing, "Dogma". I must admit, I am
guilty of having my expectations up a little too high, mainly because I so
vastly enjoyed Smith's previous outings. So it is entirely possible that my
review of this film is a tad biased.
Loki (Matt Damon) and Bartleby (Ben Affleck) are two angels who have been
banished from heaven. However, they have just found a loophole in Catholic law
which will permit their return to paradise. The catch is, if they succeed, all
existence will be wiped out because God will have been shown to be fallible.
The universe's only hope lies in the hands of Christ's descendent, Bethany
(Linda Fiorentino). Bethany will be assisted by two prophets named Jay and
Silent Bob (Jason Mewes and Kevin Smith), and the 13th apostle, Rufus (Chris
Rock). Working against them are the demon Azrael (Jason Lee), three kids with
hockey sticks (dont ask), and the pair of angles themselves.
If there is one thing that Kevin Smith will be known for (other than for
playing the hilarious Silent Bob), it is his ability to write witty dialogue.
While "Dogma" certainly has its moments of wonderful dialogue, it is marred by
long spans of rather dull talk regarding the nature of religion. The comic
dialogue here is at its best when coming from Jason Mewes, who plays the
recurring character from Smith's previous three films and from Alan Rickman as
the voice of god, Metatron.
The cast here is really quite good. Ben Affleck and Matt Damon appear to be
having a tremendous amount of fun with their roles, Chris Rock is amusing as
the bitter, forgotten apostle, and Salma Hayek is delightful, as always, in a
turn as the muse, Serendipity. In fact, the only person who seems out of place
here is Linda Fiorentino. While normally a competent actress, she never seems
particularly comfortable with her role here and delivers her lines in a
particularly bored fashion.
While the film has been vastly criticized for its assaults on religion, I found
them to be nothing more than playful jabs at those who are too set in their
ways. The problem with this movie isn't its religious content, it's the fact
that the jokes here are few and far between. Smith seems more concerned with
trying to convey a moral message about understanding and the true meaning of
religion than he does with making the film comical. While the message is all
well and good, it isn't why most audiences are going to this film.
"Dogma" runs far too long at 130 minutes. In fact, I found myself drifting off
several times during this exessively lengthy film. Due to this and the lack of
humor, I'm forced to give "Dogma" two and a half stars and a recommendation to
wait for video if you're really wanting to see it
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Crew, The (2000)
Bobby Bartellemeo (Richard Dreyfuss), Joey "Bats" Pistella (Burt Reynolds), 
Mike the Brick (Dan Hedaya), and Tony "The Mouth" Donato (Seymour Cassel) 
are a bunch of wise guys. You know the type, these guys used to break things 
for gangsters back in the forties because they were too stupid to run their 
own gang. The problem is, now it's the nineties and they're still wise guys; 
they're just too old and feeble to break things. The group lives in the Raj 
Mahal Hotel in Florida, the last place the old folks have. The landlord has 
decided to raise the rent so the old people will leave and he can bring in 
the new, young clientele. So the wiseguys decide to take a corpse from the 
morgue (where The Brick works), shoot it, and place it in the hotel so the 
young people will stay away and the rents will drop. The problem is, being 
the numb skulls these guys are, they shoot the body of a Cuban drug lord's 
(Miguel Sandoval) father. The drug lord thinks his father was still alive 
when the wise guys shot him, so he starts trying to track them down. Thrown 
into the mix are a stripper, named Ferris (Jennifer Tilly), who wants her 
step-mother (Lainie Kazan) killed; Detective Olivia Neal (Carrie-Anne Moss), 
a cop who is slowly figuring the whole thing out; and Bartellemeo's search 
for his long-lost daughter, whose name just happens to be Olivia.
Mobster comedies seem to be quite popular in Hollywood these days. They've 
thrown us dreck like "Mickey Blue Eyes" as well as the occasional hilarious 
movie like "Analyze This". Then we get movies like Michael Dinner's (tv's 
"Chicago Hope") "The Crew". This is your typical August comedy; not all that 
funny, but not incredibly bad either (the really bad movies get saved for 
January and February). "The Crew" follows that trend of the past few years 
where two similar movies are released within a few weeks of each other 
("Armageddon" and "Deep Impact" in '98, "Sixth Sense" and "Stir of Echoes" 
in '99). I'm not sure just why 2000 was chosen as the year of old guy movies 
("Space Cowboys" anyone?), but who am I to argue with Hollywood. So, you're 
no doubt wondering if "The Crew" will make you laugh. Well, you'll no doubt 
chuckle quite a few times, but there isn't a single good belly laugh. The 
biggest problem with "The Crew", as compared to "Space Cowboys", is that the 
cast doesn't appear to be having all that much fun. In "Space Cowboys", the 
actors appeared giddy with excitement over what they were doing. In "The 
Crew" you'll want to check the cast members' pulses from time to time.
Richard Dreyfuss is used as the glue to hold our aging cast together, but 
Dreyfuss can't quite pull this task off. How can that be, you ask? Well, of 
all the cast members, Dreyfuss appears the most bored out of his mind at 
being in this movie (though it's still better than his last so-called 
comedy, "Krippendorf's Tribe"). Burt Reynolds delivers his usual display of 
ineptness at playing a comic role (or a dramatic role, or an action role, 
etc.), though he does get one great scene. Working in a Burger King, he gets 
one of those irritating customers who asks for a thousand and one special 
instructions on a hamburger. He leans forward and hisses: "I know what the 
commercials say, but special orders DO upset us." Dan Hedaya ("Clueless", 
"The Hurricane") can't help but be great in everything he appears in (even 
his brief appearance in "Alien: Resurrection" was good), and he's one of the 
only good things about "The Crew". While his cohorts sleepwalk their way 
through the film, Hedaya is having a grand-ol time playing the brainless 
Brick. Seymour Cassell, who was wonderful as Max Fischer's father in 
"Rushmore", isn't even given dialogue in "The Crew", so it's hard to blame 
the man for looking bored. Carrie-Anne Moss ("The Matrix") gives an adequate 
performance, but it's nothing special. Finally we have Miguel Sandoval ("Get 
Shorty") as the Latin druglord who knows he's a cliche (too bad Barry Fanaro 
didn't realize his movie was as well). Sandoval gets all the funniest 
moments (a scene where two bodies hang from the ceiling behind him while he 
gives a speech to his troops) and lines, and he delivers then with comic 
timing bordering on perfection. Too bad he's not on screen very often.
I complain and complain that the actors weren't having any fun with their 
script, but I truly can't blame them. Every old, cliched joke in the book is 
used in "The Crew". Granted, old and cliched jokes can be funny, but not 
when they're used repeatedly. Fanaro uses every joke till it's been ground 
into the dirt and then finally starts on a new one. The constant jokes about 
the characters having to go to the bathroom all the time get really old, 
really fast. I suppose the question you really have to ask yourself before 
going into "The Crew" is: how much do I like jokes about old people acting 
like old people? If those sorts of jokes are hysterical to you (for whatever 
bizarre reason), you'll have a great time. That's because there's no other 
kind of joke in "The Crew". We get traces of jokes about the Latin 
druglords, and one or two involving Carrie-Anne Moss and her ex-boyfriend 
(played by the incredibly irritating Jeremy Piven), but everything else is 
us laughing at people for being old. The elderly in my audience seemed to 
find many of these jokes hysterical. Most of the younger people just stared 
blankly at the screen.
A lot of the film's problems come from the fact that the jokes are all 
shoved in your face. I've always felt that a great comic film will feature 
jokes which occur in the background, or very quickly, so that only the 
careful watcher will notice them (The Dude filling out a check for a few 
cents in "The Big Lebowski" is a great example). In "The Crew", Michael 
Dinner leaves every joke lingering on screen in plain view till you just 
want to stand up and start shouting that you get it already (or maybe that's 
just me)! The other extreme is long, drawn out segments with no laughs. 
Under normal circumstances these types of scenes are present in a comedy to 
further the plot. In "The Crew" these scenes seem present because Barry 
Fanaro couldn't think of anything else to do. Let's face it, the film's plot 
isn't going to sustain much of a running time (which is probably why the 
movie only runs 88 minutes), but if Fanaro was going to throw filler into 
the mix, he could at least have made it funny filler. As for the soundtrack, 
well, it's not much to write home about. In fact, I honestly can't remember 
very much of it. I'd recommend "The Crew" to people who think old guys 
lusting after young women (a fairly major part of this movie) is funny and 
give it a slightly generous three out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
Directed by: Roman Polanski
Written by: John Brownjohn, Roman Polanski
"There's nothing more reliable than a man whose loyalty can be bought for
hard cash," Boris Balkan (Frank Langella) states near the beginning of "The
Ninth Gate". The film actually starts off rather well, with decent quotes
like this one and an intriguing story. However, things grow steadily worse
from there, until the movie disintegrates into a heap of cheesy dialogue and
horror film cliches. Roman Polanski ("Rosemary's Baby") hasn't made a film
in quite some time, since he's been out of the country fleeing a statutory
rape charge that was brought against him. Polanski is obviously out of
practice. The man who once created a classic horror film like "Rosemary's
Baby" back in 1968, now seems incapable of scaring his audiences in any way.
Dean Corso (Johnny Depp) is a finder of rare books (a book detective, as one
character puts it). His latest assignment is to track down the remaining two
copies of an ancient book for his employer, Boris Balkan. The book is called
The Ninth Gate, a sort of bible to devil worshipers. Balkan wants Corso to
determine which of the three remaining volumes is authentic, as he is
certain that two of them are forgeries. Corso's journey leads him to France,
Portugal and Spain as he tracks down collectors of rare and occult books. He
soon discovers that he is being followed by two interested parties. One is
Liana Tefler (Lena Olin), who was the original owner of Balkan's copy, the
other is a young lady (Emmanuelle Seigner) who seems to be protecting Corso
for unkown reasons.
Like I said, it really is a rather interesting plot idea, but Polanski
somehow botches it beyond all recognition. One of the largest problems with
the film is that Polanski seems incapable of tightening the script in any
way. We are constantly given scenes like this one: Johnny Depp walks into
the room, looks around for a minute and a half, then unpacks his bag. He
looks at his book for several more minutes, then puts it away and walks out
of the room. You'd be amazed at the amount of yawning I heard in the
audience during this so called thriller. It seems Polanski decided to spend
all his time on scenes which we couldn't care less about, but in the
tradition of "Eye of the Beholder" and "Boiler Room", he spent no time at
all on the film's ending. This is another one you can add to that ever
growing list of films that just stops in mid-scene, rather than really
ending.
I recently heard that Johnny Depp refused to discuss "The Ninth Gate", being
unhappy with the final product. His lack of enthusiasm for the film
certainly shows in his performance. The man looks bored out of his mind
throughout the entire film. As for the rest of the cast, the only
interesting performance comes from Frank Langella ("Cutthroat Island") as a
creepy millionaire. Lena Olin ("Mystery Men") has always appeared to possess
no acting talent whatsoever, and she continues to display this here.
Emmanuelle Seigner ("Frantic") is given very little to do, and she does so
admirably. The most aggravating and yet somehow strangely amusing
performance (or perhaps I should say performances) comes from Jose Lopez
Rodero, playing twin brothers who complete one another's scentences.
The last thing I'm going to mention is the music used in this film. I'm not
sure who chose it, but it is more suitable for a comedy than a horror film.
There is nothing remotely suspensful about it; what suspense might be in the
film, is killed whenever the music starts playing. If 2000 continues with
the sort of movies I've seen so far, we're all in for a very long year. "The
Ninth Gate" is yet another waste of time. Luckily, "American Beauty" and
"The Sixth Sense" are playing in theaters right now, having been re-released
after their Oscar nominations. I'd suggest seeing one of those rather than
this piece of tripe. The movie runs far too long at 127 minutes, which
should have been cut down to at least 110. I'd recommend it only to die hard
fans of Johnny Depp, and give it two out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Bait (2000)
Directed by: Antoine Fuqua
Written by: Andrew Scheinman, Adam Scheinman, Tony Gilroy
Alvin Sanders (Jamie Foxx) is a small time crook who was just caught for 
trying to steal a bag full of shrimp (sorry, prawns). Two crooks, John 
Jaster (Robert Pastorelli) and Bristol (Doug Hutchison), just stole 42 
million dollars in gold at the exact time Alvin was stealing his 
crustaceans. Jaster double-crosses Bristol when he finds out what a 
psychopath Bristol is, and then winds up in the slammer with Sanders. Jaster 
has a weak heart though, and just before dying of a massive coronary, he 
tells Sanders something about the gold being at The Bronx Zoo and there's no 
place like home. The US treasury department, led by Agent Edgar Clenteen 
(David Morse), is trying to track down Bristol and they decide to use 
Sanders as bait. They implant a tracking device in his jaw, and make it 
known on the streets that he knows where the gold is. Now they just have to 
wait for Bristol to try and contact Sanders. The only thing they didn't 
count on was Sanders trying to go straight so he can be with his old 
girlfriend, Lisa (Kimberly Elise) and his newly discovered son. Now Bristol 
is chasing Alvin, the government is chasing Alvin, and the only person who 
doesn't know what's going on is Alvin.
Like "Bless the Child", from earlier this year, "Bait" is the sort of movie 
that will start to leave your mind about an hour after seeing it. In three 
or four hours you'll most likely have forgotten the movie entirely. This 
isn't because "Bait" is a bad movie (though it certainly isn't a good one 
either), it's just a mishmash of harmless fluff that we've all seen before. 
Okay, fine, so we've seen it all before, but what you really want to know is 
if it's entertaining, right? Well, it has its moments, few and far between 
as they may be. Jamie Foxx ("Any Given Sunday") carries the movie with his 
no inconsiderable comic talent, but the film's biggest problems lie with its 
writers. Andrew ("North") and Adam Scheinman ("Mickey Blue Eyes") don't seem 
to know what kind of a movie they're trying to create. "Bait" goes from 
goofy, slap-stick humor when Jamie Foxx is on screen, to almost disturbing 
seriousness when Doug Hutchison ("The Green Mile") is on screen. Is "Bait" 
an action film? Not exactly. Is it a comedy? Not really. Is it a brilliant 
mix of the two like James Cameron's "True Lies"? Not by a long shot.
I remember seeing Jamie Foxx back on the Wayans brothers series, "In Living 
Color". At the time I couldn't understand why he didn't get more attention 
as a comic actor. Now that he has it, the only thing I can't figure out is 
why he doesn't get better roles. Do you remember "Held Up", from earlier 
this year? Of course you don't, it was in and out of theaters in about two 
weeks. It's likely "Bait" will share the same fate. Foxx's performance in 
"Bait" does have its funny moments, but I'm sure some of his better comic 
scenes were marred by the fact that I couldn't understand what he was 
saying. The man seems to have a mouth full of marbles in this movie. David 
Morse ("The Green Mile"), who I've always liked, turns in one of his lesser 
performances as the treasury agent, Edgar. It's not entirely his fault, he 
does get some pretty lousy dialogue, but he also shamelessly overacts for 
the entire first half of the film. I'm not sure why he suddenly throws it 
into neutral for the last half, but it was a welcome change. Last and least 
we have Doug Hutchison. I didn't like Hutchison as the the little weasel, 
Percy in "The Green Mile", and I liked him even less as the slimy Bristol in 
"Bait". There's just something aggravating about his acting style. As long 
as he keeps it tightly reigned in he's tolerable, even a little creepy. Yet 
the moment he starts to act angry he becomes laughably bad.
I suppose if you're one of those people who can't get enough of tacked on 
car chases and explosions you'll find "Bait" to be entertaining enough. If 
(like me) you're someone who wants a little more from your movies, you'll be 
disappointed time and again. This is quite a shame because the movie does 
have a few points in its favor other than the star. Director Antoine Fuqua 
("The Replacement Killers") does an excellent job with the film's dreary 
script. He keeps the story moving along nicely, and uses some really 
interesting techniques. There's a scene where a man is tied to a chair, 
surrounded by a massive bomb. If anyone opens the door it will explode, and 
the police are about to smash the door in. Sounds more than a little 
cliched, right? Normally it would be, but Fuqua films it in such an 
interesting way that you'll probably forget you've seen the situation a 
hundred times before. He effectively uses slow motion in this and several 
other scenes, and he utilizes some wonderful cinematography by Tobias 
Schliessler ("Candyman II"). Schliessler uses broad, panning shots of New 
York City combined with some excellent over-head shots of the city at night. 
Fuqua only drops the ball once or twice when he succumbs to Oliver Stone 
syndrome and breaks away from monologues to lighting flashing through the 
sky for no apparent reason.
It's a shame a good star, a good director, and a promising cinematographer 
are wasted on this script. A part of me really wanted to like "Bait", but 
the fact that I'd seen it all before combined with a few bad performances, 
yet another rap soundtrack (I'm so tired of those I can't see straight), and 
a climax which destroys all the film's credibility kept me from really 
enjoying it. Speaking of the soundtrack, that was one of the biggest 
disappointments. I'm not entirely sure why Fuqua decided to set it up like 
this, but half the film contains rap music, and the other half (like in that 
scene I mentioned earlier) contains some really nice instrumental music by 
Mark Mancina ("Con Air"). Why did Fuqua keep switching back in forth? All I 
can figure is he was trying to cater to both groups (those who like Rap and 
those who like purely instrumental), but I think all he really succeeded in 
doing was irritating both sides by not being able to decide on one tone. The 
last point going against "Bait" is the running time. You're average film of 
this genre is going to run about an hour and a half, maybe 100 minutes. 
"Bait", for some bizarre reason, runs 119 minutes. I don't know what the 
film's editor, Alan Edward Bell (what a surprise, he also edited the 
horrible "The Story of Us") was thinking, but I could have cut at least a 
half hour out of this film. I'd recommend "Bait" to fans of typical, cliched 
Hollywood fare (there are a lot of these people out there) and give it three 
out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
When this wonderful film was released, two things killed it at the box office.
The fact that it had very little advertising, and that it was overshadowed by
the lumbering monstrosity that was "Titanic". When masterpieces like this are
so completely defeated, it shows the rather sad state of affairs Hollywood is
in today.
The labyrinth plot is mainly about three cops. Ed Exley, who is a golden boy of
the LA police; Bud White, who is a maverick cop, playing by his own rules to
get justice; and Jack Vincennes, the celebrity cop who works with Sid Hudgeons
from the tabloid "Hush Hush" to get callers that will put his picture on the
front page. The three very different men are brought together by a shooting at
an all night coffee shop which claims the lives of over a dozen people. Soon
however, they are dragged through a maze of crimes ranging from prostitution to
heroin running, which reach through all levels of power in LA. 
This film has it all. An incredible script, wonderful music, perfect and sets
and lighting effects, and some of the best acting I've seen in a long time. The
script is truly amazing, managing to take what should be a messy, convoluted
story and turning it into storytelling at its finest. Easy to follow, despite
the many subplots and characters. The characters are all real people that are
developed and defined to the point where the audience truly believes these were
real people. The music, by Jerry Goldsmith is perfect for the film.
Highlighting every scene and giving a great impression that this is really 50's
LA

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
If there is one universal rule in Hollywood, it is that all successful movies
will have a horde of clones following close behind. Such is the case with "I
Know What You Did Last Summer". A cheap, predictable, pathetic excuse for a
slasher movie, it tries to follow in the footsteps of Wes Craven's highly
entertaining "Scream" with disasterous results.
Four teenagers celebrate their graduation from high school in typical teen age
fashion. They drive to the beach, get drunk, and head back only to hit someone
on the road. They then choose to dump the body in the sea, make a pact never to
mention it again, and go on with their happy little lives. A year later, they
begin receiving threats and are eventually attacked by someone who claims to
know what they did the previous year.
I'm going to keep the rest of this review very short, because I don't want to
go off on a two hour rant about how awful this movie was. First, let me point
out how completely devoid of anything resembling a scare this film was. Second,
if there is one thing I simply cannot stand it is long chase scenes which drag
on for at least twenty minutes only to end in the exact way we knew they were
going to before they started. Third, and final, I'm not going to reveal who the
killer is, but if I were to tell you, it would hardly be classified as a
spoiler since the character is only introduced at that point.
The only reason I gave this piece of garbage an extra half star is because of
the performances of the two female leads. They both try valiantly to add
something to this pitiful excuse for a horror movie, and I commend them for
their effort. Do yourself a favor and steer clear of this one. I give it a
measly star and a half.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Title
Review for Terminator 2: Judgment Day (1991)
It's been ten years since the first terminator came from the future and 
tried to kill Sarah Connor (Linda Hamilton), the mother of John Connor 
(Edward Furlong), who will grow up to lead the human resistance against the 
machines. Now, two such machines have come to the past. One, the T-800 
(Arnold Schwarzenegger), has been sent by the resistance to protect young 
John Connor. The other, an advanced prototype called the T-1000 (Robert 
Patrick), has been sent to kill John. At this point in time, John is a 
juvenile delinquent, living with his foster parents (Jenette Goldstein, 
Xander Berkeley), who he can't stand. Sarah Connor is locked in a mental 
institute, under the "care" of Dr. Silberman (Earl Boen). Now that the 
machines have returned, Sarah realizes there may be only one way to defeat 
them once and for all: kill Miles Dyson (Joe Morton), the man directly 
responsible for the creation of the machines; or destroy Skynet, the massive 
computer, now in its infancy, which will one day control the world.
Even now, nine years after its release, the special effects in James 
Cameron's "Terminator 2: Judgement Day" are astounding. In honor of its 
recent re-release on DVD, I've decided to write a review for this classic 
film. This was a film released just at the end of the really special special 
effects era. Back when we could still be dazzled by what was on screen. Now 
it's grown quite impossible to do that. After all, most people weren't 
particularly impressed by the latest "Star Wars" film, and that featured 
some of the most dazzling effects ever. Still, because it was released when 
it was, people will always remember spectacular shots of the T-1000 
reassembling itself after Arnold blasts it into a million pieces, or turning 
into liquid, squeezing through a window, and changing back to human form. 
These are the kind of astounding scenes that, if released today, would be 
viewed as nothing new. Is that a testament to how far we've come, or to how 
much we've come to expect from our movies? End of philosophical moment.
"Terminator 2" is a Schwarzenegger movie, through and through. It hides 
behind a fairly intelligent plot, but when Arnold gets lines like "Hasta la 
vista, baby," you know what kind of movie this is. If you're not a fan of 
Arnold, in all his cheesy glory, stay away from this movie. Otherwise, 
you'll love seeing him in his prime. Robert Patrick gives a remarkably good 
turn as the T-1000, but he's no Arnold (as if you needed to be told that). 
Linda Hamilton plays Sarah Connor more than a little differently this time 
around. In the first film Sarah was obviously confused by what was 
happening. In this one she's so prepared it's almost frightening. She has 
hidden gun caches, training in the use of every weapon imaginable, an 
insanely high tolerance for pain, and a mean streak that would scare 
Hannibal Lecter. Finally, we have newcomer (at the time) Edward Furlong. He 
actually gave a fairly good performance for a first time actor, only 
overdoing it on the emotion every now and then. I'm not sure if this is a 
sign of real acting talent from Furlong, or directorial ability from Cameron 
(back before he sold out to the man and made "Titanic"). Whatever it was, 
I've been sorry to see Furlong wasted on useless movies since his debut 
("Detroit Rock City", anyone?).
I have only one major complaint with "Terminator 2", but it's a doozy. In 
the first "Terminator" film, the story revolved entirely around Sarah Connor 
and Kyle Reese trying to escape the killing machine. There was nothing that 
could stop it, nothing that could slow it down. It just kept coming and 
coming. This filled that movie with a wonderful sense of dread and 
foreboding, as we watched our heroes try in vain to stop their enemy. In 
"Terminator 2", the story shifts drastically. It's no longer about trying to 
escape the terminator, this one is about trying to stop Skynet and change 
the future. Now I know they couldn't make this movie about the exact same 
thing as the first one, but I think if you compare the two the first script 
is superior. That's not to say this one is bad, it's just not as dark, 
twisted, and (frankly) entertaining as its predecessor. Through most 
segments of this movie, all I could think about was wanting the T-1000 to 
come back on screen. I really didn't care about a computer factory being 
destroyed.
Special effects aside, there are a few other really great things about 
"Terminator 2". The action scenes are marvelously shot, both gun fights and 
the hand to hand combats. There are two really well done car chases in the 
film: one involving John Connor on a motorcycle and the T-1000 in a semi; 
the other involving a helicopter and a police van. Both these chase scenes 
do a great job building suspense, and Cameron knows exactly when to call 
them to a halt. The film's score, by composer Brad Fiedel ("True Lies") is 
simply perfect. It uses a lot of the same music he created for the first 
film, but it sounds more metallic and machine like this time around. The 
film does run a long 137 minutes (152 for the director's cut), but the 
action seldom lets up and it shouldn't feel half that long. I'd recommend 
"Terminator 2" to those who enjoyed the first one, and to fans of science 
fiction in general. I wouldn't recommend it to those looking for a movie 
about time travel because Cameron generally ignores all the traditional 
arguments regarding paradoxes and such (rightfully so, I might add). I give 
the movie four out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for What Lies Beneath (2000)
Directed by: Robert Zemeckis
Written by: Sarah Kernochan (story), Clark Gregg
Claire and Norman Spencer (Michelle Pfeiffer and Harrison Ford respectively) 
have just sent there daughter, Caitlin (Katharine Towne), off to college. 
Now Claire is home alone every day while Norman, apparently a brilliant 
geneticist, works on a project which would be the crowning achievement in 
his career. While home alone, Claire begins to notice strange events 
occurring around her, like whispering in an empty room and doors opening 
without being touched (I couldn't help but keep thinking she really needed 
to get that door fixed). The new neighbor, Warren Feur (James Remar, 
previously seen in the beyond merely awful "Mortal Kombat: Annihilation"), 
and his wife, Mary Feur (Miranda Otto), have been fighting every evening; 
now Mary has disappeared. Claire begins to think the strange events are 
actually Mary's ghost trying to contact her so Claire can catch Warren as 
her murderer. Yet, as Claire pursues this belief, events begin to make her 
suspect the ghost is actually someone from her own past, with whom her 
husband may have been involved.
Anyone who has seen the trailers for "What Lies Beneath" knows exactly how 
events transpire after my brief plot summary. When I first sat down to write 
this review I was going to write a mean, scathing review which smashed the 
movie for being predictable. After I pondered this awhile, I decided the 
film's lack of surprises was more the fault of DreamWorks than Robert 
Zemeckis ("Forrest Gump") and company. This brings up an interesting point: 
can a film be blamed for its trailers giving the whole story away? While I 
could sit here and display point after point in defense of and against this 
theory, I'm sure you'd prefer to hear a review of the actual movie. "What 
Lies Beneath" is, at its core, a mess of a film; borrowing from a dozen 
different genres, and stealing outright from Hitchcock (particularly "Rear 
Window") on several occasions. If that's the case, why didn't I rate it 
lower you ask? Simply because if you haven't seen the previews, it's 
probably going to throw quite a few delightful surprises and legitimate 
startles (although I don't know about actual scares) at you.
You would think that any movie starring both Michelle Pfeiffer and Harrison 
Ford would feature some outstanding acting. Strangely enough, the acting in 
"What Lies Beneath" is one of the film's weaker points. Michelle Pfeiffer, 
one of the more gifted actresses in Hollywood, turns in a performance which 
fluctuates back and forth from over-the top antics to looking bored out of 
her mind. Harrison Ford, the man who actually managed to make "Six Days, 
Seven Nights" bearable, turns in his most wooden performance to date. I'm 
beginning to think Ford is just burned out on acting. I think he wants to 
make his last Indiana Jones movie and retire from acting, so he can pursue 
being a carpenter to his heart's content. If that's not the case, and he's 
just losing his acting skills, then I hope he does decide to retire from 
acting so he won't be remembered for roles like the one played here. The 
only other person given any screen time is Diana Scarwid (whose career is 
full of TV movie appearances), playing Claire's best friend, Jody. Jody is a 
very unusual character, being a hippy-like woman obsessed with the occult, 
yet frightened when confronted by the real thing. She also uses words like 
"trippin", which I didn't think even hippyish older people used anymore. 
Scarwid does an adequate job playing Jody, and actually outdoes Pfeiffer in 
a few scenes (just to give you a hint of how below average Pfeiffer's 
performance is in this film).
Perhaps most troublesome about this film (aside from the trailers of course) 
is Robert Zemeckis' normally astute directorial abilities vanishing into 
thin air. This was the man who brought us the magnificent, multiple Oscar 
winning "Forrest Gump"; with its perfect pacing, soundtrack, and acting, and 
he now gives us a film so languid in its pacing I saw people falling asleep 
in the theater. The reason for this is simple: the only "scares" that come 
out of a movie like "What Lies Beneath" are from objects and people suddenly 
appearing on screen, while music blasts out of dead silence, and scenes like 
Harrison Ford sneaking up behind his wife for no other reason than to scare 
her and movie goers (I don't know, but I'd think most wives would smack 
their husbands upside the head for sneaking up on them like that). In a 
movie where these are the only scares, the audience sits and waits anxiously 
for the next startle effect. In "What Lies Beneath", Zemeckis has spread 
these effects out so thinly that one can only wait anxiously for so long 
before not caring anymore. Sarah Kernochan and Clark Gregg don't help much 
when they seem to place the movie's significant events in the wrong order. 
We are granted supposedly startling revelations at certain points in the 
movie when we have no idea what is going on (take Claire finding a box full 
of old things in the basement, for example).
Clark Gregg's script may have one or two really good startle effects, and 
one really creepy looking scene near the film's end, but it's also full of 
horror movie cliches. We get everything from the dog being present only so 
it can sense danger that the humans can't tell is near, to someone looking 
dead multiple times only to keep springing back to life. My second largest 
complaint with the movie was in regards to the ending, which just seems to 
go on and on for a good 45 minutes or so. I don't know about you, but I 
start losing interest in the end of a film once it breaks the twenty five 
minute mark. In "What Lies Beneath" Zemeckis gives us big final climaxes not 
once, not twice, but thrice. By the third one, I was getting more than a 
little bored. The other problem with the ending is that while those classic 
"yeah right" moments are essential to any horror film, "What Lies Beneath" 
uses them perhaps five or six times too many. I felt like I was watching the 
latest "Friday the 13th" film rather than a classy, dramatic scare flick. 
The film's score, by composer Alan Silvestri ("The Abyss"), starts off low 
and eerie, yet sadly underused; then just as it gets loud, dramatic, and 
obnoxious, Zemeckis decides to start using it non-stop. I'd recommend "What 
Lies Beneath" to fans of Hitchcock as long as they can handle seeing the 
master's work stolen several times. I give it three out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Messenger: The Story of Joan of Arc, The (1999)
Luc Besson, possibly best known to American audiences for "The Fifth Element",
has an extraordinary visual imagination. While most audience members didn't
seem to care for the plot of his last film, it can hardly be denied that "The
Fifth Element" looked absolutely gorgeous. Here in "The Messenger" we get more
of these amazing visuals, but the story seems to be struggling to keep up.
Most know the story of Joan of Arc, but I will attempt a brief summary here.
Joan (Milla Jovovich) is a young French girl who witnessed horrors when her
village was destroyed by the invading English. Since then she has believed
herself a messenger of god, capable of freeing France from the English. The
interesting thing is, the people of France believe in her. In order to drive
the English out, she requires an army. She begs the dauphin, Charles VII (John
Malkovich) for one. At the head of this force, she begins an assult upon the
English held city of Rheims. Successful, the French drive the English out and
begin talks for peace. As Joan is unwilling to talk, Charles turns her over to
the English to stand trial.
This film can be divided easily into three parts. The first, and possibly
worst, involves Joan as a young girl discovering who she is (or believes she
is, depending on your point of view). During this, we are treated to grotesque
scenes such as her sister being murdered and then raped (note the order of
these events) by English troops. This third of the film is either quite dull or
disgusting at all times. It only begins to pick up the pace once John Malkovich
appears on screen. Even with a character as underwritten as that of King
Charles, Malkovich is a delight to watch.
The second segment of the movie is by far the most interesting, featuring
Joan's retaking of Rheims. It should be noted here, that Milla Jovovich turns
in a fine performance as a woman who appears insane at times and enlightened at
others.Perhaps what makes this portion of the film so interesting is the
presence of several supporting characters in Joan's army. In particular,
Richard Ridings (perhaps best known for a brief role in Highlander: The Series)
is hilarious as her oafish protector, La Hire. The battle sequences themselves
are intriguingly shot in a quick cutting fashion which conveys the chaos of the
battles, while still showing how the supporting characters fare.
The final sequence, while not nearly as interesting as the second is still
rather interesting, particularly due to the inclusion of Dustin Hoffman as
Joan's conscience. This segment focuses upon Charles's betrayl of Joan to the
English, and her trial at the hands of the English church. Joan's conscience
follows her about as she restlessly paces her cell, and makes everyone question
whether she truly is who she claims to be, or merely a lunatic. Some of these
scenes are truly hilarious, particularly one in which Hoffman offers possible
reasons for why Joan would find a sword lying in a field. Despite this, the
trial itself is quite dull, particularly since we all know how it is going to
end.
Perhaps the largest problem with this film, is the excessively lengthy runtime
of 140 minutes. The film simply runs out of steam after 100, and the first 45
or so seem utterly wasted. I can't quite recommend "The Messenger" in theatres,
but I would recommend you attempt to catch it on video if only for the amazing
visuals and the performances by Jovovich, Malkovich and Hoffman. I give "The
Messenger" three stars.
Feel free to E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
"They say money can't buy happiness? Just look at the smile on my face," Jim
Young (Ben Affleck) tells his new employees in one of the best scenes of
"Boiler Room", the new film from first time writer/director, Ben Younger.
For those of you who are wondering, the film's title refers to the
underbelly of wall street. Boiler rooms are the locations of all sorts of
illegal activity, involving stock brokers ripping off naive customers for
all they're worth. The film itself may start on shaky legs, but once it gets
going, this is a thoroughly enjoyable movie which does an excellent job
showing us how the lust for money can corrupt us all.
Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) is a young entrepreneur who makes his living running
an illegal casino out of his house. His father (Ron Rifkin), a respected
judge, is not at all pleased about this, particularly when he finds out that
his son has left college to pursue this "career". One day Seth's friend,
Adam (Jamie Kennedy), stops by with another man named Greg (Nicky Katt), who
turns out to be a broker for a small firm called J.T. Marlin, where he has
amassed quite a fortune. Greg and Adam soon convince Seth to give the firm a
try. Soon, Seth becomes a rising star in the company, begins dating the
receptionist, Abby (Nia Long), and even makes some semblance of peace with
his father. However, not everything is what it appears to be at J.T. Marlin.
Late night paper shreddings occur, supposedly great stock options don't
appear to exist, and the owners seem to be keeping escape plans in case the
newspapers start asking questions.
One of the things that most surprised me about this film was that Younger
managed to turn what should have been a boring subject into a film which
sometimes reminded me of the brilliance of "Wall Street". Like I said,
"Boiler Room" starts off poorly, with a somewhat boring intro, out of place
rap music, and distracting camera cuts. However, once Seth gets fully
involved with J.T. Marlin, things certainly pick up. The actual trading
scenes are very well done, and perfectly convey the frenzy of the constant
escalating situations. The scenes showing the activities of these men
outside of work are superbly constructed as well. For example, in one scene
the group hangs out at Jim Young's house, watching "Wall Street" itself
while quoting the entire film, word for word.
As for the acting, Giovanni Ribisi ("Saving Private Ryan") is somewhat
miscast. While he does a good job playing a young man who is weak in the
face of his father, it's difficult to believe that he turns into a cutthroat
wall street broker. There's also something cold about his acting during the
more emotional scenes. Nia Long ("The Best Man") is fairly good as Seth's
love interest who is struggling with her conscience, and Ron Rifkin ("LA
Confidential") is quite good as the father who says things like
"Relationship? What relationship? I'm your father, not your girlfriend." Of
the main cast, the two best actors are Nicky Katt ("The Limey"), who is
quite creepy as the twisted Greg, and Van Diesel ("Pitch Black") as Chris,
who is Seth's friend and the only other broker who seems to be a decent
person. Amazingly, the real standout performance here comes from Ben
Affleck. While Affleck appears in only three or four scenes, two of them
involve him giving amazingly stirring speeches with a talent I didn't
believe he possessed.
The only other fault I can think of is the film's ending. While Hollywood
writers may not have run out of original ideas afterall, they've certainly
forgotten how to end a film. "Boiler Room" is yet another one of those
films, like "Eye of the Beholder", which simply stops rather than ending.
We're left with dozens of unanswered questions and the feeling that Younger
simply ran out of ideas. "Boiler Room" runs a bit too long at two hours, and
I personally would have cut out the first fifteen minutes or so. I'd
recommend it to fans of the film, "Wall Street", and to anyone who has even
a passing interest in the stock market. I give it a well earned three and a
half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
Ray Winkler (Woody Allen) is an ex-con who now works a menial job and 
dreams of a better life. His latest lame-brain idea is to rent space in 
a store across from a bank and tunnel under the street into the bank's 
vault. Ray brings three friends, Denny (Michael Rapaport), Tommy (Tony 
Darrow), and Benny (Jon Lovitz), into his scheme to help him dig the 
tunnel. His wife, Frenchy (Tracey Ullman), and her brain dead cousin, 
May (Elaine May), work a cookie shop in the space they have rented to 
hide Ray's activities. The plan doesn't work quite the way Ray intended. 
In fact, it doesn't work at all. The group has been so busy tunnelling 
they haven't noticed what a hit Frenchy's cookies are, and they decide 
to turn the little store into a huge franchise. Ray and Frenchy are now 
rich beyond their wildest dreams, but it affects them in two very 
different ways. Ray somehow turns into even more of a slob, wanting 
nothing to do with a rich lifestyle. Frenchy has become so completely 
infatuated with her new way of life that she hires an art dealer, named 
David (Hugh Grant), to teach her how to act like her new wealthy 
friends. Soon Ray and Frenchy are drifting down very different paths, 
and Frenchy starts to think she may have outgrown Ray.
Let me start by saying that I have never cared for Woody Allen's films, 
thus my opinion of this movie may be a tad biased. I've never understood 
Allen's humor - like when Frenchy says something sarcastic to Ray, and 
he responds with "I'm this close to popping ya Frenchy, just one more 
word." It wasn't funny back when Jackie Gleason said something similar, 
and it's somehow even less funny when Allen says it now. The only funny 
thing about it is that I think Tracey Ullman could probably beat Allen 
up. I will say this, "Small Time Crooks" actually starts off rather 
funny, with Ullman given a few amusing, witty comebacks to some of 
Allen's dumber statements. In fact, the first third or so of the film is 
really quite funny. Watching the four bumbling criminals try to carry 
out their plan is uproariously funny at times, especially when they 
break a pipe in the wall and flood the entire store. Unfortunately, once 
they make their fortunes, and the whole rags-to-riches story takes over, 
all the humor is sapped out of the movie. I suppose Allen was trying to 
show the benefits of a simple life compared to an extravagant one; but 
if that's the case, he failed miserably. Both lifestyles looked pretty 
horrendous.
Woody Allen has always seemed to be one of the more irritating actors in 
Hollywood. I think his stuttering over every word and bumbling around 
like a buffoon is supposed to be funny, but here's the fact of the 
matter: Woody Allen is too smart to play a stupid character. I've seen 
him in interviews, and the man is too intelligent to convincingly play a 
bumbling idiot. This may be why he has surrounded himself by characters 
even dumber than Ray. Michael Rapaport ("True Romance") is notorious for 
playing brainless characters, and he plays more of the same here. Jon 
Lovitz ("Trapped in Paradise") is infamous for playing irritating 
characters, and Benny probably would have been fairly annoying if given 
more screen time. Actually, nearly the entire supporting cast is stupid 
(I mean that in an unfunny way), irritating, or both. The only 
exceptions are Tracey Ullman, in the film's first half, and Elaine May 
(you remember, she wrote and directed "Ishtar" way back when) as the 
hilariously dense May. If it hadn't been for Elaine May's presence, I 
probably would have rated this film quite a bit lower. She is so 
likeable and naive that she can't help but make the movie at least 
somewhat enjoyable. Last, we have Hugh Grant ("Mickey Blue Eyes"), who 
serves no purpose and seems to realize this judging by the performance 
he gives.
The thing which most bothered me about "Small Time Crooks" was that 
Allen leaves a dozen or so loose ends. Characters vanish half way 
through the film and are never heard from again; romantic angles arise 
but are never dealt with; and the ending doesn't tie things up quite the 
way I would have liked. There are numerous other faults, though they are 
fairly minor. There isn't much of a soundtrack; some of the scenes feel 
rushed (the first dinner party and the aftermath of the cookie company 
being created), while others seem to drag on forever (any scene with 
Hugh Grant); and the comic pacing is non-existent at the film's 
midpoint. The film's high points are Elaine May, Ullman's occasional 
smart-alec comments, and the attempted bank robbery. "Small Time Crooks" 
does run an admirable 94 minutes at a time when films running less than 
two hours are becoming a rare breed. Fans of the old Woody Allen films 
will probably enjoy it because he's back to his screw-ball antics rather 
than the dramatic pictures of the last few years. If, like me, you don't 
care for Allen's brand of humor, I'd suggest you skip this one. I give 
it three out of five stars.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to: 
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at: http://www.dependentfilms.net,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public3Dyes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
Think back to the year 1981, when one of the raunchiest comedies of
all time hit theaters. That comedy was, of course, Bob Clark's now
infamous "Porky's". I'd actually recommend that anyone who loved
"American Pie" go back and catch "Porky's" to see how a comedy like
this can be made even more amusing. I suppose the biggest difference
between these two sex comedies is that "American Pie" is basically a
safe film. It may not seem this way at first glance, but relative
newcomer Paul Weitz does not make his film as raunchy as it could have
been. He even tries to stick some moral messages in near the end of
the movie. Bob Clark, on the other hand, took no prisoners with his
film. "Porky's" is as obscene as possible with an R rating. By playing
it safe, Paul Weitz and Adam Herz have managed to sap a lot of
potential humor out of their film.
Four high school friends have just made a pact to lose their virginity
before graduation. Jim (Jason Biggs) is willing to try just about
anything, with any girl, to fulfill his obligation. His latest plan is
to bed the exchange student, Nadia (Shannon Elizabeth). If that plan
fails, his backup is the school's nerdy band member, Michelle (Alyson
Hannigan). Kevin (Thomas Ian Nichols) is trying to get his long time
girlfriend, Vicky (Tara Reid), to finally sleep with him. However,
this will involve him saying the three most dreaded words he can think
of. Oz (Chris Klein), a rugby player, has decided to take the
sensitive approach by joining the school choir to gain the affections
of Heather (Mena Suvari). Last we have Paul Finch (Eddie Kaye Thomas),
who is so stuck up that he won't even go to the bathroom in the
school's facilities. His plan is to start rumors about how great he is
in bed so that every girl in the school will be crawling all over
him. The friends' put their plans into motion, but time is running
out, and it looks like everything is going to come down to prom night.
Despite what you may have heard, "American Pie" is not a very
offensive movie. I'm not saying it doesn't have its cringe worthy
moments (like a scene where something which shouldn't be drunk is
placed in a cup of beer), but the movie is far too good natured to
seriously offend anyone. This is too bad because "American Pie" had
the potential to be one of the funniest movies of the past few
years. For example, a scene in which Jason Biggs and Alyson Hannigan
get together starts off uproariously funny, but it is cut short before
reaching its full comic capacity. This happens in an unfortunate
number of scenes. The big laughs are promised, and are nearly brought
to the screen, before Weitz chickens out and alters the course of the
film towards safer ground.
"American Pie" is the sort of movie used to showcase young
talent. Half the cast members will never move on to greater things,
while the other half will be in important, dramatic films a few years
from now. Mena Suvari has obviously already begun her transition by
appearing in the excellent "American Beauty". Even with a script as
shallow as this one, Suvari already displays some amazing emotional
range considering her age and experience.  Alyson Hannigan, who is
already famous for playing the cutsey Willow on television's "Buffy:
The Vampire Slayer", gives a hilarious performance in what is really a
very small part. While the remaining cast members give adequate
performances, the only other standouts are newcomer Jason Biggs and
Eugene Levy ("Multiplicity"), as Jim's dad. Levy's character is one of
the few who grants us some real belly laughs by awkwardly trying to
help his son understand the birds and the bees - so to speak.
Actually, the lack of any big laughs is one of my biggest problems
with "American Pie". There are some movies which contain very few big
laughs, but cause you to chuckle the whole way through, like 1998's
sadly underrated "Rushmore". "American Pie" may have a few chuckles
but not enough to sustain the movie through its 95 minute running
time. I'm sure "American Pie" will be a huge hit with teenagers who
are too young to remember "Porky's" and too old to settle for typical
teen fare. I know, it has an R rating, but I'm not naive enough to
believe that every highschool student in America isn't going to see
this movie. I'd recommend "American Pie" to those desperate for a new,
raunchy comedy since Hollywood hasn't put one out in quite some
time. I give the movie three out of five stars.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to:
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Screwed (2000)
Directed by: Scott Alexander, Larry Karaszewski
Written by: Scott Alexander, Larry Karaszewski
Willard Fillmore (Norm Macdonald) is chauffeur to an evil old hag,
Virginia Crock (Elaine Stritch). Actually, his job title may be
chauffeur, but his actual duties consist of doing just about
everything from scrubbing Crock's dentures to feeding her dog,
Muffin. After Crock gives him a pie for Christmas, rather than the new
suit he so desperately needs, Willard hatches a plan with his friend,
Rusty (Dave Chappelle), to kidnap Muffin and ransom him back to Miss
Crock. The plan, of course, backfires and a new plan must be
hatched. This one consists of Willard himself being ransomed. Rusty
and Willard decide to fake Willard's death by having a mortician,
Grover Cleaver (Danny DeVito), fix up a corpse to look like
him. Everything manages to go wrong with every plan the trio think up,
and the situation grows worse and worse.
Danny DeVito seems to be developing an interesting and slightly
worrisome habit with his script choices. His last two pictures have
had three things in common. Both involved evil, universally hated old
women; some sort of cheesy, tacked on mystery; and a horrible, poorly
written script. This is a shame considering what a talented actor
DeVito is. "Screwed" is a weak, often painfully forced and unfunny
film which will most likely vanish from theaters in a month. The movie
starts off with no humor except Macdonald ("Dirty Work") doing a
somewhat amusing impersonation of Bruce Campbell's Ash from "Evil Dead
II". This lack of humor lasts for about 45 minutes, and the movie then
begins to show some signs of life, with one or two truly funny
scenes. Unfortunately, this doesn't last, and the film ends horribly.
Let's get one thing straight everyone. Norm Macdonald cannot act in
any way.  The man stumbles through his lines with the same poker face
and dreary, boring voice throughout all his films. His lack of emotion
can be somewhat amusing in stand up comic sketches on Saturday Night
Live, but it doesn't translate well into movies. Dave Chappelle can be
one of two things in his movies: irritating or very irritating. In
Martin Lawrence's "Blue Streak" he was irritating. In "Screwed" he is
very irritating. The man has the most annoying, whiny tone of voice
you're likely to hear. DeVito does what he can with his miserable
role, but you can't pull something out of nothing. I think the
character of Grover Cleaver was supposed to be some sort of mad
scientist who was funny because of all the disgusting things he did -
like play harmonicas pulled out of dead people. However, Cleaver is
disgusting in a very unfunny way.
There are few things worse than a movie which tries far too hard to be
funny. Comic films are at their best when they aren't trying as hard
as possible to be humorous. On the rare occasions that "Screwed"
manages to pull a chuckle out of its audience, it drags the scene on
well past the point where it is welcome. For example, when Muffin
jumps out the back of Rusty's van while he and Willard are driving
(that's funny, right?), the camera stays focused for several minutes
on the two in the front seat, joking about taking the dog. "Screwed"
only runs 90 minutes, but it's a long hour and a half. I'd recommend
it to people who, for some reason, like Norm Macdonald movies, but to
no one else. I'm giving the movie two and a half out of five stars out
of respect for Danny DeVito, and because there are a few funny scenes
at about the mid point that almost give the film some saving
grace. Almost.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to:
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Big Momma's House (2000)
Malcolm Turner (Martin Lawrence) is an FBI agent who takes his work a 
little too seriously. He will dress in any disguise, no matter how 
ridiculous or embarassing to catch a culprit. His latest assignment 
involves both he and his partner, John (Paul Giamatti), going down south 
to stake out the home of massive elderly woman Big Momma (Ella 
Mitchell). They're trying to catch Big Momma's grand-daughter, Sherry 
(Nia Long), who they think was involved in a bank robbery several years 
ago. Sherry worked at a bank which her boyfriend robbed, and the money 
was never recovered. Unfortunately Big Momma has been called away to see 
a sick friend, and she won't be home when Sherry arrives. Seeing his 
chance to catch Sherry slipping away, Malcolm decides to try his most 
embarassing disguise yet, playing Big Momma. This involves him dealing 
with such tasks as acting as the neighborhood midwife; dealing with a 
sadistic karate instructor (Anthony Anderson); trying to live up to the 
expectations of Sherry's son, Trent (Jascha Washington); and fending off 
the very unwelcome advances of an admiring suitor (Carl Wright).
I often hear Martin Lawrence called a poor man's Eddie Murphy. I've 
never agreed with this because the two actors have very different acting 
styles. Murphy is a bit more quiet and a lot more vulgar. Lawrence is 
often hilariously over the top, and he is great at playing a fish out of 
water type character; but he's obviously not as good an actor as Murphy. 
What Lawrence lacks in serious acting talent he usually makes up for in 
energy ("Blue Streak", "Nothing to Lose") or originality ("Life"). Such 
is not the case with his latest outing, "Big Momma's House", which 
destroys the validity of my arguments for Lawrence having a style of his 
own. This movie is nothing more than a blatant rip off of Murphy's 
similar role in "The Nutty Professor". However, all the pent up energy 
that usually makes Lawrence so entertaining is strangely absent. 
Instead, we get Lawrence looking very bored under a ton of makeup, using 
a scratchy, high-pitched voice that somehow sounds worse than 
fingernails on a chalk board. The saddest part of all this is that 
despite the tons of makeup they have piled on poor Martin, I could never 
believe he was an elderly, overweight woman.
In a movie where the star appears bored with the proceedings, it's left 
to the supporting cast to hold the show up. Thankfully the supporting 
actors in "Big Momma's House" do a fairly good job. Nia Long ("Held 
Up"), in particular, does an admirable job as the only straight 
character in a movie filled with bizarre types. Paul Giammati ("The 
Negotiator"), who usually plays a little weenie of a character, actually 
plays a fairly competent one here; even more shocking is that he does it 
pretty well. The most entertaining character would have to be Anthony 
Anderson's ("Romeo Must Die") hilariously incompetent security guard. 
Anderson was one of the best things about Jet Li's "Romeo Must Die", and 
if he keeps playing his characters like he does here, he'll have quite a 
comic future ahead of him. The funniest scene with Anderson involves his 
teaching a karate class to a group of old ladies and being taught a 
thing or two himself by Malcolm, as Big Momma. Unfortunately, comical 
scenes like this one are few and far between. The funniest scenes are 
Nia's initial meeting with Malcolm as Big Momma, Malcolm trying to help 
deliver a baby, and one where Nia goes to sleep in Big Momma's bed.
One of the worst things about "Big Momma's House" is its use of 
gross-out jokes. There is one scene (and you'll know it when you get 
there) that almost had me running out of the theater, ready to lose my 
lunch. Of course, I've never been a big fan of gross out gags like some 
people are. If you find the sight of something utterly repugnant to be 
amusing for some reason, maybe you'll enjoy the film for that reason. 
Another major fault with Darryl Quarles' script is that several things 
are never explained. For example, when Nia first shows up at her 
grandmother's house, she's convinced that Big Momma is going to be angry 
at her and they haven't spoken in some time, but we never find out why. 
Nia also carries around a cross which seems to hold some signifigance to 
both her and her grandmother, but this significance is never explained. 
The romantic subplot between Malcolm (when he's out of his Big Momma 
garb) and Nia feels about as rushed and tacked on as is humanly 
possible. Last, we have the grating soundtrack. If you don't know what 
kind of music is in a Martin Lawrence movie, you've been living in a 
cave for the past couple of years. I'm not sure if I'd recommend this 
movie to Martin Lawrence fans, because they might lose what little 
respect they have for him after seeing it (I know I did). "Big Momma's 
House" runs a decent 98 minutes, though most of this run time is 
pointless fluff. I give it three out of five stars.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to: 
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at: http://www.dependentfilms.net,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public3Dyes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem

Title
Review for Swimming with Sharks (1994)
Guy (Frank Whaley) is an aspiring writer who just landed the job of his 
dreams. He's going to be working for one of the biggest executives in 
show-biz, Buddy Ackerman (Kevin Spacey). As Buddy's personal assistant, Guy 
will have the opportunity to go on to bigger and better things in time, as 
all of Buddy's previous assistants have done (one is directing all the 
Macaulay Culkin action pictures). Yep, Guy is certain that all his dreams 
are about to come true. Too bad for him, he's actually gone to hell. Buddy 
turns out to be the most evil, vicious boss ever to walk the planet, and 
Guy's life quickly becomes like that stuff you find underneath your toe 
nails. The only thing he has left is his relationship with Dawn Lockhart 
(Michelle Forbes), a producer who often works with Buddy. Then, after a year 
of dealing with Buddy's demands, something finally causes Guy to snap. One 
evening he enters Buddy's home, takes Buddy's gun from its secret hiding 
place, ties him up, and proceeds to make him pay for every insult and 
offense of the past year.
Make no mistake, "Swimming With Sharks" is one vicious little movie. It's 
the kind of film designed only for those people who like their humor black 
and bitter. If you're going in expecting a cute little story about a young 
guy trying to make it in Hollywood, you're in for quite a surprise. You have 
to not only be able to handle people acting in an appallingly base manner, 
but you have to be able to find it funny. If you can't do that, avoid this 
film like you'd avoid "Home Alone 4" (knock on wood that that never comes to 
be). Here's a quick quiz to see whether or not you'd enjoy the movie. Number 
one, do you find a man getting pencils, file folders, pens, and paper clips 
thrown at him while his boss mocks him to be funny? Two, do you find the 
thought of a man getting reemed by his boss for not knowing the difference 
between Sweet-N-Low and Equal funny? Three, do you find the thought of a man 
being tortured in various ingenious ways by his assistant to be repulsive? 
If you answered no to either of the first two questions, you might want to 
consider giving this one a miss. If you answered yes to the last question, 
definitely give this one a miss and go rent the latest Meg Ryan / Tom Hanks 
romantic comedy.
A lot of what makes the film so funny is the excellent cast. What makes this 
feat even more amazing is that the film is carried by only three actors. 
First up we have Frank Whaley ("Pulp Fiction"), playing a guy who bounces 
back and forth from being sympathetic, to being flat-out annoying. Whaley 
does an excellent job never letting the character fall too far into either 
of these categories. Whenever Guy gets to be too much of a schmuck, he gets 
reigned in to the point where we start disliking him as much as we dislike 
Buddy (okay, maybe not that much). Next up is Michelle Forbes (Ensign Ro 
from Star Trek: The Next Generation), playing a woman who is good at giving 
orders, but doesn't seem to know what she really wants. I found it rather 
amusing that she asks Guy that question at one point, but we get the 
impression throughout the film that she isn't too sure what she's looking 
for either, bouncing from one man to another. Forbes does give a good 
performance, but she isn't given quite enough screen time. Last is Kevin 
Spacey ("American Beauty"), and were the film pure garbage, his performance 
alone would make it worth seeing. Never before have I seen a man walk the 
fine line between overacting and playing a character as a true monster so 
nimbly. He doesn't falter once, and I'll say just this. While his first 
Oscar may say it's for "The Usual Suspects", I can't help but think the 
Academy members were really thinking of his performance here. Benicio Del 
Toro ("The Usual Suspects") also makes a brief, but excellent, appearance as 
Buddy's former assistant.
An interesting thing happened to me while watching "Swimming With Sharks" 
for the first time. When the film first started I was laughing like an idiot 
every few minutes. Yet as it progressed, I laughed less and less. By the 
time the final third of the film hit I realized I wasn't laughing at all, 
and hadn't been for awhile now. Does the movie run out of laughs? Well, in a 
way, yes. However, I don't think that really does justice to what happened. 
Instead, the film slowly changes into something else entirely. What starts 
off as a string of brilliant comic moments changes into a more involving 
story about how cutthroat Hollywood really is. This is the debut film of 
George Huang, who actually worked as an assistant for a major Hollywood 
producer. Word has it he actually went through some of the horrors captured 
here, and it's no surprise that his script is tinged with just a touch of 
bitterness. For a first time writer/director, Huang proves remarkably adept 
behind the camera. His direction is astute, and his script has just the 
right blend of comedy and shocks.
While the flashbacks to Guy's life as an assistant are certainly funny, the 
real brilliance of the film is in the torture scenes. No, I don't mean the 
torture itself is brilliant (although it is quite imaginative), I mean the 
dialogue between Guy and Buddy is brilliant. Watching Buddy slowly turn the 
tables on Guy is astonishing because it's actually believable. Buddy is just 
the sort of man who could torture his torturer by pointing out his flaws. 
Guy, on the other hand, is just the sort of man who would be devastated by 
these flaws being made clear to him. The finale to this little exchange 
first struck me as contrived, but after watching it for a second time I 
realized it made perfect sense. I won't say how it all ends here of course, 
but if you watch the film, do one thing; before you brush the end off as I 
did, really think about what each characters says, and you'll notice a 
wonderfully hidden double meaning to everything being said. One final thing 
I want to note is the soundtrack. It really features only one instrumental 
piece by composer Tom Hiel being played over and over during key scenes. 
It's a great piece, but I wish Hiel had written more so I could get a 
soundtrack. "Swimming With Sharks" runs a decent 101 minutes. I'd recommend 
it to fans of Kevin Spacey and to those who love their comedy black as 
pitch. I give it four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Gun Shy (2000)
If there's one thing Sandra Bullock desperately needs, it's a decent script to
get her career restarted. After a series of flops ("Speed 2", "Forces of
Nature"), she needs a good script with a good costar. Well, "Gun Shy" is a
rather entertaining script, and she has the always great Liam Neeson as her
costar, but there are two serious problems: First, the film was released at
what could be the worst possible time, the same weekend as "Scream 3. Second,
Sandra Bullock appears in perhaps six scenes throughout the film. Everyone
finished gasping in disbelief? That's right folks, despite what the previews
may have led you to believe, "Gun Shy" is hardly a romantic comedy because
there is seldom a female presence. The thing is, the film might be better as a
result.
Charlie Mayough (Liam Neeson) is an undercover DEA officer who is on his last
assignment before retirement. The problem is, he can't bring himself complete
the assignment unless he constantly attends group therapy to keep his nerves
under control. Charlie's final assignment involves catching illegal funds on a
group of mafia types, led by the uptight Fulvio (Oliver Platt). As a result of
Charlie's nerves, he's having another problem, which involves his, uh, bowles.
Well, he visits a proctologist named Jane (Sandra Bullock), who promises she
can fix all his anxiety problems in two weeks by dating him. 
It's not very often that a romantic subplot feels quite so tacked on as it does
here. Bullock's character serves absolutely no purpose, other than to give
Charlie occasional words of encouragment and to solve his prostatic
difficulties. In fact, if her character had been eliminated entirely and more
of the film had focused on Oliver Platt and his cohorts, this probably would
have been a much better film. Speaking of Oliver Platt, he is a riot as a hit
man who hates being made up entirely of cliches. The truth is, Oliver Platt
makes this movie. Liam Neeson may be a great actor, but he isn't given much to
work with here. Platt, on the other hand, is given some truly great scenes. For
example, near the start of the film, Platt is seated across from a neighbor,
telling him that in the Middle East they chop the hands off thieves. He then
prepares to do this to the neighbor for reasons we're not quite sure of, but
it's hysterical when we find out.
Charlie's sessions with his therapy group are fairly amusing, particularly when
he runs into one of them while on assignment. Unfortunately, any other time
when Oliver Platt is not on screen, things tend to drag some. We're also
introduced to someone that may possibly be the most irritating character I've
seen in years. Jason (I believe played by Andrew Lauer) is a big time
wallstreet dealer, who shows up to invest the gangsters' money. He is about
five foot ten, has an obnoxious, high pitched voice, and laughs insanely at
everything. After seeing him on screen for about ten minutes, I really wanted
to kill this character with my bare hands. I was tempted to knock a half star
off my rating simply because he was present. The other supporting characters,
while certainly eccentric, are more amusing than annoying. Watch for an
appearance by Mitch Pileggi, of X-Files fame, as Charlie's boss. The funny
thing is, it's almost the exact same character he plays in "The X-Files".
One last thing I must note is that I had a very hard time imagining a beautiful
proctologist going out with one of her patients right after attending to him. I
had an even harder time believing that Charlie could have made it through the
first date without constantly thinking about everything she had seen. "Gun Shy"
is obviously not an incredible comedy. It is, however, an amusing, harmless
little comedy that has has a lot of chuckles and a few true belly laughs. The
film may only run 100 minutes, but things do tend to drag a bit by the end,
which is drawn out well past what is needed. I'd recommend the film to fans of
Liam Neeson and Oliver Platt, but not to fans of Sandra Bullock, since there
isn't much of her in it. I give it three and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Supernova (2000)
Directed by: Walter Hill
Written by: William Malone (story), Daniel Chuba
It's never a good sign when a director won't allow his name to be shown in a
film's credits. Director Walter Hill has used his pseudonym, Thomas Lee, here,
which set warning bells off for me before ever reaching the movie. The fact
that the script has been worked on by numerous different writers and that MGM
didn't allow for an advance screening to critics, further went to show what a
dog they had on their hands here. As a result, I went in expecting a godawful
film. Sure enough, what I got was a piece of garbage. A rather nice looking
one, but still trash through and through.
The deep space medical ship, Nightingale, has just picked up a distress signal
from an abandoned mining colony. The crew is led by Nick Vanzant (James Spader)
after the former captain, A. J. Marley (Robert Forster), is killed in the first
fifteen minutes. The medical staff is comprised of Kaela Evers (Angela
Bassett), Yerzy Peneloza (Lou Diamond Phillips), Danika Lund (Robin Tunney) and
Benj Stotomajor (Wilson Cruz). Upon reaching the colony, the crew finds one
man, Troy Larson (Peter Facinelli), who is in posession of an alien object he
found at the site and whose father had a fling with Kaela. It soon appears that
Troy has been influenced in some way by the artifact, and he is now after the
crew. Meanwhile, an accident has caused the ship to run out of fuel, and they
are slowly being sucked into a nearby star.
If my plot summary sounds rather insipid, that's because the film itself is so
utterly ludicrous. We know everything that is going to happen well before it
happens: who's going to die, who's going to live, and even how they're going to
die in most cases. After a dull, plodding start, which I suppose was present to
develop the characters (it failed miserably), the film leaps into overdrive and
doesn't let up; this includes the camera bouncing all over the place (i.e. "The
Blair Witch Project"). As for the acting, very little is required. Besides
Spader and Bassett, the crew members are required to scream a lot and run
around. Spader is rather humorous at times, particularly when speaking with the
ship's computer in a few surprisingly amusing scenes.
The film is certainly rubbish, but it's refuse that is pleasing to the eye. The
ship itself is an interesting design, looking something like the Nostromo from
"Alien" crossed with a modern space shuttle. The moon on which the mining camp
is located looks wonderful during several scenes; especially those in which
Spader walks along a massive tunnel and we are granted a view of the entire
camp with the blue star in the background. The alien artifact is oddly
designed, with waves of energy constantly pulsating from it and distorting all
objects nearby. As for the film's ending (which I normally wouldn't mention but
I feel obliged to here), it never exactly ends. The film simply stops, leaving
us with several small unanswered questions and one huge one. The nice thing is,
you won't care in the slightest after leaving the theatre.
Robin Tunney (End of Days) is quickly approaching being one of my least
favorite actors. The girl may be attractive, but she obviously cannot act her
way out of a paper bag. Her part here requires a slight acting job, and she
still fails to deliver an adequate performance (not that her dialogue was any
help). "Supernova" may be rated PG-13, but it sure pushes that rating to
extremes. The film is full of nudity, violence and sex. It just screams for an
R rating, but all the scenes are cut just around it so you seldom fully see
anything. The movie runs 125 minutes which could easily have been hacked down
to 95 or so. I'd recommend missing this one and grant it two stars.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Urban Legends: Final Cut (2000)
Directed by: John Ottman
Written by: Silvio Horta, Paul Harris Boardman, Scott Derrickson
The events of the first "Urban Legends" film have become urban legends 
themselves. The only person still hanging around to talk about them is the 
security guard, Reese (Loretta Devine). She's now at a different school, but 
the same thing seems to be happening again. This time, film student Amy 
Mayfield (Jennifer Morrison) is making a movie about the killer from the 
first movie. Professor Solomon (Hart Bochner) encourages her to proceed, as 
does her friend and fellow student film director, Travis Stark (Matthew 
Davis). So, gathering a crew of film students, she sets about making her 
movie. There's just one problem, a real serial killer has started wiping out 
her cast. Amy's theory is that it's another film student who is seeking to 
kill all competition for the much coveted Alfred Hitchcock award. The award 
includes a large sum of cash, and a chance to direct a real motion picture 
in Hollywood. Now Amy and her friends have to find out who the killer is 
before she runs out of crew members. Could it be Graham (Joey Lawrence), the 
student making another slasher movie? Or how about Toby (Anson Mount), the 
slightly off kilter sound guy. Of course, the real mystery is to find out if 
anyone really cares.
Hah! Sorry, that just slipped out. Truth be told, I couldn't help but laugh 
at this stupid movie. I think I would have lost my mind if I hadn't. "Urban 
Legends: Final Cut" is such a ridiculously stupid movie you'll probably 
spend half your time staring blankly at the screen, shocked that this thing 
ever got the green light. I personally stumbled out of the theater searching 
vainly for something strong to drink. "ULFC" will appeal to one group, those 
who love mindless, cookie-cutter teen slasher movies. All the rest of us 
will react with varying degrees of disgust. At first I was actually willing 
to brush the film off with a two star rating for being yet another stupid, 
harmless slasher movie. Then it did something flat out insulting. The 
writers had the gall to talk about Hitchcock in this film. They dared to 
compare this piece of garbage to the master in any way? I think that's 
punishable by death in some states (or if it isn't, it certainly should be). 
I can picture the master right now, rolling in his grave at the thought of 
his name being thrown about in some cheesy teen movie. It's enough to make 
on violently ill.
The cast in "ULFC" is full of your traditional teen movie stars. You know 
the type, people who are nice to look at but don't have anything even 
remotely resembling talent. First up is Jennifer Morrison ("Stir of 
Echoes"). Comely? Yes. Talented? Far from it. She seems to have been 
educated at the Jennifer Lopez school for acting, where students are taught 
that talking softly makes you appear to have acting skills. Next we've got 
Matthew Davis, making his first (and hopefully last) appearance in a feature 
film. I think Matthew was educated at the Freddie Prinze school for acting. 
There they teach students to say little, but occasionally smile slightly at 
the camera so all the girls in the audience can swoon. He should get a 
refund, because I didn't hear any girls swooning. The talented Anthony 
Anderson ("Me, Myself, and Irene") makes an appearance as the school's film 
geek, but he has hardly any screen time. He does get one of the film's few 
truly funny scenes however. The remaining actors fall into the "don't care 
who they are or what they've done" category, with the exception of Jessica 
Cauffiel (last seen destroying her boyfriend's car in "Road Trip"). Jessica 
does a great job playing a girl who can't act. Take that in whatever context 
you'd like.
Much as I'd like to blame John Ottman for this movie I can't. Why do I want 
to blame him? Well, I'm more than a little irritated with him for giving up 
composing (he composed the great theme to the equally great "The Usual 
Suspects") so he could direct a movie like this. No, all the blame can rest 
firmly on the shoulders of the film's three writers (another bad movie with 
multiple writers. What is this?). This script is so insipidly stupid it 
doesn't deserve to be analyzed, but I'm going to anyway. First of all, the 
title makes no sense. Granted, the characters are making a movie about the 
first "Urban Legends" film, but the killer doesn't kill based on urban 
legends (except for the first victim, but that was the movie's only somewhat 
interesting scene). Second, the mystery element is terrible. It's  painfully 
obvious who the killer is. I won't say here of course, but if you don't 
figure it out you must have been asleep (not that I can blame you for that. 
Wish I'd fallen asleep). Third, the movie is more predictable than - than - 
I can't even think of a comparison. You know exactly who is going to die 
from the first ten minutes of the movie. Finally, the script borrows from 
everything. From "The Blair Witch Project", from ever slasher film ever 
made, even from "The Usual Suspects" (at least there was a scene that had a 
Usual Suspects feel to it).
Okay, now that I've ground another movie into the dirt and spit on it, I 
guess I should make note of the film's good points (this won't take long). 
There is one good gore scene for all the gore lovers out there. Anthony 
Anderson does have a few funny moments. That about does it. One thing that 
really shocked me was that we had a serial killer dressed in fencing garb 
(or at least the mask) and we didn't get one "En Garde" or "Touche". That 
just shows lack of ability on the parts of the writers (Hah! as though 
everything else didn't). The film's score is decent enough, and big 
surprise, it's by John Ottman. "Urban Legends: Final Cut" runs 100 minutes, 
which is about an hour and a half too long. At one point the characters say 
that the question was asked, "Is film more important than life?" Whoever 
asked that obviously never saw this movie. I recommend "ULFC" to those 
strange people who love cliche ridden, predictable teen slasher movies, but 
to no one else. I give the film one and a half out of five stars. Oh! Before 
I forget, the film does contain one legitimate scare: it leaves itself open 
for a sequel. Be afraid, be very afraid.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
Unusually high expectations are the bane of movie makers everywhere. They
nearly succeeded in killing the new Star Wars film, they caused people to
expect "The Mummy" to belong to a different genre, and they will most likely do
a good job of killing Kevin Smith's latest outing, "Dogma". I must admit, I am
guilty of having my expectations up a little too high, mainly because I so
vastly enjoyed Smith's previous outings. So it is entirely possible that my
review of this film is a tad biased.
Loki (Matt Damon) and Bartleby (Ben Affleck) are two angels who have been
banished from heaven. However, they have just found a loophole in Catholic law
which will permit their return to paradise. The catch is, if they succeed, all
existence will be wiped out because God will have been shown to be fallible.
The universe's only hope lies in the hands of Christ's descendent, Bethany
(Linda Fiorentino). Bethany will be assisted by two prophets named Jay and
Silent Bob (Jason Mewes and Kevin Smith), and the 13th apostle, Rufus (Chris
Rock). Working against them are the demon Azrael (Jason Lee), three kids with
hockey sticks (dont ask), and the pair of angles themselves.
If there is one thing that Kevin Smith will be known for (other than for
playing the hilarious Silent Bob), it is his ability to write witty dialogue.
While "Dogma" certainly has its moments of wonderful dialogue, it is marred by
long spans of rather dull talk regarding the nature of religion. The comic
dialogue here is at its best when coming from Jason Mewes, who plays the
recurring character from Smith's previous three films and from Alan Rickman as
the voice of god, Metatron.
The cast here is really quite good. Ben Affleck and Matt Damon appear to be
having a tremendous amount of fun with their roles, Chris Rock is amusing as
the bitter, forgotten apostle, and Salma Hayek is delightful, as always, in a
turn as the muse, Serendipity. In fact, the only person who seems out of place
here is Linda Fiorentino. While normally a competent actress, she never seems
particularly comfortable with her role here and delivers her lines in a
particularly bored fashion.
While the film has been vastly criticized for its assaults on religion, I found
them to be nothing more than playful jabs at those who are too set in their
ways. The problem with this movie isn't its religious content, it's the fact
that the jokes here are few and far between. Smith seems more concerned with
trying to convey a moral message about understanding and the true meaning of
religion than he does with making the film comical. While the message is all
well and good, it isn't why most audiences are going to this film.
"Dogma" runs far too long at 130 minutes. In fact, I found myself drifting off
several times during this exessively lengthy film. Due to this and the lack of
humor, I'm forced to give "Dogma" two and a half stars and a recommendation to
wait for video if you're really wanting to see it
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Adventures of Rocky & Bullwinkle, The (2000)
THE ADVENTURES OF ROCKY AND BULLWINKLE
Directed by: Des Mcanuff
Written by: Ken Lonergan, Jay Ward (characters)
All right, I'm going to keep this plot summary pretty short because frankly 
there wasn't much of a plot to summarize. I guess that was the one part of 
the movie that was true to the television show. It's the new millenium, and 
Rocky and Bullwinkle are still trapped in reruns after 35 years, lamenting 
the loss of their forest. Meanwhile, Fearless Leader (Robert De Niro), Boris 
(Jason Alexander), and Natasha (Rene Russo) have escaped into the real world 
by signing a contract for a film deal. The film deal doesn't work because 
the producer doesn't like movies about moose. That hardly matters however, 
because Fearless Leader has hatched a plan to take over the United States by 
turning everyone into mindless vegetables through hypnotic television shows 
(not that anyone should notice the difference, someone points out). FBI 
Agent, Karen Sympathy (Piper Perabo), is assigned to stop the notorious trio 
by bringing Rocky and Bullwinkle out of reruns and into the real world. 
Things don't go quite as planned however, because Rocky can't seem to fly 
anymore, and Bullwinkle seems to have grown even dumber (assuming that's 
possible). Nevertheless, the three start a cross country journey to get to 
New York in time to stop Fearless Leader from convincing the entire United 
States to elect him president.
Well, Boris and Natasha may not have been able to stop Moose and Squirrel 
back in the '60s, but Des Mcanuff (who produced the wonderful "The Iron 
Giant") and Ken Lonergan (who wrote the hilarious "Analyze This") managed to 
stop them with this piece of tripe. Moose and Squi- sorry, Rocky and 
Bullwinkle were really quite amusing back in the old television series. The 
episodes were full of clever puns, witty comments about society, and amusing 
slapstick comedy involving Boris, Natasha, or Bullwinkle (okay, so I never 
found Rocky to be very funny). The movie has hackneyed, stupid puns; obvious 
and unfunny social commentary (gee, people are like vegetables when watching 
television - yuck yuck); and slapstick comedy minus the amusement. Does this 
mean the movie is completely humorless? No, it just means that for every 
joke that works, ten don't. This also means that for every scene that works 
(like the courtroom scene, and there is one very funny line involving the 
explanation of where old cartoons go and gain followings), ten don't (the 
car trip to the college, the entire college scene, the ending sequence, and 
at least seven more), and this gets very tiresome after awhile.
"Rocky and Bullwinkle" does boast an amazing array of talent, led by the 
great De Niro himself and supported by Jason Alexander (Seinfeld) and Rene 
Russo ("The Thomas Crown Affair"). The problem is that these three great 
actors look quite embarrassed to be in this movie, and frankly, who can 
blame them? In the film's lead role we have Piper Perabo (who will soon be 
appearing in Jerry Bruckheimer's "Coyote Ugly"). I don't know where this 
girl came from, but she is one of the cutest things I have ever seen (it's 
just a shame she can't act). Keith Scott ("George of the Jungle") has taken 
over duties as Bullwinkle and the always funny narrator, and the change is 
barely noticeable. We are also granted a host of well known actors in 
useless cameos. We get Whoopi Goldberg as a judge, Kel Mitchell and Keenan 
Thompson as college buddies, Randy Quaid as the head of the FBI, John 
Goodman as a state trooper, and so on (Janeane Garolfalo, Carl Reiner, David 
Alan Grier, etc.). The list goes on forever, but all these cameos amount to 
just about nothing because they are all given no screen time. The only two 
who make any sort of impression are John Goodman (because he always makes an 
impression) and Janeane Garofalo (because she gets one of those rare 
semi-amusing scenes). It was actually quite sad to see such a talented cast 
wasted.
"Rocky and Bullwinkle" is guilty of one other massive travesty. One so 
unspeakably terrible I'm loathe to mention it. Sherman and Mr. Peabody 
aren't present anywhere in the movie. I'll give you a minute to let that 
soak in. I have to wonder how Ken Lonergan found a way to fit in so many 
celebrity cameos but didn't remember to stick the most beloved characters 
(in my opinion anyway) from the original television show. Okay, my rant is 
over, or as Mr. Peabody would say, "Quiet you." "Rocky and Bullwinkle" 
features a subdued, barely present soundtrack, which was actually a nice 
change from the recent obnoxiously loud soundtracks I've been hearing. One 
final note: despite the fact that there is more than a decade's difference 
between "Who Framed Roger Rabbit" and "The Adventures of Rocky and 
Bullwinkle", the former features more seamless interaction between the 
animated characters and the real ones. The movie runs only 88 minutes, but 
it felt like it should have ended at 60 or so. I'd recommend it only to 
people who adore animated/live action movies and give it two and a half out 
of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
Hollywood can be awfully patriotic at times. It may not seem that way, with
movies like "Three Kings" and "Platoon" making the US look like a villainous
bully; but Hollywood gets particularly patriotic when making WWII movies
like "Patton" and "Saving Private Ryan". You can now add Jonathan Mostow's
("Breakdown") "U-571" to that list of red blooded, gung-ho, fight till we
die, all American movies. The good guys are pristine and courageous, while
the bad guys are evil, faceless terrors from Germany (where all evil,
faceless terrors come from). "U-571" may be the sort of brainless but
uplifting movie that will never stand the test of time like the far superior
"Das Boot" and "The Hunt for Red October"; however, one can't blame the
movie for being brainless as this film's only purposes are to get your pulse
pounding and your spirit soaring. It succeeds admirably on both counts.
It's the middle of WWII, and the Allied forces are getting pasted in the
Atlantic due to a German code they have been unable to crack. Captain
Dahlgren (Bill Paxton, in what amounts to little more than a cameo) has been
assigned to lead a submarine crew, while posing as a German resupply ship,
to a stranded German sub, and steal their code book. His first officer, Lt.
Andrew Tyler (Matthew McConaughey), has just been turned down for a
promotion because Dahlgren doesn't believe he is ready for the strains of
command. The crew carries out its mission only to have their ship sunk by
the real resupply ship. Lt. Tyler now finds himself in command of the
captured German sub. He has only a handful of raw cadets and one grizzled
old sea dog (Harvey Keitel) to help him get the code book back to Allied
soil before the German fleet discovers what they have stolen.
Like I said, "U-571" is mindless entertainment at its best; as a result, the
dialogue sounds a bit forced at times and the events depicted are more than
a little implausible (and quite historically inaccurate). Those few flaws
aside, this movie is a blast. The set designs for the insides of WWII
submarines are remarkably accurate and are dark and dank like a submarine
interior should be. As in all submarine movies, the ability to properly
convey the feelings of claustrophobia and dread experienced by the submarine
crew is very important. Jonathan Mostow writes these emotions into his
characters perfectly. As for the score by Richad Marvin ("Breakdown"), it is
as rousing and patriotic as the movie itself (I'm surprised they didn't have
American flags hanging from the ceiling in the theater).
Unfortunately, the acting in the movie isn't quite up to par. I'm not sure
if this is a result of the rather cheesy dialogue; but whatever the reason
it does at times hinder the film. Matthew McConaughey ("Cutthroat Island")
gives the movie's worst performance. I think this is because he never quite
finds his footing playing his character. Lt. Tyler switches from being
unsure of himself and his crewmen, to being a great submarine captain in the
blink of an eye and then suddenly back again. Bill Paxton ("Titanic", "A
Simple Plan") is given a bit part, which is somewhat confusing as he is
possibly the most recognized name on the cast list. The remainder of the
supporting cast is adequate at best, with the only exception being Harvey
Keitel ("Reservoir Dogs", "Pulp Fiction"). Keitel is perfect as the veteran
of the submarine crew, getting such wonderful lines as "You're the Captain
now, and that means you have to know everything whether you actually do or
not."
The high point of the story comes shortly after the crew begin making their
escape in the captured submarine and are discovered by a German destroyer.
The two play cat and mouse through the Atlantic, with the sub staying as
deep as possible while the destroyer drops depth charges. These scenes do an
excellent job of displaying the fear felt by the submarine crew as the
explosions come closer and closer and the sub shakes more and more. "U-571"
has only one other flaw, which is that it does take awhile to really get
going. The nice thing is that once it finds its footing it's a heck of a
ride. The movie runs a respectable 118 minutes, though a little trimming at
the film's start wouldn't have hurt. I'd recommend it to fans of WWII
movies, and especially to fans of "Das Boot" and give the film three and a
half out of five stars. Now if you'll excuse me, I feel like singing "The
Star Spangled Banner" or buying a flag or something.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Contender, The (2000)
The vice president of the US has died, and President Evans (Jeff Bridges) 
must select a new one. The primary candidate in everyone's minds is the 
popular Governor Hathaway (William L. Petersen), who was proclaimed a 
national hero when he tried to save a woman whose car flew off a bridge. 
Instead, Evans chooses Senator Laine Hanson (Joan Allen), a popular former 
Republican. The people seem willing to go with this choice, but the evil 
Senator Runyon (Gary Oldman) is a friend of Hathaway's, and doesn't want 
Hanson to win. He digs up dirt about her with the help of the young and 
ambitious Senator Webster (Christian Slater). The dirt is that she engaged 
in an orgy back in her college days, and is therefore not morally fit to be 
a vice-president. The president and his chief of staff, Kermit Newman (an 
excellent Sam Elliott), panic and want Hanson to attack back. Hanson 
refuses, saying she won't stoop to such a level and that it isn't right that 
people are digging into her past in such a way. The only problem facing her 
now is that Runyon is head of the committee who will decide if she is fit to 
be vice-president.
Before you read anything in this review, I should let you know that I did 
something no movie critic should do, and something I haven't done in years. 
I walked out of this movie. I know, that's a crime, and if you don't want to 
read the rest of this review because of it I completely understand. I really 
tried to stay for the whole running time, I thought to myself: "self, you've 
suffered through movies like "Battlefield Earth" and lived to tell the tale, 
how bad can this be?" While "The Contender" is obviously no "Battlefield 
Earth", it had one massive element working against it. What was that? Well, 
the fact of the matter is, I was so insulted by this movie I simply couldn't 
watch it anymore. Alright, let me get one thing out in the open right now 
for those of you who haven't guessed it from previous reviews. I'm quite 
conservative. Now, let me explain something before you throw your hands up 
in the air and say, "Well that explains why he didn't like it, he's biased, 
his opinion doesn't count." While I'm conservative, I love movies, and am 
therefore used to a left-wing slant in nearly all Hollywood films. I can 
tolerate a lot because of this, but I couldn't tolerate "The Contender". In 
fact, the only thing that kept me in my seat for almost two hours was the 
acting.
Joan Allen ("Face/Off") leads the film's impressive cast with an impressive 
performance. Much as I disliked this movie, I'm sure it's going to garner a 
few nominations come Oscar time for acting if nothing else. Allen plays 
Hanson calm, cool, and collected at all times, and this is exactly how the 
character should be played. If she'd gone into hysterics at any point it 
would have destroyed all the character's credibility. Gary Oldman ("The 
Fifth Element") overacts with a vengeance as the conniving Runyon, but 
Oldman is the most fun to watch when he's overacting. The character of 
President Evans is woefully underwritten, but Jeff Bridges (whom I will 
always think of as the dude from "The Big Lebowski") does the best he can, 
throwing in a few much needed humorous moments. Christian Slater ("Very Bad 
Things") is good as the naive young congressman, but in my opinion the most 
impressive performance came from Sam Elliott ("The Big Lebowski"). Elliott, 
looking almost unrecognizable without a great big moustache, manages to turn 
a character who was written as nothing more than a cliche into the most real 
person in the film. He is able to play such a wide range of emotions on his 
face it's almost a shame he's always hidden it with that moustache. Watch 
how he plays the scene where he first finds out about Hanson's past. You can 
feel his rage pulsing out of the screen. Philip Baker Hall ("Magnolia") 
makes a brief but good appearance as Hanson's father.
Let's face it, you're not going to find a conservative movie that deals with 
politics in Hollywood these days. You're not even going to find a middle of 
the road one. All political thrillers coming out of Hollywood have a leftist 
slant, though they try to cover it up by throwing little tidbits to the 
right. Look at "Wag the Dog" (which I loved), about a conservative president 
who has a sexual relationship with a minor, and has it covered up by a 
fix-it man. That had a decidedly leftist slant, but it didn't shove it in 
our faces, cram it down our throats, and finally beat us about the head with 
it. You want an example from the movie? Try this one on for size: Hanson is 
out jogging, wearing pristine white jogging clothes, running through a 
graveyard, past an American flag while dramatic music soars. This scene cuts 
back and forth with Runyon sitting in his office, smoking a cigar, plotting 
her downfall with all the other evil Republicans. The room is darkly lit, 
and all the Republicans have hateful looks on their faces It's a nauseating 
scene and I saw three people walk out of the theater during it, never to 
return. Yet I stayed, disgusted though I was. I didn't actually walk out for 
another 45 minutes or so. The scene that finally snapped my will like a twig 
was when Hanson is addressing the senate committee. She raises her head 
proudly, stares the evil senators down, and proclaims every liberal 
philosophy she upholds while astonishingly cheesy dramatic music swells in 
the background. I made a Jeff Bridges style scream of rage and stormed out 
of the theater.
Okay, politics aside, how does "The Contender" hold up compared to other 
political thrillers? Writer/director Rod Lurie (last seen trying to direct 
"Deterrence") directs the film with all the talent of a first year film 
student. The pacing is a joke, the camera work is simply bizarre (he 
switches from a jittery hand-held camera to a professional panning style and 
back for no apparent reason), and the film's message (women are held to a 
double standard in sexual conduct) is delivered with all the subtlety of a 
knife in the naval. Plus, to top that all off, the script is dull. I saw 
people falling asleep all around me, and I frankly envied them. Why is it 
boring? Because every twist thrown at us is seen coming a mile away. The 
score, by composer Larry Groupe ("I Woke up Early the Day I Died"), is full 
of the sort of cheesy, overblown, dramatic stuff that would make Trevor 
Rabin proud. "The Contender" runs a long 126 minutes. I'd recommend the 
movie to left-wingers and people who don't care about politics, and like 
their political thrillers without thrills. I give the movie two out of five 
stars. By the way, does anyone find it a coincidence that such a leftist 
movie is coming out this close to the election?
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Whipped (1999)
Brad (Brian Van Holt), Zeke (Zorie Barber), Jonathan (Jonathan Abrahams), 
and Eric (Judah Domke) are four of the most morally repugnant guys you're 
ever likely to meet. Brad, Zeke, and Jonathan spend their weeks trying to 
scam women into sleeping with them so they can get together on Sundays and 
brag about who they scored with. Eric, however, is unhappily married and no 
longer fits in with the group. The other three are enjoying their lifestyle 
until one day they meet the same girl, Mia (Amanda Peet). Mia is the kind of 
girl every guy dreams of: beautiful, interesting, intelligent, and she has a 
real interest in what the guys are into. Soon the three men are battling it 
out with each other for Mia's affections, each convinced that she likes him 
more than the others. Mia, meanwhile, claims she simply can't choose one 
over any of the others because she likes them all equally. Time's running 
out, the friendship is growing more and more strained, and Eric's life is 
growing more miserable without the guys to talk to. Will Mia make a choice? 
Is Mia really scamming them to get even for the way they treat women? Does 
anyone really care?
To call "Whipped" vulgar would be laughably inadequate. To call it 
disgusting would be like saying "the holocaust was bad". In the first 
fifteen minutes of this film I was thinking to myself: "Gee, gross-out 
humor, what do you know." Within the first twenty five minutes I realized 
the movie was much more than just your typical gross-out movie. "Whipped" 
is, conceivably, the most disgusting movie I've ever seen. Do I mean it's 
full of your basic fart jokes? No, I mean this is a movie designed only for 
those who want to hear about the most depraved, revolting sexual acts known 
to man. To enjoy this movie (assuming that's possible) you have to not only 
hear about these acts, but you have to be able to find them highly amusing. 
As for me, I just wanted to stand up and run out of the theater, and I saw 
quite a few people do just that. I decided to stay not because I was 
enjoying the movie, but out of sheer morbid curiosity. I wanted to see what 
they could possibly think of that would be more disgusting than the last 
"joke" I'd heard. I have to hand it to Peter Cohen, he managed to top 
himself every time.
So, can I recommend the movie on the basis of acting? Not in the slightest. 
Other than Amanda Peet, every actor was a relative newcomer, and I don't 
think any of them will go on to great careers. Brian Van Holt plays the 
reprehensible Brad. However, while Brad is supposed to be worthy of all our 
hate, Van Holt plays him in such a sickeningly over-the-top way, we 
eventually start hating Van Holt rather than Brad. Zorie Barber (who also 
co-produced) plays the loathsome Zeke. While the character of Zeke is 
certainly worthy of all our hate, the actor is worthy of even more. Whoever 
told the man to go into a career in acting should be locked away for the 
good of society. To say Zorie Barber acts poorly would be far too kind. 
Barber is one of those actors who is obviously running his next line through 
his head, waiting to say it while the other actors speak. It's the kind of 
acting you see in your average high school play. Jonathan Abrahams overplays 
the part of the sensitive guy far too much, but he's not quite as irritating 
as Van Holt and Barber. Judah Domke does nothing but blink a lot and mutter 
about how much he hates being married. You're no doubt wondering if Amanda 
Peet adds some spark of life to this dreary cast. Well, she does, but she's 
not half as good as she was in "The Whole Nine Yards". I don't think this 
was her fault, it's just that her last movie was funny, and this one is far 
from it. Peter Cohen himself shows up in a cameo as a pizza delivery guy; 
and if I'd known it was him, I would have booed at the screen.
Are there any funny scenes in "Whipped"? I think so, but I can't seem to 
remember what they are. I'm sure a few real jokes got by me while I was 
cringing away from the screen in horror. The rest of the audience, made up 
primarily of teen-agers (that R rating means nothing these days), were 
laughing, but it was nervous, sporadic laughter. Like I said, quite a few 
people got up and walked out. I just had to keep repeating to myself, 
"you're getting paid for this, you're getting paid for this." That didn't 
help much. In addition to the lack of laughs, the constant gross-outs, and 
the terrible acting, "Whipped" features some fairly incompetent direction. 
Peter Cohen is a first time director and a first time screen writer, and his 
lack of experience combined with his apparent lack of talent makes for a 
movie which your average college student could have done better. Not only is 
the comic pacing non-existent, but Cohen throws in occasional interviews 
with the characters which I don't think were even supposed to be funny (if 
that's the case, they succeeded admirably). Why are these interviews 
present? Your guess is as good as mine. I think Cohen wanted to get a 
message across as well. The message is something like this: love is bad, 
marriage is worse, guys are evil, women are evil, all people searching for 
relationships are really short-con operators. If you can think of a more 
revolting message, let me know.
I hated to say this back in April when it was only a creeping suspicion, but 
now that it's September, I believe I can safely say that the year 2000 is 
one of the worst years in cinematic history. If I were forced to make a top 
ten of the year list right now, I couldn't think of ten films to put on it. 
If I had to make a bottom ten list, you can rest assured "Whipped" would 
hold a place of honor (though "Battlefield Earth" still has a firm hold on 
the number one slot). I'll give this to Peter Cohen - I've never seen 
anything quite like "Whipped". It's a gross-out comedy without the comedy. 
It also has no discernable soundtrack other than a goofy number playing 
while Jonathan runs a vibrator all over himself (don't ask, I don't want to 
talk about it). There is a little twist at the end of the movie, but you 
will greet it in one of two ways: either you'll have seen it coming a mile 
off (I fall under that category), or you simply won't care. Thankfully, the 
movie only runs 85 minutes, but that's almost an hour and a half too long. 
I'd recommend "Whipped" to anyone who likes their gross-out humor purely 
sexual in nature and not particularly funny. I give it one and a half out of 
five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at: http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
Directed by: Tim Burton
Written by: Washington Irving (Story), Kevin Yagher
Tim Burton is a man who has accumulated quite a following for the simple reason
that his films look fantastic. If one goes to a Tim Burton movie, they expect
to see dark, gothic sets accompanied by dark, gothic people and a haunting
score (preferably a dark, gothic one) from the great Danny Elfman. Going into
his latest film, "Sleepy Hollow", this is exactly what I wanted and this is
what was delivered.
Ichabod Crane (Johnny Depp) is a New York detective in the year 1799. Unlike
his fellow officers, Crane feels that scientific analysis is the way that
detectives will solve crimes in the next century. Crane's superior (Christopher
Lee in a sadly brief appearance) sends him to investigate several murders in
the small town of Sleepy Hollow. Crane is greeted there by a council of old men
(Michael Gough, Richard Griffiths, Jeffrey Jones, Ian McDiarmid, Michael
Gambon) who inform him that the headless spirit of a long dead Hessian
Mercenary (the perfectly cast Christopher Walken) is responsible for the
murders. At first, Crane scoffs at such talk, but as all know, he will soon
believe in the headless horseman. During his investigations Crane meets the
enchanting Katrina (Christina Ricci), who appears to dabble in sorcery, and may
possess some link to the horseman.
To start off with allow me to state that other than the character names, this
film has nothing whatsoever to do with the original story by Washington Irving.
I must also make it clear that if you are expecting to see a film with very
little gore, you are either misinformed, or incredibly naive. Beheadings abound
in this film, and while you might not always see them (though you usually do),
you will hear a sickening sound as the horseman's sword slices through the
hapless victim's neck. Those of you with weak stomachs should probably stay far
away from this movie.
If there were only one reason to see "Sleepy Hollow" it would certainly be the
brilliant sets. The set for the town of Sleepy Hollow is quite a sight to
behold. Constantly covered in fog, surrounded by evil looking mountains and
trees, and filled with dark buildings and darker graveyards. One scene which is
perfectly done involves the fog spreading out and extinguishing four torches
lit around the town. To go along with this unworldly atmosphere is a brilliant
score from Danny Elfman. Not since Burton's "Batman" has Elfman written a score
this perfectly suited for the film. Low and haunting at times, loud and rousing
when appropriate, Burton uses it to perfection when highlighting a scene.
The acting is uniformly adequate, with Depp alone truly standing out. Depp
makes Ichabod a most interesting character. Hilariously inept through most of
the film yet still arrogant around the townsfolk, if any other actor had played
him Crane might have been difficult to relate to and sympathize with. Ricci
gives a fairly good performance as Katrina, but seems slightly miscast. Ricci
is at her best when playing sarcastic characters with witty dialogue such as
Wednesday Addams in "The Addams Family". As the quiet, love-struck Katrina she
always appears slightly uncomfortable. As for the horseman himself, my fellow
Star Wars fans will be delighted to hear that stuntman Ray Park (Darth Maul)
plays the dead Hessian during the fight scenes.
"Sleepy Hollow" won't win any awards come Oscar time, but it's certainly a lot
of fun and a great way to spend a couple of hours (it does run a little long at
105 minutes). The movie earns its R rating as the gore flows freely throughout
the film (wait till you see the bleeding tree), so don't bring the little ones.
Overall I give it a full recommendation and four stars.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made. See it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
Directed by: James Wong
Written by: Jeffrey Reddick (story), Glen Morgan
Is it possible to cheat death, or can it only be delayed a little longer?
This is the primary question posed in "Final Destination", a remarkably
interesting film which could easily have been nothing more than another
teen-slasher movie. I'm not entirely sure just what I found so captivating
about this film; it may have been the performances from the talented young
cast, or the intelligent discussions about the nature of fate. I suppose it
could have been nothing more than morbid curiosity about how each person was
going to die. It may have been the consistently creepy atmosphere created by
James Wong (The X-Files television series), which is further enhanced by a
similarly creepy score from composer, Shirley Walker ("Mystery Men").
Whatever the reason, "Final Destination" turned out to be the movie that
"Scream 3" wanted to be.
Alex Browning (Devon Sawa) is about to go on a class trip to France with
four teachers and forty other students. After a shaky start on the day,
filled with bizarre images and strange gut feelings, he finally boards the
plane. While awaiting departure, Alex has a sudden vision of the plane
exploding in mid-air and all of the passengers being killed. After screaming
about the plane being destroyed, he is ejected from the plane along with
five other students and one teacher. The aircraft wastes no time in
fulfilling Alex's vision, and the seven survivors slowly move on with their
lives, dealing with their unexpected luck in different ways. However, as the
creepy mortician Bludworth (Tony Todd) points out, in death there are no
accidents, no coincidences, and no escapes. As the survivors are slowly
picked off, Alex must determine when death is going to try for him again.
James Wong's film is loaded with atmosphere; I suppose due to his work on
The X-Files. The death scenes are mostly done in a very stylish manner with
Walker's score playing hauntingly in the background, while we watch death
creep up on the unsuspecting victims. Alex's visions are interestingly done
as well. They never actually show him the deaths (except the plane crash
vision), he must determine how the things he sees might cause a death. Not
all the death scenes are slow and stylish; some are there purely for shock
value, and boy do they ever shock. One death scene occured so suddenly that
the audience and I didn't even have a chance to jump in surprise. Everyone
simply stared at the screen in shock, for several seconds, before exploding
into cheers and applause for how well the surprise was accomplished.
"Final Destination" features quite a talented cast. Devon Sawa ("Idle
Hands") is a very talented, young actor who I could see breaking into some
great roles. Ali Larter ("House on Haunted Hill"), who plays the strangely
named Clear Rivers, is excellent as the only person who believes Alex was
responsible for saving her life. The remaining young actors (Chad Donella,
Seann William Scott, Amanda Detmer) are uniformly good, each playing a very
different character. Tony Todd ("Candyman", "The Rock") may appear in only
one scene, but the man is so excellent at causing chills to run down your
spine just listening to him, that any appearance at all is welcome. The only
weak link is Daniel Roebuck ("US Marshalls") as FBI Agent Wiene. I don't
actually think this is due to Roebuck himself, as he is not an untalented
actor, but the character served no purpose.
Another thing I must compliment Wong about was the way in which he was able
to keep the film from falling into any typical teen-slasher movie patterns.
On nearly every occasion that the movie begins to show signs of becoming
cliche ridden, Wong reins it in nicely. The only exceptions are a long,
drawn out chase scene near the end and one somewhat predictable death scene.
"Final Destination" runs an admirable 100 minutes, though a little trimming
couldn't have hurt. I give it a full recommendation for some great acting,
an intriguing premise, and some thought provoking dialogue. I also admit to
having a weakness for atmospheric movies, and this one is steeped in it. I
give "Final Destination" a well earned four out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Coyote Ugly (2000)
Violet Sanford (Piper Perabo) has just reached an important decision. She's 
going to leave her small New Jersey town where she's lived her whole life, 
and move to New York city so she can become a song writer. Violet's father, 
Bill (John Goodman), is less than pleased by the idea, but wishes her luck. 
So Violet heads off, finding that the music industry isn't quite as easy to 
break into as she expected and winds up searching for a job. She hears about 
a bar called Coyote Ugly, where the waitresses pull in several hundred 
dollars a night. After speaking with the owner, Lil (Maria Bello), Violet 
gets a job working with the flirtatious Cammie (Izabella Miko); the 
practicing lawyer, Zoe (Tyra Banks); and Rachael (Bridget Moynahan), who 
hates Violet's guts from the start (for reasons which are never explained). 
Violet also meets a slightly goofy Australian, named Kevin O'Donnell (Adam 
Garcia), who she falls for immediately. Violet tries to fit in at the bar, 
working as a coyote, but at the same time all she wants to do is write her 
songs. The problem is, in order to get her songs published, she has to sing 
them herself, and she finds she has the worst case of stage-fright 
imaginable.
I know that plot summary may have sounded involved, but the film is 
basically two things: girls dancing on a bar top; and sappy, coming of age 
melodrama. One of the biggest problems with "Coyote Ugly" is that, like all 
teen movies of the past ten years, it is so bogged down by cliche after 
cliche that it saps any enjoyment out of the movie. It's hard to have fun at 
a movie when you know exactly how everything is going to turn out well in 
advance. In fact, the lack of any surprises is really the only thing holding 
"Coyote Ugly" back. It has a decent enough cast, a somewhat interesting 
premise, a soundtrack I'm sure some audience members will love (though I'm 
not one of them), and the sort of cheesy romance that teenagers fawn all 
over. Yet glancing around the audience at my showing, I noticed that most of 
the teenagers this movie was directed at seemed bored out of their minds. 
Granted, when the girls were dancing on the bar, the guys in the audience 
were at full attention; but between these scenes, when the action was away 
from the bar and the melodramatic elements set in, peoples' eyes seemed to 
become heavy (I know mine did) Chatter would start up amongst members of the 
audience until the action returned to the bar. So the breakdown is: girls in 
bar, movie is somewhat entertaining; girls out of bar, movie is a bore.
Piper Perabo, previously seen in the horrendous "The Adventures of Rocky and 
Bullwinkle", seems to have a bizarre dilemma facing her. In Bullwinkle she 
was just about the cutest actress I'd ever seen, but she seemed incapable of 
acting. In "Coyote Ugly" some of her cuteness seems to have vanished, but 
she managed to gain some acting talent. Maybe someday she'll reach an 
equilibrium. The supporting actresses, save Maria Bello, are never given 
enough screen time to make much of an impression. Maria Bello turns in an 
okay performance, but she was far more entertaining as Rosie in "Payback". 
Newcomer Adam Garcia, on the other hand, delivers quite a good comic turn as 
the requisite boyfriend from the big city. He actually seemed to possess 
quite a good sense of comic timing, and I hope a better future script will 
allow him to shine. Finally, we have the great John Goodman. Goodman has 
proven, time and again, that he is one of the best, most underrated comic 
actors working in Hollywood (see "The Big Lebowski" if you want proof). 
Whenever he's on screen in "Coyote Ugly" (which happens a lot less often 
than it should have), the movie shines. Whenever he's gone, you'll find 
yourself checking your watch, waiting for him to come back (either that or 
checking it, waiting for the movie to end. I always get those two confused).
As I sat and watched the girls' activities in the bar, several questions 
continuously ran through my mind. First, and perhaps most important, how do 
these girls serve anyone when they seem to do nothing but dance on the bar 
and humiliate the customers? Second, is this actually the kind of place that 
would be popular? Don't get me wrong, watching the girls dance is nice, but 
they also do things like spray water in peoples' faces, cut peoples' hair 
off, knock the occasional customer out, and other humiliating activities. 
Maybe it's just me, but I wouldn't want to hang out there. Third, how can 
they afford to stay open when more alcohol seemed to end up on the bar, on 
the girls, or on the customers, than was actually paid for. Finally, how 
could this bar be allowed to stay open when there were constant brawls 
breaking out, fires being lit in a building filled with alcohol, and far too 
many people inside for it to be considered safe by public officials (such as 
the cops and fire marshals who stop by). These types of plot inconsistencies 
probably won't bother everyone, but they sure grated on my nerves.
Obviously, one of the primary elements to "Coyote Ugly" is going to be the 
music, since the film purports itself to be about girls dancing. While the 
music wasn't to my liking, being comprised entirely of popular songs by 
people like LeAnn Rimes. I prefer my music more like the kind found in 
"Gladiator", but that wouldn't have been quite appropriate to this film. 
Still, the audience seemed to be enjoying the soundtrack (though they could 
have just been enjoying watching the girls dance), and I'm ashamed to admit 
that I caught my foot tapping at one point near the finale. By the way, what 
are the odds of "I Will Survive" being a major song in two movies released 
within a week of each other? Weird, huh? One thing I was most worried about 
after seeing the previews was the movie's dialogue. Thankfully the dialogue 
was bad ("So what do you do when you realize all your dreams have come 
true?" ouch), but usually not painfully so (for painful dialogue, see "The 
Perfect Storm"). There's an "R" rating hiding behind the "PG-13" stamped on 
the front of "Coyote Ugly", but Jerry Bruckheimer keeps things carefully 
restrained, most likely so as not to lose any audience that can't attend an 
"R" rated film (not that that stopped anyone from going to the stupid "Scary 
Movie"). "Coyote Ugly" runs 100 minutes, but it shouldn't have been any 
longer than 90. I'd recommend the film to fans of teen movies and give it a 
slightly generous three out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Hannibal (2001)
Directed by: Ridley Scott
Written by: Thomas Harris (novel), David Mamet, Steven Zaillian
It's been some time since Hannibal Lecter (Anthony Hopkins) escaped from 
prison and FBI Agent Clarice Starling (Jodie Foster then, Julianne Moore 
now) made a name for herself by catching a dangerous psychopath. Now Agent 
Starling is under attack from the FBI and from the media because she shot a 
drug dealer who was carrying a child. Leading the attack is Justice Agent 
Paul Krendler (Ray Liotta). Meanwhile, Lecter is living the good life in 
Italy, but he's drawn the attention of local law enforcement officer Pazzi 
(Giancarlo Giannini), who plans on turning Lecter in to the FBI for the two 
hundred thousand dollar reward. Also working against our wayward cannibal is 
billionaire Mason Verger; a crippled, hateful man whose face Dr. Lecter 
convinced him to remove some years back. Verger is helping Agent Starling 
determine Lecter's whereabouts in an effort to bring him into his own 
clutches to exact revenge. Despite the multitude of enemies working against 
him, Lecter holds all the cards and seems unstoppable. In fact, his only 
weakness might be a growing affection for Clarice, which might lead him 
right into her hands.
I've made it clear on several occasions that I don't think The Silence of 
the Lambs is all it's cracked up to be. That said, I walked into Ridley 
Scott's (Gladiator) film with certain preconceived notions about what 
I'd think of it. Now, I don't care what other critics tell you about being 
able to walk into a movie without any bias one way or the other. The moment 
you see a preview, or read one review, or even read the cast list, you form 
an opinion about the movie. It might be an unconscious decision, but it's 
human nature to form impressions about something before we've experienced 
it. Alright, enough with the shallow philosophical musings, and on to why I 
don't think Hannibal was much of a film. What surprised me about 
halfway through the proceedings was the absence of any real suspense. It 
became quite obvious what was going to happen to each character who appeared 
on screen, so when that character found himself in a desperate situation, 
the tension was killed. Of course, that wasn't the only thing that set the 
film back, but it's one of the larger problems to be found.
I might not have cared for The Silence of the Lambs, but it was hard 
to deny that the acting was superb. Anthony Hopkins went a long way in 
defining creepy in terms of movie serial killers; and Jodie Foster was an 
outstanding choice for a young, naive FBI agent. Things are a little 
different this time around. Hopkins is still fun to watch as Lecter, and 
it's obvious he's having a good time, but the character's menace is gone. In 
its place we get a few chuckles (pitch black though the humor may be), one 
or two startles, and a touch of gore. As for Julianne Moore, marvelous in 
some endeavors (The Big Lebowski), useless in others 
(Magnolia, not that that's her fault), she falls somewhere in the 
middle this time around. This isn't exactly her fault for two reasons: one, 
the character of Clarice Starling is woefully underwritten this time around 
(strange, since she was somehow overwritten last time); two, Julianne Moore 
may be a fairly talented actress, but she's no Jodie Foster, and 
comparisons, unfair or not, are going to be drawn. The only other actors 
with any screen time are the excellent Giancarlo Giannini (A Walk in the 
Clouds), who leaves quite an impression with a small role; and the 
sleepwalking Ray Liotta (Goodfellas), who is given a hideous role, 
and it's obvious he knows it. Tempted as I am to tell you who the actor 
playing Mason Verger is, I won't since his name isn't mentioned in the 
credits. Let's just say this actor does an outstanding job, as always.
What is it that made The Silence of the Lambs work for so many 
people? Since I'm not a member of that group I can only venture a guess, but 
I'm willing to bet a lot of the film's appeal is due to the interaction 
between Lecter and Starling. People would sit there, fascinated at this game 
of cat and mouse; watching the brilliant Lecter at first toy with Starling 
from behind his glass prison, and then slowly begin to regard her as an 
equal. Obviously, I didn't find any of this too fascinating, but I can 
understand why many people did. These same people will probably be 
disappointed to find that this interaction between Lecter and Starling is 
absent from Hannibal. In fact, the two don't speak to each other till 
about halfway through the film. Otherwise the focus of the film is generally 
split between the vaguely interesting story of Pazzi's attempts to capture 
Lecter, and the exceedingly uninteresting story of Starling being hung out 
to dry by her colleagues. Unfortunately, the film's trailers pretty well 
give away what will happen in Pazzi's story, and Starling's story contains 
nothing even resembling tension. I wish I could say things improved once 
Starling and Lecter meet up, but their game of cat and mouse has been turned 
into a cutesy (if moderately disturbing) string of flirtations.
With a director like Ridley Scott behind the wheel, some things are bound to 
work. The shots of Italy and the cinematography in general by John Mathieson 
(Gladiator) are quite nice. Despite what you may have heard about 
this being the goriest film of all time, Scott shows remarkable restraint 
with the gore, and I can only think of three scenes which might really 
disturb audiences. Otherwise Scott wisely chooses to shoot what could be the 
goriest scenes in a hazy, obscured way so as not to turn too many stomachs. 
On the whole, Scott's direction is efficient and suitable to the film. He 
only gives in to Oliver Stone syndrome once or twice, jumping suddenly to 
slow motion, fast motion, or something similarly juvenile. He also makes 
excellent use of yet another brilliant score by Hans Zimmer 
(Gladiator, noticing a trend here?). Zimmer's score is low and 
remarkably creepy, perfectly highlighting the film's darkened mood. 
Hannibal runs a touch too long at 131 minutes. I'd recommend anyone 
who enjoyed the first film, and doesn't mind some stomach turning gore, see 
the film. Just don't go in with your expectations too high. I give the movie 
three out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
Directed by: Phillip Noyce
Written by: Jeffery Deaver (novel), Jeremy Iacone
A dark city, a constant downpour, a serial killer who the cops can't catch, and
a brilliant detective who is the only one capable of finding him. With a tried
and true formula like this, how could a film possibly go wrong? By being
utterly, ridiculously implausible. Another example of how fine acting from the
leads can't save a script this unbelievable.
Lincoln Rhyme (Denzel Washington) was once a brilliant detective, but a falling
pipe crushed his spine and his will to live. Despite support from his friends,
Thelma (Queen Latifah) and fellow detective Paulie (Ed O'Neill), he has decided
to end his life before his injury escalates and he becomes a vegetable.
However, Paulie wants his help on one more case, which involves a killer taxi
driver who is leaving clues for the police. Lincoln agrees, but only if young
officer Amelia (Angelina Jolie) will be his eyes and ears by filming crime
scenes and reporting to him.
As I said, the acting here is really quite good, particularly from Denzel
Washington. It's remarkable what a performance he can deliver, despite being
able to move only his head and one finger. Angelina Jolie delivers an adequate
performance, but seems rather miscast. As always, it's a pleasure to see Ed
O'Neill in a film. Being known almost entirely for his role as Al Bundy on
"Married With Children", it's good to see the talented actor trying his hand at
something new. Michael Rooker (Cliffhanger, Tombstone) makes an appearance as
the useless Captain Cheney, whos character seems present only to hassle the
investigators and irritate the audience.
Speaking of implausibilities, how long do you believe a train takes to stop?
Quite a long time, at any rate. According to "The Bone Collector", it takes
maybe 20 yards to come to a complete stop. The scene involves Amelia just
having found a body and a clue which lies on the train tracks. She stands in
front of the train, yelling for it to stop and waving her arms back and forth.
The clue is a piece of paper held down by a bolt. This could very easily have
been moved off the tracks, but this wouldn't have been nearly as tense a scene
I suppose.
Another nice, impossible scene involves Amelia searching for a book which will
reveal the identity of the killer, according to Lincoln. The first store she
looks for this rare book in happens to have it, and she discovers its location
by reaching to the top of a shelf and pulling a pile of books down. The novel
in question lands right on top, turned towards her. As for the identity of the
killer, I guessed it as soon as he appeared on screen; but when his identity is
truly revealed, it comes completely out of left field, so don't even try to
guess his motives.
"The Bone Collector" runs a little too long at 118 minutes. I'd recommend it
only for die-hard fans of either the genre, or Denzel Washington. Even if you
fall under one of these categories, I'd still suggest waiting for video.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
Directed by: Mary Harron
Written by: Bret Easton Ellis (novel), Mary Harron
There are generally only two possible opinions one can form of a movie like
Mary Harron's ("I Shot Andy Warhol") "American Psycho". You may walk out of
this movie thinking it is a horrid, disgusting piece of garbage which should
never have been committed to film; or you'll believe, as I do, that this is
a brilliant black comedy the likes of which has not been seen in quite some
time. This may also be the breakout role for Christian Bale ("A Midsummer
Night's Dream"), an actor who displays some amazing, Oscar worthy talent in
this movie. Alternatingly uproariously funny and shockingly violent, this is
the kind of movie which will stay in your mind for days afterwards. I'll
warn you right now, if you don't like your humor black as pitch stay far
away from this movie.
It's the mid 1980's and the yuppie era is in full swing. Patrick Bateman
(Christian Bale) is one of these yuppies who spends his time worrying about
whether he'll get a good table at the best restaurant and how expensive his
apartment is compared to his friends'. He is engaged to Evelyn Williams
(Reese Witherspoon), who he is cheating on with Courtney Rawlinson (Samantha
Mathis), the fiancee of the irritating Lewis Carruthers (Matt Ross). It may
sound like a normal, if slightly soap opera like lifestyle, but Patrick
explains to us in occasional narrative voice-overs that he isn't actually a
regular human. He may have the appearance of a human, and he may follow the
morning and evening routines of your average, everyday person, but he is
really a cold blooded killer. Bateman isn't sure why he does what he does,
but his urge for blood and violence is growing stronger and stronger each
night.
The film may start off looking more like a straight out comedy than a
combination comedy and slasher film, but don't let that fool you. When
things turn violent it is sudden and rather shocking. Yet despite what you
may have heard, "American Psycho" is not an incredibly violent movie. Nearly
all the slaughter and mayhem takes place off screen or in the dark. This
doesn't mean this is a movie for young audiences. We do see the aftermath of
many of Bateman's violent acts, and there are enough sex scenes that this
could easily have earned an NC-17 rating. Mary Harron does an excellent job
of not focusing entirely on the violent acts, but more on the atmosphere
surrounding Bateman and his victims. The atmosphere consists of everything
being filmed in either dark colors or stale whites with weak lighting. This
gives the film an eerie, other worldly feel to it.
I'm sorry this movie was released so early in the year because Academy
members will almost certainly forget about Christian Bale's amazing
performance come Oscar time. Bale manages to make Bateman inhumanly cold and
calculating without turning the character into another typical movie psycho.
Reese Witherspoon ("Election"), a very talented actress, is unfortunately
given nothing to do as Bateman's fiancee. Chloe Sevigny ("Boys Don't Cry")
gives an adequate performance as Bateman's secretary, the only person he
seems to actually care about. The remainder of the supporting cast is
comprised of actors like Jared Leto ("Fight Club") and Willem Dafoe
("Affliction"), who aren't given much to do, but that doesn't really matter
since the focus of the movie should and does stay on Bateman.
"American Psycho" has a few other things going for it besides the acting and
revolting, yet strangely ivoling plot. The soundtrack is a perfect
combination of '80s and classical music and is always used at just the right
moments. Bateman's voice overs, explaining his actions and his state of
mind, never seem out of place and actually give us some needed insight into
his actions and what makes him do what he does. The humor sprinkled
throughout the movie is at times hilarious, especially a scene in which
Bateman and his colleagues compare business cards. The only thing working
against the movie is the rather confusing and ambiguous ending. I think it
was supposed to tie everything up and offer some sort of explanation, but I
had no idea what was going on. "American Psycho" runs a perfect 97 minutes
and not a scene is wasted. I'd recommend the movie to fans of very, very
dark humor and give it four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
Barry (Tom Green) has been a student at Ithica University for eight
years.  Today, he is leading a tour group around the campus and
displaying his lack of any knowledge about his school. In order to
keep his audience entertained he must tell a story about the bizarre
events surrounding a road trip taken by his best friend, Josh Porter
(Breckin Meyer). Josh has been dating Tiffany (Rachel Blanchard) since
he was about ten years old, and they have maintained their
relationship even though they go to different colleges.  However, when
he suspects Tiffany is cheating on him, he decides to pursue Beth (Amy
Smart), a girl he has had his eye on for some time. Beth is a willing
participant, and the two create a home video of their first time
together. Unfortunately, Josh finds that Tiffany has not been cheating
on him, and his friend Rubin (Paulo Costanzo) has accidentaly mailed
the tape to Tiffany. Josh, Rubin, and two other friends, E.L. (Seann
William Scott) and Kyle (DJ Qualls), now must get to Tiffany's college
before the tape reaches her, and she finds out about Josh's
infidelity.
At long last, a film in the tradition of 1978's "Animal House" has
reached theaters. "Road Trip" is the kind of raunchy, hysterical, at
times disgusting comedy that "American Pie" wanted to be. A warning to
everyone: if you don't like your humor as obscene and revolting as is
humanly possible, stay away from this movie. Some of the film's more
abhorent parts include a scene where Kyle eats a piece of French toast
that has been through a journey no food should go through. This is the
kind of humor which will make you either cringe away from the screen
in disgust, or cringe from the scene while laughing hysterically. In
fact, you will probably react to the entire movie in one of these two
ways.  Most of you have, no doubt, seen the film's previews in which
Tom Green (The Tom Green Show) sticks a live rat in his mouth to
encourage a snake to eat its dinner. This scene would already be quite
funny; but Green is such an insane looking actor that he makes you
believe he might actually eat that rat on camera. Again, if you don't
find the thought of that scene at all amusing, stay away from this
movie.
The acting in a movie like "Road Trip" isn't particularly important
since the actors are only present to have disgusting things happen to
them. I was pleasantly surprised to find that most of the film's cast
members possess some wonderful comic timing. Tom Green isn't actually
given a very significant role in the film, as he is only present in
short scenes.  Breckin Meyer ("Go") does a great job as the one fairly
normal guy in the film.  Amy Smart ("Varsity Blues") gives a
wonderfully frantic performance, spending most of the film traveling
from college to college, trying to track down Josh and figure out why
he suddenly left her. The two best performances come from Seann
William Scott ("American Pie") and newcomer DJ Qualls. Scott gives a
wonderful, over-the-top performance, playing the most psychotic member
of the road trip party. His best scene involves him aquiring the group
some new transportation from a blind woman. DJ Qualls is a rather
unique looking actor. He looks to be over six feet tall, and appears
to weigh less than one hundred pounds. The entire movie is almost
worthwhile just for a hilariously revolting scene in which he is with
a girl for the first time.
Unfortunately, "Road Trip" certainly isn't without its
weaknesses. While it may be hilarious for the majority of its running
time, it starts to lag a bit by the end. Things also get a bit too
serious and sentimental towards the end. Points like college kids
trying to live up to their parents expectations, and the difficulties
of college students finding their ways in life are suddenly brought up
in a movie where such messages don't really fit in. Thankfully, Todd
Phillips (who also produced the Norm MacDonald vehicle, "Screwed")
pulls things back together for the last ten minutes, and the movie
ends on a suitably funny and irreverent note. Watch for amusing cameos
by Fred Ward ("Tremors") as Kyle's father and Andy Dick (television's
"News Radio") as a motel clerk, who needs some serious lessons in
customer relations. I'd recommend "Road Trip" to anyone who loved and
misses movies like "Animal House", and to fans of Tom Green. Despite a
relatively small part, he provides some of the film's funniest
moments. The movie runs 91 minutes, and I give it a well earned four
out of five stars.
Any past movies you want me to review? Send to:
johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at either: http://www.dependentfilms.net or
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
Directed by: Frank Darabont
Written by: Stephen King (novel), Frank Darabont
Allow me to point out one thing which some people in Hollywood seem to have
forgotten. In order for a movie to be an Oscar contender, it doesn't have to be
over three hours long. This is, in fact, one of those rare cases where one is
happy that parts of the book were removed from the screenplay. That said, "The
Green Mile" is still a great film, blending humor and drama in a nearly
flawless manner.
Paul Edgecomb (Tom Hanks) is the head guard of a death row strip in the 1930s.
He and several other guards, including his friend Brutus (David Morse) run the
prison efficiently but not harshly. However, the presence of a sadistic guard
named Percy (Doug Hutchison) is throwing the situation into disarray. Enter
John Coffey (Michael Duncan), a mountain of a man who brings yet more confusion
to the prison with his apparent powers of healing. Edgecomb finds himself
unable to believe that Coffey could possibly have killed the two little girls
he was convicted of murdering. Coffey soon endears himself to the other guards
to such an extent that they are uncertain if they will be able to carry out his
sentence.
To start with, let me say that this isn't a particularly original film. Several
characters, such as Percy and one of the prisoners, who is called "Wild Bill"
(Sam Rockwell) are nothing more than cardboard stereotypes. The films
conclusion isn't particularly surprising, and the identity of the killer who
framed John Coffey isn't remotely unexpected. However, this isn't supposed to
be a murder mystery, and it's not supposed to be a shocker like "The Sixth
Sense". This is supposed to be an uplifting story filled with brilliant acting.
On both counts, it delivers.
The acting here is certainly the film's highpoint. Tom Hanks is great, as
always, but the real standout performances here come from Michael Duncan and
the always underrated David Morse ("The Negotiator", "The Long Kiss
Goodnight"). Duncan's portrayl of Coffey is flawless, especially considering
that he could have easily played him as a living cartoon character. If David
Morse is not granted a nomination for best supporting actor, this will be a
true travesty of justice, similar to Tom Sizemore being passed over last year
for his performance in "Saving Private Ryan".
Another spotlight stealer here is one of the cast's smaller members, Mr.
Jingles. Mr. Jingles is a small mouse who is adopted by one of the prisoners,
and eventually by the entire block. Mr. Jingles's antics may seem out of place
at times, but they do add some much needed humor during some of the more
depressing scenes. One thing I found rather interesting was the presence of two
wonderful actors in what were really nothing more than cameos. James Cromwell
makes an appearance as the prison warden, and Gary Sinise makes a very, very
brief appearance as Coffey's lawyer.
The film's biggest weakness is really the running time. At over three hours,
even the best film can seem to drag. "The Green Mile", being quite good, but
not the best film, seems to crawl along at a snail's pace. This movie certainly
isn't appropriate for children as there are several grotesque scenes and some
very adult content. Be forewarned, you had best get plenty of sleep before
seeing this or you may find yourself drifting off. This is not to say that the
film is dull, quite the contrary, but it's simply hard to stay focused for so
long. Overall, I give "The Green Mile" a recommendation and four stars.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Title
Review for Snatch. (2000)
What do a gambler named Franky Four Fingers (Benincio Del Toro), a hit-man 
named Bullet Tooth Tony (Vinnie Jones), and a gypsy caravan dealer named 
Mickey O'Neil (Brad Pitt) have in common? It's almost too complicated to 
explain, but I'll do my best. Franky Four Fingers has just been given an 84 
karat diamond to take back to the US and put in the hands of a jewel dealer 
named Cousin Avi (Dennis Farina). Unfortunately, the apparently incincible 
Boris the Blade (Rade Serbedzija) wants the diamond before it leaves the UK 
and sends a few down on their luck jewelers (Robbie Gee, Lennie James, Ade) 
to get it for him. They sort of succeed, and Cousin Avi is forced to go to 
London to get it for himself. He hires Bullet Tooth to track down Boris 
before the mad Russian can get it out of the country. Meanwhile, two boxing 
promoters named Turkish (Jason Statham) and Tommy (Stephen Graham) have a 
problem of their own. They promised the local big shot gangster, Brick Top 
(Alan Ford) that their man would go down in the fourth round of the latest 
match. Unfortunately, their man just got his clock cleaned by Mickey O'Neil 
that he won't be able to fight at all. So, they hire Mickey to take the fall 
instead. The only problem with that plan is that Mickey appears to have 
trouble following instructions. He seems to believe that "Go down in the 
fourth" actually means "Knock the other guy out with one hit." All these 
characters and more will meet up, cross paths, and make each others' lives 
quite interesting over the course of one week.
I know it's almost a crime to say this, but I wasn't a big fan of Guy 
Ritchie's first effort, 1998's Lock, Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels. 
I wasn't overly entertained by it, I found the kinetic, hyper-active style 
irritating, and it struck me as not half as cool as it thought it was. I 
guess this style of filmmaking grows on a person, because while 
Snatch contains many of the same filming elements, I enjoyed it quite 
a bit more. I'm not saying I walked out of the theater wondering at what a 
marvelous film I'd just witnessed, but I can certainly say that I didn't 
regret spending six bucks to see it. It's the sort of fast paced, vulgar, 
violent movie most American audiences will probably eat up. Now, if you've 
read my reviews before you're probably wondering why I liked it if most 
American audiences did. Well, I enjoyed it for two reasons: One, the actors 
are all clearly having a great time, and that always carries over to the 
audience; and two, it's the kind of pitch black comedy that always keeps me 
cackling like some sick, demented weirdo. Which brings up another point; if 
you don't like your comedies to contain horrifying comedy similar to that 
in, say, Fight Club, give this movie a wide berth.
A great man pointed out to me that Brad Pitt is at his best when playing a 
goofy character, and at his worst when forced to try an accent. It's as 
though Pitt himself were listening in on us when we had this conversation, 
because he's decided to combine the two. Of course, I use the word "accent" 
in its loosest sense since nearly everything Pitt says in the film is 
completely unintelligible. Amazingly enough, he manages to be very 
entertaining despite having only one or two lines the audience can 
understand. Obviously I'm not going to cover every actor in a movie with a 
cast this size, so I'll just cover a few of the high points. Vinnie Jones 
(Gone in 60 Seconds) is ideal as the suave, smarter than he looks, 
Bullet Tooth Tony; and the way he plays a scene where he's confronted by two 
guys with fake guns is simply priceless. Alan Ford (Lock, Stock, and Two 
Smoking Barrels) is quite good as the menacing Brick Top; Dennis Farina 
(wasted in Reindeer Games) is a riot as the uptight Cousin Avi; and 
Jason Statham (Lock, Stock) nicely underplays the role of Turkish. 
You're probably why I haven't mentioned Benicio Del Toro, who was 
galvanizing in Traffic. Well, it's because despite his being 
prominently mentioned both in the previews and in my plot summary, his role 
amounts to little more than a cameo. Bad call Mr. Ritchie.
I knew from the start, when that shopping list of characters was introduced 
in the space of about three minutes, that this ride was going to be either 
very confusing and quite funny, or just plain confusing. As the story began, 
and plot lines flew freely about the screen while laughs were scarce, I 
began to fear the latter possibility was manifesting itself. Thankfully, 
after a rocky twenty minutes or so, the film finds its groove and the comedy 
begins. Also, despite what looks to be a confusing story and some of the 
most hyperactive direction you're likely to find, Snatch is 
remarkably easy to follow. All the plot lines intersect (or perhaps I should 
say run head-first into one another), all the characters are fleshed out, 
and we're given a few nice little twists. It's by no means an outstanding 
movie, and it will probably leave your mind shortly after exiting the 
theater (I know it left mine about that quick, and it's a good thing I 
remembered to take notes this time around), but it doesn't aspire to be 
ground breaking. This movie is present for one reason alone: to entertain; 
and, unlike so many movies which came out of the year 2000, this one 
actually succeeds due to its quirky and amusing characters, its inability to 
take itself seriously, and its frantic pacing which never lets you catch 
your breath.
Sadly, there are still a few elements working against Snatch in 
addition to the opening act. Like Lock, Stock before it, 
Snatch simply isn't quite as cool as it thinks it is. Throughout the 
film I was struck by the fact that Ritchie had only some vague idea what a 
cool movie was, so he tried every approach possible in an attempt to create 
such a movie. He hits a few times, primarily in the scenes which smack of 
Quentin Tarantino, but otherwise he just can't quite seem to get it right. 
Strangely enough, while this same problem really bothered me in Lock, 
Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels, it didn't much grate on my nerves this 
time around. I was just too caught up in laughing at the constant stream of 
bizarre and eccentric characters to care much that Ritchie didn't have a 
clue how to make a movie as cool as, say, Pulp Fiction, which he 
obviously idolizes. I feel I should mention the film's soundtrack, which 
doesn't contain a single song I'd normally enjoy, but also not a single one 
that doesn't fit the tone of the movie. Snatch runs a little too long 
at 104 minutes. I'd recommend the film to fans of Ritchie's previous effort, 
to fans of Brad Pitt since he gives a very amusing performance, and to 
people who love movies which simply refuse to let up in the action. I give 
Snatch four out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.
